AB
AB, at the beginning of the names of places, generally shews that they have some relation to an abbey.

Abacke
Aba'cke. adv. obsolete. Backwards.
But when they came where thou thy skill didst show,They drew abacke, as half with shame confound,Shepherds to see them in their art outgo. Spens. Past.

Abactor
Aba'ctor. n.s. [Lat. abactor, a driver away.] Those who drive away or steal cattle in herds, or great numbers at once, in distinction from those that steal only a sheep or two. Blount.

Abacus
A'bacus. n.s. [Lat. abacus.]

A counting-table, anciently used in calculations.
In architecture, it is the uppermost member of a column, which serves as a sort of crowning both to the capital and column. Dict.

Abaft
Aba'ft. adv. [of abaꝼꞇan, Sax. Behind.] From the fore-part of the ship, towards the stern. Dict.

Abaisance
Abai'sance. n.s. [from the French abaiser, to depress, to bring down.] An act of reverence, a bow. Obeysance is considered by Skinner as a corruption of abaisance, but is now universally used.

Abalienate
To Aba'lienate. v.a. [from abalieno, Lat.] To make that another's which was our own before. Calv. Lex. Jur. A term of the civil law, not much used in common speech.

Abalienation
Abaliena'tion n.s. [Lat. abalienatio.] A giving up one's right to another person; or a making over an estate, goods, or chattels by sale, or due course of law. Dict.

Aband
To Aba'nd v.a. [A word contracted from abandon, but not now in use. See ABANDON.] To forsake.
Those foreigners which came from farGrew great, and got large portions of land,That in the realm, ere long, they stronger areThan they which fought at first their helping hand,And Vortiger enforced the kingdom to aband. Spenser's Fairy Queen, b. ii. cant. 10.

Abandon
To Aba'ndon. v.a. [Fr. abandonner. Derived, according to Menage, from the Italian abandonare, which signifies to forsake his colours; bandum [vexillum] deserere. Pasquier thinks it a coalition of a ban donner, to give up to a proscription; in which sense we, at this day, mention the ban of the empire.  Ban, in our own old dialect, signifies a curse; and to abandon, if considered as compounded between French and Saxon, is exactly equivalent to diris devovere.]
To give up, resign, or quit; often followed by the particle to.
The passive gods behold the Greeks defileTheir temples, and abandon to the spoilTheir own abodes; we, feeble few, conspireTo save a sinking town, involv'd in fire. Dryd. Aeneid.
To desert.
The princes using the passions of fearing evil, and desiring to escape, only to serve the rule of virtue, not to abandon one's self, leapt to a rib of the ship. Sidney, b. ii
Then being alone,Left and abandon'd of his velvet friends,'Tis right, quoth he; thus misery doth partThe flux of company. Shakesp. As you like it.
What fate a wretched fugitive attends,Scorn'd by my foes, abandon'd by my friends. Dryd. Aen. 2.
To forsake, generally with a tendency to an ill sense.
When he in presence came, to Guyon firstHe boldly spake; Sir knight, if knight thou be,Abandon this forestalled place at erst,For fear of further harm, I counsel thee. Spenser's Fairy Queen, b. ii. cant. 4. stanz. 39.
But to the parting goddess thus she pray'd;Propitious still be present to my aid,Nor quite abandon your once favour'd maid. Dryd. Fab.

Abandon Over
To Abandon Over. v.a. [a form of writing not usual, perhaps not exact.] To give up to, to resign.
Look on me as a man abandon'd o'erTo an eternal lethargy of love;To pull, and pinch, and wound me, cannot cure,And but disturb the quiet of my death. Dryd. Sp. Friar.

Abandoned
Abandoned. particip. adj.

Given up.
If she be so abandon'd to her sorrow,As it is spoke, she never will admit me. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
Who is he so abandoned to sottish credulity, as to think, upon that principle, that a clod of earth in a sack, may ever, by eternal shaking, receive the fabric of man's body? Bentley's Sermons.
Must he, whose altars on the Phrygian shore,With frequent rites, and pure, avow'd thy pow'r,Be doom'd the worst of human ills to prove,Unbless'd, abandon'd to the wrath of Jove? Pope's Odyssey, b. i. l. 80.
Forsaken, deserted.

Corrupted in the highest degree.  In this sense, it is a contraction of a longer form, abanidoned [given up] to wickedness.

Abandoning
Aba'ndoning. [A verbal noun from abandon.] Desertion, forsaking.
He hoped his past meritorious actions might outweigh his present, abandoning the thought of future action.  Clarend. b. viii.

Abandonment
Aba'ndonment. n.s. [abandonnement, Fr.]
The act of abandoning.
The state of being abandoned. Dict.

Abannition
Abanni'tion. n.s. [Lat. abannitio.] A banishment for one or two years, among the ancients, for manslaughter. Dict.

Abarcy
A'barcy. n.s. Insatiableness. Dict.

Abare
To Aba're. v.a. [abaꞃan, Sax.] To make bare, uncover, or disclose. Dict.

Abarticulation
Abarticula'tion. n.s. [from ab, from, and articulus, a joint, Lat.] A good and apt construction of the bones, by which they move strongly and easily; or that species of articulation that has manifest motion. Dict.

Abase
To Aba'se v.a. [Fr. abaisser, from the Lat. basis, or bassus, a barbarous word, signifying low, base.] To cast down, to depress, to bring low, almost always in a figurative and personal sense.
Happy shepherd, with thanks to the gods, still think to be thankful, that to thy advancement their wisdoms have thee abased. Sidney, b. i.
With unresisted might the monarch reigns;He levels mountains, and he raises plains;And, not regarding diff'rence of degree,Abas'd your daughter, and exalted me. Dryd. Fables.
Behold every one that is proud, and abase him. Job, xl. 11.
If the mind be curbed and humbled too much in children; if their spirits be abased and broken much by too strict an hand over them; they lose all their vigour and industry, and are in a worse state than the former. Locke on Education, § 46.

Abased
Aba'sed. adj. [with heralds] is a term used of the wings of eagles, when the top looks downwards towards the point of the shield; or when the wings are shut; the natural way of bearing them being spread with the top pointing to the chief of the angle. Bailey. Chambers.

Abasement
Aba'sement. n.s. The state of being brought low; the act of bringing low; depression.
There is an abasement because of glory; and there is that lifteth up his head from a low estate. Ecclesiasticus, XX. 11.

Abash
To Aba'sh. v.a. [See BASHFUL.] To put into confusion; to make ashamed.  It generally implies a sudden impression of shame.
They heard, and were abash'd, and up they sprungUpon the wing. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. i. l. 331.
This heard, th' imperious queen sat mute with fear;Nor further durst incense the gloomy thunderer.Silence was in the court at this rebuke:Nor could the gods, abash'd, sustain their sovereign's look. Dryden's Fables.
The passive admits the particle at, sometimes of, before the causal noun.
In no wise speak against the truth, but be abashed of the error of thy ignorance. Ecclesiasticus, iv. 25.
I said unto her, from whence is this kid? Is it not stolen? Render it to the owners, for it is not lawful to eat any thing that is stolen.  But she replied upon me, it was given for a gift, more than the wages: however, I did not believe her, but bad her render it to the owners: and I was abashed at her. Tob. ii. 13, 14.
The little Cupids hov'ring round,(As pictures prove) with garlands crown'd,Abash'd at what they saw and heard,Flew off, nor ever more appear'd. Swift's Miscellanies.

Abate (common law)
To Abate. [in common law]
It is in law used both actively and neuterly; as, to abate a castle, to beat it down. To abate a writ, is, by some exception, to defeat or overthrow it.  A stranger abateth, that is, entereth upon a house or land void by the death of him that last possessed it, before the heir take his possession, and so keepeth him out.  Wherefore, as he that putteth out him in possession, is said to disseise: so he that steppeth in between the former possessor and his heir, is said to abate.  In the neuter signification thus; The writ of the demandment shall abate, that is, shall be disabled, frustrated, or overthrown.  The appeal abateth by covin, that is, that the accusation is defeated by deceit. Cowel.

Abate (horsemanship)
To Abate. [in horsemanship.] A horse is said to abate or take down his curvets; when working upon curvets, he puts his two hind-legs to the ground both at once, and observes the same exactness in all the times. Dict.

Abate (verb active)
To Aba'te. v.a. [from the French abbatre, to beat down.]

To lessen, to diminish.
Who can tell whether the divine wisdom, to abate the glory of those kings, did not reserve this work to be done by a queen, that it might appear to be his own immediate work? Sir John Davies on Ireland.
If you did know to whom I gave the ring,And how unwillingly I left the ring,You would abate the strength of your displeasure. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
Here we see the hopes of great benefit and light from expositors and commentators are in a great part abated; and those who have most need of your help, can receive but little from them, and can have very little assurance of reaching the Apostle's sense, by what they find in them. Locke's Essay on St. Paul's Epistles.
To deject, or depress the mind.
This iron world (the same he weeping says)Brings down the stoutest hearts to lowest state:For misery doth bravest minds abate. Spens. Hubberd's Tale.
— — — — Have they power stillTo banish your defenders, till at lengthYour ignorance deliver you,As most abated captives to some nationThat won you without blows? Shakesp. Coriolanus.
Time that changes all, yet changes us in vain,The body, not the mind; nor can controulTh' immortal vigour, or abate the soul. Dryden's Æneid.
In commerce, to let down the price in selling, sometimes to beat down the price in buying.

Abate (verb neuter)
To Abate. v.n. To grow less; as, his passion abates; the storm abates.  It is used sometimes with the particle of before the thing lessened.
Our physicians have observed, that, in process of time, some diseases have abated of their virulence, and have, in a manner, worn out their malignity, so as to  be no longer mortal. Dryden's Hind and Panth.

Abatement
Aba'tement. n.s. [abatement, Fr.]

The act of abating or lessening.
The law of works then, in short, is that law, which requires perfect obedience, without remission or abatement; so that, by that law, a man cannot be just, or justified, without an exact performance of every tittle. Locke.
The state of being abated.
Coffee has, in common with all nuts, an oil strongly combined and entangled with earthly particles. The most noxious part of oil exhales in roasting to the abatement of near one quarter of its weight. Arbuthnot on aliments.
The sum or quantity taken away by the act of abating.
Xenophon tells us, that the city contained about ten thousand houses, and allowing one man to every house, who could have any share in the government (the rest, consisting of women, children and servants) and making other obvious abatements, these tyrants, if they had been careful to adhere together, might have been a majority even of the people collective. Swift on the contests in Athens and Rome.
The cause of abating; extenuation.
As our advantages towards practicing and promoting piety and virtue were greater than those of other men; so will our excuse be less, if we neglect to make use of them.  We cannot plead in abatement of our guilt, that we were ignorant of our duty, under the prepossession of ill habits, and the biass of a wrong education. Atterbury's Sermons.

Abatement (heraldry)
Abatement, [with heralds] is an accidental mark, which being added to a coat of arms, the dignity of it is abased, by reason of some stain or dishonourable quality of the bearer. Dict.

Abatement (law)
Abatement, in law.
The act of the abator; as, the abatement of the heir into the land before he hath agreed with the lord.  The affection or passion of the thing abated; as, abatement of the writ. Cowel.

Abater
Aba'ter. n.s.The agent or cause by which an abatement is procured.
Abaters of acrimony or sharpness: expressed oils of ripe vegetables, and all preparations of such; as of almonds, pistachoes, and other nuts. Arbuthnot on diet.

Abator
Aba'tor. n.s. [a law-term.] One who intrudes into houses or land, that is void by the death of the former possessour, as yet not entered upon or taken up by his heir. Dict.

Abatude
A'batude. n.s. [old records.] Any thing diminished. Bailey.

Abature
A'bature. n.s. [a hunting term.] Those sprigs of grass which are thrown down by a stag in his passing by. Dict.

Abb
Abb. n.s. The yarn on a weaver's warp; a term among clothiers. Chambers.

Abba
Abba. n.s. [Heb. אב] A Syriac word, which signifies father.

Abbacy
A'bbacy n.s. [Lat. abbatia.] The rights or privileges of an abbot. See ABBEY.
According to Felinus, an abbacy is the dignity itself, since an abbot is a term or word of dignity, and not of office; and, therefore, even a secular person, who has the care of souls, is sometimes, in the canon law, also stiled an abbot. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Abbess
A'bbess. n.s. [Lat. abbatissa, from whence the Saxon abuꝺıꞅꞅ, then probably abbatess, and by contraction abbesse in Fr. and abbess, Eng.] The superiour or governess of a nunnery or monastery of women.
They fledInto this abbey, whither we pursued them;And here the abbess shuts the gate on us,And will not suffer us to fetch him out. Shakesp. Comedy of Errours.
I have a sister, abbess in Terceras,Who lost her lover on her bridal-day. Dryd. D. Sebast.
Constantia's heart was so elevated with the discourse of Father Francis, that the very next day she entered upon her vow.  As soon as the solemnities of her reception were over, we retired, as it is usual, with the abbess into her own apartment. Addison. Spect. № 164.

Abbey
A'bbey, or Abby. n.s. [Lat. abbatia; from whence probably first Abbacy; which see.] A monastery of religious persons, whether men or women; distinguished from religious houses of other denominations by larger privileges. See ABBOT.
With easy roads he came to Leicester;Lodg'd in the abbey, where the reverend abbot,With all his convent, honourably receiv'd him. Shakesp. Henry VIII.

Abbey-Lubber
A'bbey-Lubber. n.s. [See LUBBER.] A slothful loiterer in a religious house, under pretence of retirement and austerity.
This is no Father Dominic, no huge overgrown abbey-lubber; this is but a diminutive sucking friar. Dryd. Sp. Fr.

Abbot
A'bbot. n.s. [in the lower Latin abbas, from אב father, which sense was implied; so that the abbots were called patres, and abesses matres monasterii.  Thus Fortunatus to the abbot Paternus: Nominis officium jure, Paterne, geris.] The chief of a convent, or fellowship of canons.  Of these, some in England were mitred, some not: those that were mitred, were exempted from the jurisdiction of the diocesan, having in themselves episcopal authority within their precincts, and being also lords of parliament.  The other sort were subject to the diocesan in all spiritual government. Cowel.  See ABBEY.

Abbotship
Abbotship. n.s. The state or privilege of an abbot. Dict.

Abbreuvoir
Abbreuvoi'r. [in French, a watering-place.  This word is derived by Menage, not much acquainted with the Teutonic dialects, from adbibare for adbibere; but more probably it comes from the same root with brew.  See BREW.] It signifies, among masons, the joint or juncture of two stones, or the interstice between two stones to be filled up with mortar. Dict.

Abbreviate
To Abbre'viate. v.a. [Lat. abbreviare.]
To shorten by contraction of parts without lots of the main substance.
It is one thing to abbreviate by contracting, another by cutting off. Bacon. Essay 26.
The only invention of late years, which hath any way contributed towards politeness in discourse, is that of abbreviating or reducing words of many syllables into one, by lopping off the rest. Swift's Introduction to genteel conversation.
To shorten, to cut short.
Against this opinion we may very well set the length of their days before the flood; which were abbreviated after, and in half this space contracted into hundreds and threescores. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 6.

Abbreviation
Abbrevia'tion. n.s.
The act of abbreviating.
The means used to abbreviate, as characters signifying whole words.
Such is the propriety and energy of expression in them all, that they never can be changed, but to disadvantage, except in the circumstance of using abbreviations. Swift's Introduction to genteel conversation.

Abbreviator
Abbrevia'tor. n.s. [abbreviateur, Fr.] One who abbreviates, or abridges.

Abbreviature
Abbre'viature. n.s. [abbreviatura, Lat.]

A mark used for the sake of shortening.
A compendium or abridgment.
He is a good man, who grieves rather for him that injures him, than for his own suffering; who prays for him, that wrongs him, forgiving all his faults; who sooner shews mercy than anger; who offers violence to his appetite, in all things endeavouring to subdue the flesh to the spirit.  This is an excellent abbreviature of the whole duty of a christian. Taylor's Guide to devotion.

Abby
Abby. See Abbey.

Abdicate
To A'bdicate. v.a. [Lat. abdico.] To give up right; to resign; to lay down an office.
Old Saturn, here, with upcast eyes,Beheld his abdicated skies. Addison.

Abdication
Abdica'tion. n.s. [abdicatio, Lat.] The act of abdicating; resignation; quitting an office by one's own proper act before the usual or stated expiration.
Neither doth it appear how a prince's abdication can make any other sort of vacancy in the throne, than would be caused by his death; since he cannot abdicate for his children, otherwise than by his own consent in form to a bill from the two houses. Swift on the Sentiments of a Church of England man.

Abdicative
A'bdicative. adj. That which causes or implies an abdication. Dict.

Abditive
A'bditive. adj. [from abdo, to hide] That which has the power or quality of hiding. Dict.

Abdomen
Abdo'men n.s. [Lat. from abdo, to hide.] A cavity commonly called the lower venter or belly: It contains the stomach, guts, liver, spleen, bladder, and is within lined with a membrane called the peritonæum.  The lower part is called the hypogastrium; the foremost part is divided into the epigastrium, the right and left hypochondria, and the navel; 'tis bounded above by the cartilago ensiformis and the diaphragm, sideways by the short or lower ribs, and behind by the vertebræ of the loins, the bones of the coxendix, that of the pubes and os sacrum.  It is covered with several muscles, from whose alternative relaxations and contractions in respiration, digestion is forwarded, and the due motion of all the parts therein contained promoted, both for secretion and expulsion. Quincy
The abdomen consists moreover of parts containing and contained. Wiseman's Surgery.

Abdominal
Abdo'minal.Abdo'minous
adj. relating to the abdomen.

Abdominous
Abdo'minal.Abdo'minous
adj. relating to the abdomen.

Abduce
To Abdu'ce. v.a. [Lat. abduco.] To draw to a different part; to withdraw one part from another. A word chiefly used in physic or science.
And if we abduce the eye unto either corner, the object will not duplicate; for, in that position, the axis of the cones remain in the same plain, as is demonstrated in the optics delivered by Galen. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii. c. 20.

Abducent
Abdu'cent adj. Muscles abducent, are those which serve to open or pull back divers parts of the body; their opposites being called adducent. Dict.

Abduction
Abdu'ction. n.s. [abductio, Lat.]
The act of drawing apart, or withdrawing one part from another.
A particular form of argument.

Abductor
Abdu'ctor. n.s. [abductor, Lat.] The name given by anatomists to the muscles, which serve to draw back the several members.
In pursuance of this theory, he supposed the constrictors of the eyelids must be strengthened in the supercilious; the abductors in drunkards, and contemplative men, who have the same steady and grave motion of the eye. Arbuthnot and Pope's Martinus Scriblerus.

Abecedarian
Abeceda'rian. n.s. [from the names of a, b, c, the three first letters of the alphabet.] He that teaches or learns the alphabet, or first rudiments of literature.
This word is used by Wood in his Athenae Oxonienses, where mentioning Farnaby the critic, he relates, that, in some part of his life, he was reduced to follow the trade of an abecedarian by his misfortunes.

Abecedary
A'becedary. adj. [See Abecedarian.]

Belonging to the alphabet.
Inscribed with the alphabet.
This is pretended from the sympathy of two needles touched with the loadstone, and placed in the center of two abecedary circles, or rings of letters, described round about them, one friend keeping one, and another the other, and agreeing upon an hour wherein they will communicate. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 2.

Abed
Abe'd adv. [from a, for at. See (A,) and Bed.] In bed.
It was a shame for them to mar their complexions, yea and conditions too, with long lying abed: and that, when she was of their age, she trowed, she would have made a handkerchief by that time o' day. Sidney, b. ii.
She has not been abed, but in her chapelAll night devoutly watch'd, and brib'd the saintsWith prayers for her deliverance. Dryd. Span. Friar.

Aberrance
Aberr'ance. n.s. [from aberro, Lat. to wander from the right way.] A deviation from the right way; an errour; a mistake; a false opinion.
Could a man be composed to such an advantage of constitution, that it should not at all adulterate the images of his mind; yet this second nature would alter the crafts of his understanding, and render it as obnoxious to aberrances, as now. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica, c. 16

Aberrancy
Abe'rrancy. The same with Aberrance.
They do not only swarm with errors, but vices depending thereon. Thus they commonly affect no man any farther than he deserts his reason, or complies with their aberrancies. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i. c. 3.

Aberrant
Abe'rrant. adj. [from aberrans, Lat.] Deviating, wandering from the right or known way. Dict.

Aberration
Aberra'tion. n.s. [from aberratio, Lat.] The act of deviating from the common track.
And if it be a mistake, it is only so; there is no heresy in such an harmless aberration; at the worst, with the ingenuous, the probability of it will render it a lapse of easy pardon. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica, c. 11.

Aberring
Abe'rring. part. [from the verb aberr, of aberro, Lat.] Wandering, going, astray.
Though there were a fatality in this year, yet divers were, and others might be, out in their account, aberring several ways from the true and just compute, and calling that one year, which perhaps might be another. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 12.
Of the verb aberr I have found no example.

Aberuncate
To Aberu'ncate. v.a. [averunco, Lat.] To pull up by the roots; to extirpate utterly. Dict.

Abet
To Abe't v.a. [from bꞇan, Sax. signifying to enkindle or animate.] To push forward another, to support him in his designs by connivance, encouragement, or help.  It is generally taken, at least by modern writers, in an ill sense; as may be seen in Abetter.
To abet signifieth, in our common law, as much as to encourage or set on. Cowel.
Then shall I soon, quoth he, return again,Abet that virgin's cause disconsolate,And shortly back return unto this place,To walk this way in pilgrim's poor estate. Fairy Q, b. i.
A widow who by solemn vows,Contracted to me, for my spouse,Combin'd with him to break her word,And has abetted all. — — —  Hudibras, p. iii. cant. 3.
Men lay so great weight upon their being of right opinions, and their eagerness of abetting them, that they account that unum necessarium. Decay of Piety.
In the reign of king Charles the first, though that prince was married to a daughter of France, and was personally beloved and esteemed in the French court; it is well known that they abetted both parties in the civil war, and always furnished supplies to the weaker side, least there should be an end put to these fatal divisions. Addison. Freeholder, № 28.

Abetment
Abe'tment. n.s. The act of abetting. Dict.

Abetter
Abe'tter, or Abe'ttor. n.s. He that abets; the supporter or encourager of another.
You shall be still plain Torrismond with me,Th' abettor, partner, (if you like the name)The husband of a tyrant, but no king;Till you deserve that title by your justice. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
Whilst this sin of calumny has two such potent abetters, we are not to wonder at its growth; as long as men are malicious and designing, they will be traducing. Govern. of the Tongue.
These and the like considerations, though they may have no influence on the headstrong unruly multitude, ought to sink into the minds of those who are their abettors, and who, if they escape the punishment here due to them, must very well know, that these several mischiefs will be one day laid to their charge. Addison. Freeholder, № 50.

Abeyance
Abey'ance. n.s. [from the French aboyer, allatrare, to bark at.] This word, in Littleton, cap. Discontinuance, is thus used. The right of fee-simple lieth in abeyance, when it is all only in the remembrance, intendment, and consideration of the law.  The frank tenement of the globe of the the parsonage, is in no man during the time that the parsonage is void, but is in abeyance. Cowel.

Abgregation
Abgrega'tion. n.s. [abgregatio, Lat.] A separation from the flock. Dict.

Abhor
To Abho'r. v.a. [abhorreo, Lat.] To hate with acrimony; to detest to extremity; to loath.
Whilst I was big in clamour, came there a man,Who having seen me in my worser state,Shunn'd my abhorr'd society. Shakespear's K. Lear.
To whom thus Michael: Justly thou abhorr'stThat son, who on the quiet state of menSuch trouble brought, affecting to subdueRational liberty. Milt. Parad. Lost, b. xii. l. 79.
The self-same thing they will abhorOne way, and long another for. Hudibras, p. i. cant. 1.
A church of England man abhors the humour of the age, in delighting to fling scandals upon the clergy in general; which, besides the disgrace to the reformation, and to religion itself, cast an ignominy upon the kingdom that it doth not deserve. Swift on the Sentiments of a Church of England man.

Abhorrence
Abho'rrence. n.s. [from abhor.]
The act of abhorring, detestation.
It draws upon him the just and universal hatred and abhorrence of all men here; and, finally, subjects him to the wrath of God, and eternal damnation hereafter. South's Serm.
The disposition to abhor, hatred.
He knew well that even a just and necessary offence does, by giving men acquaintance with war, take off somewhat from the abhorrence of it, and insensibly dispose them to farther hostilities. Decay of Pietry.

Abhorrency
Abho'rrency. n.s. The same with Abhorrence.
The first tendency to any injustice that appears, must be suppressed with a show of wonder and abhorrency in the parents and governours. Locke on Education, §110.

Abhorrent
Abho'rrent. adj. [from abhor]
Struck with abhorrence.
— — — For if the worldsIn worlds inclos'd would on his senses burst,He would abhorrent turn. Thomson's Summer, l. 310.
Contrary to, foreign, inconsistent with.  It is used with the particles from or to, but more properly with from.
This I conceive to be an hypothesis, well worthy a rational belief; and yet is it so abhorrent from the vulgar, that they would as soon believe Anaxagoras, that snow is black, as him that should affirm it is not white; and if any should in effect assert, that the fire is not formally hot, it would be thought that the heat of his brain had fitted him for Anticyra, and that his head were so to madness. Glanville's Scepsis Scient. c. 17.
Why then these foreign thoughts of state employments,Abhorrent to your function and your breeding?Poor droning truants of unpractis'd cells,Bred in the fellowship of beardless boys,What wonder is it if you know not men? Dryden's Don Sebastian.

Abhorrer
Abho'rrer. n.s. [from abhor.] The person that abhors; a hater, detester.
The representatives of the lower clergy were railed at, for disputing the power of the bishops, by the known abhorrers of episcopacy, and abused for doing nothing in the convocations, by these very men who wanted to bind up their hands. Swift. Examiner, № 21.

Abhorring
Abho'rring. The object of abhorrence.  This seems not to be the proper use of the participial noun.
And they shall go forth, and look upon the carcases of the men that have transgressed against me: for their worm shall not die, neither shall their fire be quenched, and they shall be an abhorring unto all flesh. Isaiah, lxvi. 44.

Abide
To Abi'de. v.n. I abode or abid. [from bıꝺıan, or aubıꝺıan, Sax.]
To dwell in a place, not remove.
Thy servant became surety for the lad unto my father, saying, if I bring him not unto thee, then I shall bear the blame to my father for ever.  Now therefore I pray thee, let my servant abide instead of the lad, a bondman to my lord; and let the lad go up with his brethren. Gen. xliv. 32, 33.
To dwell.
The Marquis Dorset, as I hear, is fledTo Richmond, in the parts where he abides. Shakesp. Richard III.
To remain, not cease or fail.
They that trust in the Lord shall be as mount Zion, which cannot be removed, but abideth for ever. Psalm cxxv. 1.
To continue in the same state.
The fear of the Lord tendeth to life; and he that hath it shall abide satisfied. Prov. xix. 23.
Those who apply themselves to learning, are forced to acknowledge one God, incorruptible and unbegotten; who is the only true being, and abides for ever above the highest heavens, from whence he beholds all the things that are done in heaven and earth. Stillingfl. Defence of Disc. on Rom. Idolat.
There can be no study without time; and the mind must abide and dwell upon things, or be always a stranger to the inside of them. South.
To wait for, expect, attend, wait upon, await; used of things prepared for persons, as well as of persons expecting things.
Home is he brought, and laid in sumptuous bed,Where many skilful leeches him abide,To slave his hurts. Fairy Queen, b. i. cant. 5. stanz. 17.
While lions war, and battle for their dens,Poor harmless lambs abide their enmity. Shakesp. Hen. VI. p. 3.
Bond and afflictions abide me. Acts xx. 23.
To bear or support the consequences of a thing.
Ah me! they little knowHow dearly I abide that boast so vain. Milton's Par. Lost, b. iv. l. 37.
To bear or support, without being conquered or destroyed.
But the Lord he is the true God, he is the living God, and an everlasting king; At his wrath the earth shall tremble, and the nations shall not be able to abide his indignation. Jer. x. 10.
It must be allowed a fair presumption in favour of the truth of my doctrines, that they have abid a very rigorous test now for above thirty years, stand yet firm; and the longer and more strictly they are look'd into, the more they are confirmed to this very day. Woodward, Letter i.
To bear without aversion; in which sense it is commonly used with a negative.
Thou can'st not abide Tiridates; this is but love of thyself. Sidney, b. ii.
Thy vile race,Though thou didst learn, had that in't, which good naturesCould not abide to be with; therefore wast thouDeservedly confin'd into this rock Shakesp. Tempest.
To bear or suffer.
That chief (rejoin'd the God) his race derivesFrom Ithaca, and wond'rous woes survives;Laetres' son: girt with circumfluous tidesHe still calamatous constraint abides Pope's Odyss. b. iv. l. 750.
It is used with the particle with before a person, and at or in before a place.
It is better that I give her to thee, than that I should give her to another man: Abide with me. Gen. xxix. 19.
For thy servant vowed a vow, while I abode at Geshur in Syria, saying, if the Lord shall bring me again indeed to Jerusalem, then I will serve the Lord. 2. Sam. xv. 8.
It is used with by before a thing; as, to abide by his testimony; to abide by his own skill; that is, to rely upon them; to abide by an opinion; to maintain it; to abide by a man, is also, to defend or support him.  But these forms are something low.
Of the participle abid, I have found only the example in Woodward.

Abider
Abi'der. n.s. [from abide.] The person that abides or dwells in a place; perhaps that lives or endures.  A word little in use.

Abiding
Abi'ding. n.s. [from abide.] Continuance.
We are strangers before thee and sojourners, as were all our fathers: our days on the earth are as a shadow, and there is none abiding. 1. Chron. xxix. 15.
The air in that region is so violently removed, and carried about with such swiftness, as nothing in that place can consist or have abiding. Rawleigh's History of the World.

Ability
Abi'lity. n.s. [Habileté, Fr.]

 The power to do any thing, whether depending upon skill, or riches, or strength, or any other quality.
Of singing thou hast got the reputation,Good Thyrsis, mine I yield to thy ability;My heart doth seek another estimation. Sidney, b. i.
If aught in my ability may serveTo heighten what thou suffer'st, and appeaseThy mind with what amends is in my pow'r. Milton's Sampson Agonistes, l. 744.
They gave after their ability unto the treasure of the work. Ezra ii. 69.
If any man minister, let him do it as of the ability which God giveth: that God in all things may be glorified through Jesus Christ. 1. Pet. iv. 11.
 Capacity.
Children in whom there was no blemish, but well-favoured, and skilful in all wisdom, and cunning in knowledge, and understanding science, and such as had ability in them to stand in the king's palace. Dan. i. 4.
 When it has the plural number, abilities, it frequently signifies the faculties or powers of the mind, and sometimes the force of understanding given by nature, as distinguished from acquired qualifications.
Wherever we find our abilities too weak for the performance, he assures us of the assistance of his holy spirit. Rogers's Sermons.
Whether it may be thought necessary, that in certain tracts of country, like what we call parishes, there should be one man, at least, of abilities to read and write? Swift's Arguments against abolishing Christianity.

Abintestate
Abinte'state. adv. [of ab, from, and intestatus, Lat.] A term of law, implying him that inherits from a man, who, though he had the power to make a will, yet did not make it.

Abject (adjective)
A'bject. adj. [abjectus, Lat. thrown away as of no value.]

Mean, or worthless, spoken of persons.
That rebellionCame like itself in base and abject routs,Led on by bloody youth goaded with rage,And countenanc'd by boys and beggary. Shakesp. Hen. IV
Honeset men, who tell their sovereigns what they expect from them, and what obedience they shall be always ready to pay them, are not upon an equal foot with such base and abject flatterers; and are therefore always in danger of being the last in the royal favour. Addison's Whig Examiner.
Contemptible, or of no value; used of things.
I was at first, as other beasts that grazeThe troden herb, of abject thoughts and low. Milt. Paradise Lost, b. ix. l. 571.
Without hope or regard; used of condition.
The rarer thy example stands,By how much from the top of wond'rous glory,Strongest of mortal men,To lowest pitch of abject fortune thou art fall'n. Milton's Samson Agonistes.
We see man and woman in the highest innocence and perfection, and in the most abject state of guilt and infirmity. Addison. Spectator, № 273.
Destitute, mean and despicable; used of actions.
To what base ends, and by what abject ways,Are mortals urg'd thro' sacred lust of praise? Pope's Essay on Criticism
The rapine is so abject and profane,They not from trifles, nor from gods refrain. Dryden's Juvenal, Sat. 8.

Abject (noun)
A'bject. n.s. A man without hope; a man whose miseries are irretrievable.
But in mine adversity they rejoiced, and gathered themselves together: yea, the abjects gathered themselves together against me, and I knew it not; they did tear me, and ceased not. Psalm xxxv. 15.

Abject (verb)
To Abje'ct. v.a. [abjicio, Lat.] To throw away. A word rarely used.

Abjectedness
Abje'ctedness. n.s. [from abject.] The state of an abject.
He would love at no less rate than death; and, from the supereminent height of glory, stooped and abased himself to the sufferance of the extremest of indignities, and sunk himself to the bottom of abjectedness, to exalt our condition to the contrary extreme. Boyle's Works.

Abjection
Abje'ction. n.s. [from abject.] Meanness of mind; want of spirit; servility; baseness.
That this should be termed baseness, abjection of mind, or servility, is it credible? Hooker, b. v. § 47.
Now the just medium of this case lies betwixt the pride and the abjection, the two extremes. L'Estrange.

Abjectly
A'bjectly. adv. [from abject.] In an abject manner, meanly, basely, servilely, contemptibly.

Abjectness
A'bjectness. n.s. [from abject.] The same with abjection; servility, meanness.
Servility and abjectness of humour is implicitely involved in the charge of lying; the condescending to that, being a mark of a disingenuous spirit. Government of the Tongue, § 8.
By humility I mean not the abjectness of a base mind: but a prudent care not to over-value ourselves upon any account. Grew's Cosmologia Sacra, b. ii. c. 7.

Abjugate
To A'bjugate. v.a. [abjugo, Lat.] To unyoke, to uncouple. Dict.

Abjuration
Abjura'tion. n.s. [from abjure.] The act of abjuring. The oath taken for that end.
Until Henry VIII. his time, if a man, having committed felony, could go into a church or church-yard, before he was apprehended, he might not be taken from thence to the usual trial of law, but confessing his fault to the justices, or to the coroner, gave his oath to forsake the realm for ever, which was called abjuration.
There are some abjurations still in force among us here in England; as, by the statute of the 25th of king Charles II. all persons that are admitted into any office, civil or military, must take the test; which is an abjuration of some doctrines of the church of Rome.
There is likewise another oath of abjuration, which laymen and clergymen are both obliged to take; and that is, to abjure the Pretender. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Abjure
To Abju're. v.a. [abjuro, Lat.]
To cast off upon oath, to swear not to do something.
Either to die the death, or to abjureFor ever the society of man. Shakesp. Midsum. Night's Dream.
No man, therefore, that hath not abjured his reason, and sworn allegiance to a preconceived fantastical hypothesis, can undertake the defence of such a supposition. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
To retract, or recant, or abnegate; a position upon oath.

Ablactate
To Abla'ctate. v.a. [ablacto, Lat.] To wean from the breast.

Ablactation
Ablacta'tion. n.s. One of the methods of grafting; and, according to the signification of the word, as it were a weaning of a cyon by degrees from its mother stock, not cutting it off wholly from the stock, till it is firmly united to that on which it is grafted.

Ablaqueation
Ablaquea'tion. [ablaqueatio, Lat.] The act or practice of opening the ground about the roots of trees, to let the air and water operate upon them.
Trench the ground, and make it ready for the spring: Prepare also soil, and use it where you have occasion: Dig borders. Uncover as yet roots of trees, where ablaqueation is requisite. Evelyn's Kalendar.
The tenure in chief ought to be kept alive and nourished; the which, as it is the very root that doth maintain this silver stem, that by many rich and fruitful branches spreadeth itself into the chancery, exchequer, and court of wards: so if it be suffered to starve, by want of ablaqueation, and other good husbandry, not only this yearly fruit will much decrease from time to time, but also the whole body and boughs of that precious tree itself, will fall into danger of decay and dying. Bacon's Office of Alienations.

Ablation
Abla'tion.  n.s. [ablatio, Lat.] The act of taking away.

Ablative
A'blative. n.a. [ablativus, Lat.]
That which takes away.
The sixth case of the Latin nouns; the case which, among other significations, includes the person from whom something is taken away. A term of grammar.

Able (adjective)
A'ble. adj. [habile, Fr. habilis, Lat. Skilful, ready.]

 Having strong faculties, or great strength or knowledge, riches, or any other power of mind, body, or fortune.
He was not afraid of an able man, as Lewis the Eleventh was.  But, contrariwise, he was served by the ablest men that were to be found; without which his affairs could not have prospered as they did. Bacon's Henry VII.
Such other gambol faculties he hath, that shew a weak mind and an able body, for the which the prince admits him: for the prince himself is such another: the weight of an hair will turn the scales. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
Having power sufficient; enabled.
All mankind acknowledge themselves able and sufficient to do many things, which actually they never do. South's Serm.
Every man shall give as he is able, according to the blessing of the Lord thy God, which he hath given thee. Deut. xvi. 17.
 Before a verb, with the participle to, it signifies generally having the power; before a noun, with for, it means qualified.
Wrath is cruel, and anger is outrageous; but who is able to stand before envy? Prov. xxvii. 4.
There have been some inventions also, which have been able for the utterance of articulate sounds, as the speaking of certain words. Wilkin's Mathematical Magic.

Able (verb)
To A'ble. v.a. To make able; to enable, which is the word commonly used. See Enable.
Plate sin with gold,And the strong lance of justice hurtless breaks:Arm it with rags, a pigmy's straw doth pierce it.None does offend, none, I say none; I'll able 'em;Take that of me, my friend, who have the pow'rTo seal th' accuser's lips. Shakespeare's King Lear.

Able-bodied
Able-Bodied. adj. Strong of body.
It lies in the power of every fine woman, to secure at least half a dozen able-bodied men to his majesty's service. Addison. Freeholder, № 4.

Ablegate
To A'blegate. v.a. [ablego, Lat.] To send abroad upon some employment; also to send a person out of the way that one is weary of. Dict.

Ablegation
Ablega'tion. n.s. [from ablegate.] A sending abroad, or out of the way. Dict.

Ableness
A'bleness. n.s. [from able.] Ability of body, vigour, force.
That nation doth so excel, both for comeliness and ableness, that from neighbour countries they ordinarily come, some to strive, some to learn, some to behold. Sidney, b. ii..

Ablepsy
A'blepsy. n.s. [Άβλεψία, Gr.] Want of sight, natural blindness; also unadvisedness. Dict.

Abligate
To A'bligate. v.a. [abligo, Lat.] To bind or tye up from. D.

Abligurition
Abliguri'tion. n.s. [abliguritio, Lat.] A prodigal spending on meat and drink. Dict.

Ablocate
To A'blocate. v.a. [abloco, Lat.] To let out to hire.
Perhaps properly by him who has hired it out from another. Calvin's Lexicon Juridicum.

Ablocation
Abloca'tion. n.s. [from ablocate.] A letting out to hire.

Ablude
To Ablu'de. v.n. [abludo, Lat.] To be unlike. Dict.

Abluent
A'bluent. adj. [abluens, Lat. from abluo, to wash away.]
That which washes clean.
That which has the power of cleaning. Dict.

Ablution
Ablu'tion. n.s. [ablutio, Lat.]
The act of cleansing, or washing clean.
There is a natural analogy between the ablution of the body and the purification of the soul; between eating the holy bread and drinking the sacred chalice, and a participation of the body and blood of Christ Taylor's Worthy Communicant.
Wash'd by the briny wave, the pious trainAre cleans'd, and cast th' ablutions in the main. Pope's Iliad.
The rinsing of chymical preparations in water, to dissolve and wash away any acrimonious particles.
The cup given, without consecration, to the laity in the popish churches.

Abnegate
To A'bne'gate v.a. [from abnego, Lat.] To deny.

Abnegation
Abnega'tion n.s. [abnegatio, Lat. denial, from abnego, to deny.] Denial, renunciation.
The abnegation or renouncing of all his own holds and interests, and trusts of all that man is most apt to depend upon, that he may more expeditely follow Christ. Hammond's Practical Catechism.

Abnodation
Abnoda'tion. n.s. [abnodatio, Lat.] The act of cutting away knots from trees; a term of gardening. Dict.

Abnormous
Abno'rmous. adj. [abnormis, Lat. out of rule.] Irregular, mishapen. Dict.

Aboard
Abo'ard. adv. [a sea-term, but adopted into common language; derived immediately from the French à board, as, aller à bord, envoyer à bord. Bord is itself a word of very doubtful original, and perhaps, in its different acceptations, deducible from different roots.  Boꞃꝺ, in the ancient Saxon, signified a house; in which sense, to go aboard, is to take up residence in a ship.] In a ship.
Which, when far off, Cymocles heard and saw,He loudly call'd to such as were aboard,The little bark unto the shore to draw,And him to ferry over that deep ford. Fairy Q. b. ii. cant. 6.
I made this answer, that he might land them, if it pleased him, or otherwise keep them aboard. Sir W. Rawleigh's Essays.
When morning rose, I sent my mates to bringSupplies of water from a neighb'ring spring;Whilst I the motions of the winds explor'd;Then summon'd in my crew, and went aboard. Addison's Ovid's Metamorphoses, b. iii.

Abode (noun)
Abo'de. n.s. [from abide.]
Habitation, dwelling, place of residence.
But I know thy abode and thy going out, and thy coming in, and thy rage against me. 2 Kings, xix. 27.
Others may use the ocean as their road,Only the English make it their abode;Whose ready sails with every wind can fly,And make a cov'nant with th' inconstant sky. Waller.
 Stay, continuance in a place.
Sweet friends, your patience for my long abode; Not I, but my affairs, have made you wait. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
Making a short abode in Sicily the second time, landing in Italy, and making the war, may be reasonably judged the business but of ten months. Dryden's Dedicat. to Aeneid.
The woodcock's early visit, and abodeOf long continuance in our temp'rate clime,Foretel a liberal harvest. Phillips.
 To make abode; to dwell, to reside, to inhabit.
Deep in a cave the Sibyl makes abode;Thence full of fate returns, and of the God. Dryd. Aen. 6.

Abode (verb)
To Abo'de. v.a. [See Bode.] To foretoken or foreshow; to be a prognostic, to be ominous.  It is taken, with its derivatives, in the sense either of good or ill.
Every man,After the hideous storm that follow'd, wasA thing inspir'd; and, not consulting, brokeInto a general prophecy, that this tempest,Dashing the garment of this peace, abodedThe sudden breach of it. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.

Abodement
Abo'dement. n.s. [from to abode.] A secret anticipation of something future; an impression upon the mind of some event to come; prognostication; omen.
I like not this.For many men that stumble at the threshold,Are well foretold that danger lurks within. —— Tush! man, abodements must not now affright us. Shakespeare's Henry VI. p. iii.
My lord bishop, being somewhat troubled, took the freedom to ask him, Whether he had never any secret abodement in his mind? No, replied the duke; but I think some adventure may kill me as well as another man. Wotton.

Abolish
To Abo'lish. v.a. [from aboles, Lat. to blot out.]
To annul.
For us to abolish what he hath established, were presumption most intolerable. Hooker, b. iii. § 10.
On the parliament's part it was proposed, that all the bishops, deans, and chapters, might be immediately taken away, and abolished. Clarendon, b. viii.
 To put an end to; to destroy.
The long continued wars, between the English and the Scots, had then raised invincible jealousies and hate, which long continued peace hath since abolished. Sir John Hayward.
That shall Perocles well requite, I wot,And, with thy blood, abolish so reproachful blot. Fairy Queen, b. ii. cant. 4. stanza 45.
        More destroyed than they,We should be quite abolish'd, and expire. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 92.
       Or wilt thou thyselfAbolish thy creation, and unmakeFor him, what for thy glory thou hast made? Idem, b. iii. l. 163.
Fermented spirits contract, harden, and consolidate many fibres together, abolishing many canals; especially where the fibres are the tenderest, as in the brain. Arbuth. on Aliments
      Nor could Vulcanian flameThe stench abolish, or the favour tame. Dryd. Virg. Geo. iii.

Abolishable
Abo'lishable. adj. [from abolish.] That which may be abolished.

Abolisher
Abo'lisher. n.s. [from abolish.] He that abolishes.

Abolishment
Abo'lishment. n.s. [from abolish.] The act of abolishing.
The plain and direct way against us herein, had been only to prove, that all such ceremonies, as they require to be abolished, are retained by us with the hurt of the church, or with less benefit than the abolishment of them would bring. Hooker, b. iv.
He should therefore think the abolishment of that order among us, would prove a mighty scandal and corruption to our faith, and manifestly dangerous to our monarchy. Swift on the Sentiments of a Church of Englandman.

Abolition
Aboli'tion. n.s. [from abolish.] The act of abolishing.  This is now more frequently used than abolishment.
From the total abolition of the popular power, may be dated the ruin of Rome: for had the reducing hereof to its ancient condition, proposed by Agrippa, been accepted instead of Mæcenas's model, that state might have continued unto this day. Grew's Cosmologia Sacra, b.iii. c. 4.
An apoplexy is a sudden abolition of all the senses, external and internal, and of all voluntary motion, by the stoppage of the flux and reflux of the animal spirits through the nerves destined for those motions. Arbuthnot on Diet.

Abominable
Abo'minable. adj. [abominabilis, Lat.]
Hateful, detestable.
              Return'dSuccessful beyond hope, to lead thee forthTriumphant out of this internal pitAbominable, accurs'd, the house of woe. M. Par. Lost, b. x.
It is not to be questioned, but the queen and ministry might easily redress this abominable grievance, by enlarging the number of justices of the peace, by endeavouring to choose men of virtuous principles. Swift's Project for the advancement of Religion.
 Unclean.
The foul that shall touch any unclean thing, as the uncleanness of man, or any unclean beast, or any abominable unclean thing, and eat of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace-offerings, which pertain unto the Lord, even that soul shall be cut off from his people. Leviticus, vii. 21.
 In low and ludicrous language, it is a word of loose and indeterminate censure.
They say you are a melancholy fellow. — I am so; I do love it better than laughing. — Those that are in extremity of either, are abominable fellows, and betray themselves to every modern censure, worse than drunkards. Shakespeare's As you like it.

Abominableness
Abo'minableness n.s. [from abominable.] The quality of being abominable; hatefulness, odiousness.
Till we have proved, in its proper place, the eternal and essential difference between virtue and vice, we must forbear to urge atheists with the corruption and abominableness of their principles. Bentley's Sermons.

Abominably
Abo'minably. adv. [from abominable.] A word of low or familiar language, signifying excessively, extremely, exceedingly; in the ill sense.
Since I have been your wife, I have observed great abuses and disorders in your family; your servants are mutinous and quarrelsome, and cheat you most abominably. Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.

Abominate
To Abo'minate. v.a. [abominor, Lat.] To abhor, detest, hate utterly.
We are not guilty of your injuries,No way consent to them; but abhor,Abominate, and loath this cruelty. Southern's Oroonoko.
He professed both to abominate and despise all mystery, refinement, and intrigue, either in a prince or minister.  He could not tell what I meant by secrets of state, where an enemy, or some rival nation, were not in the case. Swift's Gulliv. Travels.

Abomination
Abomina'tion. n.s.
 Hatred, detestation; as, to have in abomination.
To assist king Charles by English or Dutch forces, would render him odious to his new subjects, who have nothing in so great abomination, as those whom they hold for heretics. Swift's Miscellanies.
 The object of hatred.
That ye shall say, thy servant's trade hath been about cattle, from our youth even until now, both we and also our fathers: that ye may dwell in the land of Goshen; for every shepherd is an abomination to the Egyptians. Genesis, xlvi. 34.
 Pollution, defilement.
And there shall in no wife enter into it any thing that defileth, neither whatsoever worketh abomination, or maketh a lie. Rev. xxi. 27.
Each heart in Rome does love and pity you;Only th' adulterous Antony, most largeIn his abominations, turns you off,And gives his potent regiment to a trull,That noses it against us. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.
 The cause of pollution.
And the high places that were before Jerusalem, which were on the right hand of the mount of corruption, which Solomon the king of Israel had builded for Ashtoreth the abomination of the Zidonian, and for Chemosh the abomination of the Moabites, and for Milcom the abomination of the children of Ammon, did the king defile. 2 Kings, xxiii. 13.

Aborigines
Abori'gines. n.s. Lat. The earliest inhabitants of a country; those of whom no original is to be traced; as, the Welsh in Britain.

Abort
To Abo'rt. v.n. [aborto, Lat.] To bring forth before the time; to miscarry. Dict.

Abortion
Abo'rtion. n.s. [abortio, Lat.]

 The act of bringing forth untimely.
 The produce of an untimely birth.
His wife miscarried; but as the abortion proved only a female fœtus, he comforted himself, that, had it arrived to perfection, it would not have answered his account. Arbuthnot and Pope's Martinus Scriblerus.
Behold my arm thus blasted, dry and wither'd,Shrunk like a foul abortion, and decay'd,Like some untimely product of the seasons,Robb'd of its properties of strength and office. Rowe's Jane Shore.

Abortive (adjective)
Abo'rtive. adj. [abortivus, Lat.]
 That which is brought forth before the due time of birth.
If ever he have child, abortive be it,Prodigious, and untimely brought to light. Shakesp. Rich. III.
All th' unaccomplish'd works of nature's hand,Abortive, monstrous, or unkindly mix'd,Dissolv'd on earth, fleet hither. Paradise Lost, b. iii. l. 456.
 Figuratively, that which fails for want of time.
This is the true cause, why so many politic conceptions, so elaborately formed and wrought, and grown at length ripe for delivery, do yet, in the issue, miscarry and prove abortive. South's Sermons.
          False hopesHe cherishes, nor will his fruit expectTh' autumnal season, but, in summer's prideWhen other orchards smile, abortive fail. Phillips.
How often hast thou waited at my cup,Fed from my trencher, kneel'd down at the board,When I have feasted with queen Margaret?Remember it, and let in make thee crest-faln;Ay, and allay this thy abortive pride. Shakesp. Hen. VI. p. ii.
 That which brings forth nothing.
These pass'd, if any pass, the void profound,Of unessential night receives him next,Wide-gaping! and with utter loss of beingThreatens him, plung'd in that abortive gulf. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 451.

Abortive (noun)
Abo'rtive. n.s. That which is born before the due time. See Abortive, adj.
No common wind, no customed event,But they will pluck away its nat'ral causes,And call them meteors, prodigies, and signs,Abortives, and presages, tongues of heav'nPlainly denouncing vengeance upon John. Shakes. K. John.
Take the fine skin of an abortive, and, with starch thin laid on, prepare your ground or tablet. Peacham on Drawing.
This is certain, that many are, by this means, preserved, and do signal service to their country, who, without such a provision, might have perished as abortives, or have come to an untimely end, and perhaps have brought, upon their guilty parents, the like destruction. Addison, Guardian, № 106.

Abortively
Abo'rtively. adv. [from abortive.] Born without the due time; immaturely; untimely.

Abortiveness
Abo'rtiveness. n.s. [from abortive.] The state of abortion.

Abortment
Abo'rtment. n.s. [from abort.] The thing brought forth out of time; an untimely birth.
I shall not then doubt the happy issue of my undertakings in this design, whereby concealed treasures, which now seem utterly lost to mankind, shall be confined to so universal a piety, and brought into use by the industry of converted penitents, whose wretched carcases the impartial laws have, or shall, dedicate, as untimely feasts, to the worms of the earth, in whose womb those deserted mineral riches must ever lie buried as lost abortments, unless those be made the active midwives to deliver them. Bacon's Physical Remains.

Abound
To Abo'und. v.n. [abundo, Lat. abonder, French.]
To have in great plenty; used sometimes with the particle in, and sometimes the particle with.
        The king-becoming graces,I have no relish of them, but aboundIn the division of each several crime,Acting it many ways. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Corn, wine, and oil, are wanting to this ground,In which our countries fruitfully abound. Dryd. Indian Emp.
A faithful man shall abound with blessings: but he that maketh haste to be rich, shall not be innocent. Prov. xxviii. 20.
Now that languages are made, and abound with words, standing for such combinations, an usual way of getting these complex ideas, is by the explication of those terms that stand for them. Locke.
 To be in great plenty.
And because iniquity shall abound, the love of many shall wax cold. Matthew, xxiv. 12.
Words are like leaves, and where they most abound,Much fruit of sense beneath is rarely found. Pope's Essay on Criticism.

About (adverb)
Abo'ut. adv.
Circularly.
The weyward sisters, hand in hand,Posters of the sea and land,Thus do go about, about,Thrice to thine, and thrice to mine,And thrice again to make up nine. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 In circuit.
My honest lads, I'll tell you what I am about. — Two yards and more. — No quips now, Pistol: indeed I am in the waste two yards about; but I am about no waste, I am about thrift. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
A tun about was ev'ry pillar there,A polish'd mirrour shone not half so clear. Dryd. Fables.
 Nearly.
When the boats were come within about sixty yards of the pillar, they found themselves all bound, and could go no farther; yet so as they might move to go about, but might not approach nearer. Bacon's New Atalantis.
 Here and there; every way.
Up rose the gentle virgin from her place,And looked all about, if she might spyHer lovely knight to move his manly pace. Fairy Queen, b. i. cant. ii. stanz. 33.
A wolf that was past labour, had the wit in his old age, yet to make the best of a bad game; he borrows a habit, and so about he goes, begging charity from door to door, under the disguise of a pilgrim. L'Estrange.
 With to before a verb; as, about to fly; upon the point, within a small distance of.
These dying lovers, and their floating sons,Suspend the sight, and silence all our guns:Beauty and youth, about to perish, findsSuch noble pity in brave English minds. Waller.
The longest way, in opposition to the short straight way.
Gold hath these natures; greatness of weight; closeness of parts; fixation; pliantness, or softness; immunity from rust; colour, or tincture of yellow: Therefore the sure way (though most about) to make gold, is to know the causes of the several natures before rehearsed. Bacon's Natural Hist. № 328.
      Spies of the VolsciansHeld me in chase, that I was forc'd to wheelThree or four miles about; else had I, Sir,Half an hour since brought my report. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 To bring about; to bring to the point or state desired; as, he has brought about his purposes.
Whether this will be brought about, by breaking his head, I very much question. Spectator.
 To come about; to come to some certain state or point.
Wherefore it came to pass, when the time was come about, after Hannah had conceived, that she bare a son. 1 Sam. i. 20.
One evening it befel, that looking out,The wind they long had wish'd was come about;Well pleas'd they went to rest; and if the gale'Till morn continu'd, both resolv'd to fail. Dyrd. Fables.
 To go about a thing; to prepare to do it.
Did not Moses give you the law, and yet none of you keepeth the law? Why go ye about to kill me? John vii. 19.
In common language, they say, to  come about a man, to circumvent him.
Some of these phrases seem to derive their original from the French à bout; venir à bout d'une chose; venir à bout de quelqu'un.

About (preposition)
Abo'ut. prep. [abuꞇan, or abuꞇon, Sax. which seems to signify encircling on the outside.]

 Round, surrounding, encircling.
Let not mercy and truth forsake thee. Bind them about thy neck; write them upon the table of thy heart. Proverbs, iii. 3.
        At this she loudly shrieks,'Tis he, 'tis he, she cries, and tears her cheeks,Her hair, her vest; and, stooping to the sands,About his neck she cast her trembling hands. Dryd. Fables
 Near to.
Speak unto the congregation, saying, get you up from about the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram. Exodus
        Thou dost nothing, Sergius,Thou canst endeavour nothing, nay, not think;But I both see and hear it; and am with thee,By and before, about and in thee too. Benj. Johns. Catiline.
 Concerning, with regard to, relating to.
When Constantine had finished an house for the service of God at Jerusalem, the dedication he judged a matter not unworthy; about the solemn performance whereof, the greatest part of the bishops in christendom should meet together. Hooker, b. v. § 12.
The painter is not to take so much pains about the drapery as about the face, where the principle resemblance lies. Dryd. Pref. to Dufresnoy.
They are most frequently used as words equivalent, and do both of them indifferently signify either a speculative knowledge of things, or a practical skill about them, according to the exigency of the matter or thing spoken of. Tillot. Sermon i.
Theft is always a sin, although the particular species of it, and the denomination of particular acts, doth suppose positive laws about dominion and property. Stillingfleet's Defence of Discourses on Romish Idolatry.
They should always be heard, and fairly and kindly answered, when they ask after any thing they would know, and desire to be informed about.  Curiosity should be as carefully cherished in children, as other appetites suppressed. Locke on Education, § 108.
It hath been practised as a method of making men's court, when they are asked about the rate of lands, the abilities of tenants, the state of trade and manufacture, to answer, that, in their neighbourhood, all things are in a flourishing condition. Swift's short View of Ireland.
 Engaged in, employed upon.
Our blessed Lord was pleased to command the representation of his death and sacrifice on the cross, should be made by braking of bread and effusion of wine; to signify to us the nature and sacredness of the liturgy we are about. Taylor's Worthy Communicant.
Labour, for labour's sake, is against nature.  The understanding, as well as all the other faculties, chooses always the shortest way to its end, would presently obtain the knowledge it is about, and then set upon some new enquiry. But this, whether laziness or haste, often misleads it. Locke.
They ought, however, to be provided with secretaries, and assisted by our foreign ministries, to tell their story for them in plain English, and to let us know, in our mother-tongue, what it is our brave countrymen are about. Addison. Spect. № 309.
 Appendant to the person; as, cloaths, &c.
        If you have this about you,As I will give you when we go, you mayBoldly assault the necromancer's hall. Milton's Comus.
It is not strange to me, that persons of the fairer sex should like, in all things about them, that handsomeness for which they find themselves most liked. Boyle on Colours.
 Relating to the person, as a servant.
Liking very well the young gentleman, such I took him to be, admitted this Deiphantus about me, who well shewed, there is no service like his that serves because he loves. Sidney, b. ii
Good master, corporal, captain, for my old dame's sake, stand my friend: she hath no body to do anything about her when I am gone, and she is old and cannot help herself. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.

Above (adverb)
Abo've. adv.

 Over-head.
To men standing below, men standing aloft seem much lessened; to those above, men standing below, seem not so much lessened. Bacon.
When he established the clouds above; when he strengthened the fountains of the deep; when he gave to the sea his decree, that the waters should not pass his commandment: when he appointed the foundations of the earth: then I was by him, as one brought up with him: and I was daily his delight, rejoicing always before him. Proverbs, viii. 28.
 In the regions of heaven.
You praise the birds shall chant in every grove,And winds shall waft it to the pow'rs above. Pope's Pastorals.
 Before. [See Above-cited.]
I said above, that these two machines of the balance, and the dira, were only ornamental, and that the success of the duel had been the same without them. Dryd. Dedicat. Æneid.

Above (preposition)
Abo've. prep. [from a, and buꞅan, Saxon; boven, Dutch.]

 Higher in place.
So when with crackling flames a cauldron fries,The bubbling waters from the bottom rise;Above the brims they force their firy way;Black vapours climb aloft, and cloud the day. Dryden, Æneid vii. l. 643.
 More in quantity or number.
Every one that passeth among them, that are numbered from twenty years old and above, shall give an offering unto the Lord. Exodus, xxx. 14.
 Higher in rank, power or excellence.
The Lord is high above all nations, and his glory above the heavens. Psalm cxiii. 4.
The public power of all societies is above every soul contained in the same societies. Hooker, b. i.
There is no riches above a sound body, and no joy above the joy of the heart. Ecclesiasticus, xxx. 16.
              To herThou didst resign thy manhood, and the placeWherein God set thee above her, made of thee,And for thee: whose perfection far excell'dHer's , in all real dignity. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x. l. 147.
Latona sees her shine above the rest,And feeds with secret joy her silent breast. Dryden's Æneid.
 Superiour to; attainable by.
It is an old and true distinction, that things may be above our reason, without being contrary to it. Of this kind are the power, the nature, and the universal presence of God, with innumerable other points. Swift.
 Beyond; more than.
We were pressed out of measure, above strength; insomuch that we despaired even of life. 2 Cor. i. 8.
In this, of having thoughts unconfused, and being able, nicely to distinguish one thing from another, where there is but the least difference, consists, in a great measure, the exactness of judgment and clearness of reason, which is to be observed in one man above another. Locke.
The inhabitants of Tirol have many particular privileges above those of the other hereditary countries of the emperour. Addison on Italy.
 Too proud for; too high for. A phrase chiefly used in familiar expression.
Kings and princes, in the earlier ages of the world, laboured in arts and occupations, and were above nothing that tended to promote the conveniences of life. Pope's Odyssey; notes.

Above All
Above all. In the first place; chiefly.
I had also studied Virgil's design, his disposition of it, his manners, his judicious management of the figures, the sober retrenchments of his sense, which always leaves somewhat to gratify our imagination, on which it may enlarge at pleasure; but above all, the elegance of his expression, and the harmony of his numbers. Dryden's Dedication to the Æneid.

Above-board
Above-board. In open fight; without artifice or trick.  A figurative expression, borrowed from gamesters, who, when they put their hands under the table, are changing their cards.  It is used only in familiar language.
It is the part also of an honest man to deal above-board, and without tricks. L'Estrange.
Though there have not been wanting such heretofore, as have practised these unworthy arts (for as much as there have been villains in all places, and all ages) yet now-a-days they are owned above board. South's Sermons.

Above-cited
Above-cited. Cited above. A figurative expression, taken from the ancient manner of writing books on scrolls; as whatever is cited or mentioned before in the same page, must be above.
Nor would I mention this particular, did it not appear from the authority above-cited, that this was a fact confessed by heathens themselves. Addison on the Christian Religion.

Above-ground
Above-ground. An expression used to signify, that a man is alive; not in the grave.

Above-mentioned
Above-mentioned. See Above-cited.
I do not remember, that Homer any-where falls into the faults above-mentioned, which were indeed the false refinements of latter ages. Addison. Spectator, № 279.

Abracadabra
Abracada'bra. A superstitious charm against agues.

Abrade
To Abra'de. v.a. [Lat. abrado.] To rub off; to wear away from other parts; to waste by degrees.
By this means there may be a continued supply of what is successively abraded from them by decursion of waters. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Abraham's Balm
Abraham's Balm. The name of an herb.

Abrasion
Abra'sion. [See Abrade.]

 The act of abrading; a rubbing off.
 [In medicine.] The wearing away of the natural mucus, which covers the membranes, particularly those of the stomach and guts, by corrosive or sharp medicines, or humours. Quincy.

 The matter worn off by the attrition of bodies.

Abreast
Abre'ast. adv. [See Breast.] Side by side; in such a position that the breasts may bear against the same line.
          My cousin Suffolk,My soul shall thine keep company to heav'n;Tarry, sweet soul, for mine, then fly abreast. Shak. Henry V.
For honour travels in a streight so narrow,Where one but goes abreast. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
The riders rode abreast, and one his shield;His lance of cornel-wood another held;The third his bow, and, glorious to behold!The costly quiver, all of burnish'd gold. Dryden's Fables

Abricot
Abri'cot. See Apricot.

Abridge
To Abri'dge. v.a. [abreger, Fr. abbrevio, Lat.]

 To make shorter in words, keeping still the same substance.
All these sayings, being declared by Jason of Cyrene in five books, we will essay to abridge in one volume. 2 Macc. ii. 23.
 To contract, to diminish, to cut short.
The determination of the will, upon enquiry, is following the direction of that guide; and he, that has a power to act or not to act, according as such determination directs, is free. Such determination abridges not that power wherein liberty consists. Locke.
 To deprive of; in which sense it is followed by the particle from, or of, preceding the thing taken away.
    I have disabled mine estate,By shewing something a more swelling port,Than my faint means would grant continuance;Nor do I now make moan to be abridg'dFrom such a noble rate. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
They were formerly, by the common law, discharged from pontage and murage; but this privilege has been abridged them since by several statutes. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Abridged Of
Abri'dged of. part. Deprived of, debarred from, cut short.

Abridger
An Abri'dger.

 He that abridges; a shortener.
 A writer of compendiums or abridgements.

Abridgment
Abri'dgment. n.s. [abregement, French.]

 The contraction of a larger work into a small compass.
Surely this commandment containeth the law and the prophets; and, in this one word, is the abridgment of all volumes of scripture. Hooker, b. ii. § 5.
        Myself have play'dThe int'rim, by remembering you 'tis past;Then brook abridgment, and your eyes advanceAfter your thoughts, straight back again to France? Shakespeare's Henry V.
Idolatry is certainly the first-born of folly, the great and leading paradox; nay, the very abridgment and sum total of all absurdities. South's Sermons.
 A diminution in general.
All trying, by a love of littleness,To make abridgments, and to draw to less,Even that nothing, which at first we were. Donne.
 Restraint, or abridgment of liberty.
The constant desire of happiness, and the constraint it puts upon us, no body, I think, accounts an abridgment of liberty, or at least an abridgment of liberty, to be complained of. Locke

Abroach
Abro'ach. adv. [See To BROACH.]

 In a posture to run out; to yield the liquor contained; properly spoken of vessels.
The Templer spruce, while ev'ry spout's abroach,Stays 'till 'tis fair, yet seems to call a coach. Swift's Miscel.
The jarrs of gen'rous wine, (Acestes' gift,When his Trinacrian shores the navy left)He set abroach, and for the feast prepar'd,In equal portions with the ven'son shar'd. Dryden's Virgil's Æneid, vol. ii
 In a figurative sense; in a state to be diffused or advanced; in a state of such beginning as promises a progress.
That man, that sits within a monarch's heart,And ripens in the sunshine of his favour,Would he abuse the count'nance of the king,Alack! what mischiefs might be set abroach,In shadow of such greatness? Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.

Abroad
Abro'ad. adv. [compounded of a and broad. See Broad.]

 Without confinement; widely; at large.
            Intermit no watchAgainst a wakeful foe, while I abroad,Thro' all the coasts of dark destruction seekDeliverance. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 463.
Again, the lonely fox roams far abroad,On secret rapine bent, and midnight fraud;Now haunts the cliff, now traverses the lawn,And flies the hated neighbourhood of man. Prior.
 Out of the house.
            Welcome, Sir,This cell's my court; here have I few attendants,And subjects none abroad. Shakespeare's Tempest.
Lady — — walked a whole hour abroad, without dying after it; at least in the time I staid; though she seemed to be fainting, and had convulsive motions several times in her head. Pope's Letters.
 In another country.
They thought it better to be somewhat hardly yoked at home, than for ever abroad, and discredited. Hooker, Pref.
Whosoever offers at verbal translation, shall have the misfortune of that young traveller, who lost his own language abroad, and brought home no other instead of it. Sir J. Denham.
What learn our youth abroad, but to refineThe homely vices of their native land? Dryd. Span. Friar.
He who sojourns in a foreign country, refers what he sees and hears abroad, to the state of things at home. Atterb. Serm.
 In all directions, this way and that.
Full in the midst of this infernal road,An elm displays her dusky arms abroad. Dryd. Virg. Æn. vi.
 Without, not within.
Bodies politic, being subject, as much as natural, to dissolution, by divers means, there are undoubtedly more states overthrown through diseases bred within themselves, than through violence from abroad. Hooker, Dedication.

Abrogate
To A'brogate. v.a. [abrogo, Lat.] To take away from a law its force; to repeal, to annul.
Such laws, as have been made upon special occasions, which occasions ceasing, laws of that kind do abrogate themselves. Hooker, b. iv. § 14.
The negative precepts of men may cease by many instruments, by contrary customs, by public disrelish, by long omission: but the negative precepts of God never can cease, but when they are expresly abrogated by the same authority. Taylor's Rule of living holy.

Abrogation
Abroga'tion. n.s. [abrogatio, Lat.] The act of abrogating; the repeal of a law.
The commissioners from the confederate Roman catholics, demanded the abrogation and repeal of all those laws, which were in force against the exercise of the Roman religion. Clarendon, b. viii.

Abrook
To Abro'ok. v.a. [from To brook, with a superabundant, a word not in use.] To brook, to bear, to endure.
Sweet Nell, ill can thy noble mind abrookThe abject people gazing on thy faceWith envious looks, still laughing at thy shame. Shakespeare's Henry VI. p. ii.

Abrupt
Abru'pt. adj. [abruptus, Lat.] Broken off.

 Broken, craggy.
Resistless, roaring, dreadful, down it comesFrom the rude mountain, and the mossy wild,Tumbling through rocks abrupt. Thomson's Winter.
 Divided, without any thing intervening.
          Or spread his airy flight,Upborn with indefatigable wings,Over the vast abrupt, ere he arriveThe happy isle. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 409.
 Sudden, without the customary or proper preparatives.
          My lady cravesTo know the cause of your abrupt departure. Shakespeare's Henry VI.
The abrupt and unkind breaking off the two first parliaments, was wholly imputed to the duke of Buckingham. Clar.
Abrupt, with eagle-speed she cut the sky;Instant invisible to mortal eye.Then first he recogniz'd th' ethereal guest. Pope's Odyss. b. i.
 Unconnected.
The abrupt stile, which hath many breaches, and doth not seem to end but fall. Ben. Johnson's Discovery.

Abrupted
Abru'pted. adj. [abruptus, Lat. a word little in use.] Broken off suddenly.
The effects of whose activity are not precipitously abrupted, but gradually proceed to their cessations. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. 10.

Abruption
Abru'ption. n.s. [abruptio, Lat.] Breaking off, violent and sudden separation.
Those which are inclosed in stone, marble, or such other solid matter, being difficulty separable from it, because of its adhesion to all sides of them, have commonly some of that matter still adhering to them, or at least marks of its abruption from them, on all their sides. Woodward's Nat. Hist. p. 4.

Abruptly
Abru'ptly. adv. [See  Abrupt.] Hastily, without the due forms of preparation.
The sweetness of virtue's disposition, jealous even over itself, suffered her not to enter abruptly into questions of Musidorus. Sidney, b. ii
Now missing from their joy so lately found,So lately found, and so abruptly gone. Par. Regain. b. ii
They both of them punctually observed the time thus agreed upon, and that in whatever company or business they were engaged, they left it abruptly, as soon as the clock warned them to retire. Addison. Spectator, № 241.

Abruptness
Abru'ptness. n.s. [from abrupt.]

 An abrupt manner, haste, suddenness, untimely vehemence.
 The state of an abrupt thing; unconnectedness, roughness, cragginess.
The crystallized bodies found in the perpendicular intervals, are easily known from those that are lodged in the strata.  The former have always their root, as the jewellers call it, which is only the abruptness, at the end of the body whereby it adhered to the stone, or sides of the intervals; which abruptness is caused by its being broke off from the said stone. Woodward's Natural History, p. 4.

Abscess
A'bscess. [abscessus, Lat.] A morbid cavity in the body; a tumour filled with matter; a term of chirurgery.
If the patient is not relieved, nor dies in eight days, the inflammation ends in a suppuration and an abscess in the lungs, and sometimes in some other part of the body. Arbuth. of Diet.
Lindanus conjectured it might be some hidden abscess in the mesentery, which, breaking some few days after, was discovered to be an apostem of the mesentery. Harvey on Consumptions.

Abscind
To Absci'nd. v.a. To cut off, either in a natural or figurative sense.

Abscissa
Absci'ssa. [Lat.] Part of the diameter of a conic section, intercepted between the vertex and a semi-ordinate.

Abscission
Absci'ssion. n.s. [abscissio, Lat.]

 The act of cutting off.
Fabricius ab Aquapendente renders the abscission of them difficult enough, and not without danger. Wiseman's Surgery.
 The state of being cut off.
By cessation of oracles, with Montacutius, we may understand this intercision, not abscission, or consummate desolation. Brown's Vulgar Errors, b. vi. c. 12.

Abscond
To Absco'nd. v.n. [abscondo, Lat.] To hide one's self; to retire from the public view: generally used of persons in debt, or criminals eluding the law.

Absconder
Absco'nder. n.s. [from abscond.] The person that absconds.

Absence
A'bsence. n.s. [See Absent.]

 The state of being absent, opposed to presence.
                Sir, 'tis fitYou have strong party to defend yourselfBy calmness, or by absence: all's in danger. Shakesp. Coriol.
His friends beheld, and pity'd him in vain,For what advice can ease a lover's pain?Absence, the best expedient they could find,Might save the fortune, if not cure the mind. Dryd. Fab.
 Want of appearance, in the legal sense.
Absence is of a fourfold kind of species.  The first is a necessary absence, as in banished persons; this is entirely necessary.  A second, necessary and voluntary; as, upon the account of the commonwealth, or in the service of the church.  The third kind the civilians call a probable absence; as, that of students on the score of study.  And the forth, an absence entirely voluntary; as, on the account of trade, merchandise, and the like.  Some add a fifth kind of absence, which is committed cum dolo & culpā, by a man's non-appearance on a citation; as, in a contumacious person, who, in hatred to his contumacy, is, by the law, in some respects, reputed as a person present. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.
You have given no dissertation upon the absence of lovers, nor laid down any methods how they should support themselves under those separations. Addison. Spectator, № 241.
 Inattention, heedlessness, neglect of the present object.
I continued my walk, reflecting on the little absences and distractions of mankind. Addison. Spectator, № 77.
 It is used with the particle from.
His absence from his mother oft he'll mourn,And, with his eyes, look wishes to return. Dryd. Juv. Sat. ii.

Absent (adjective)
A'bsent. adj. [absens, Lat.]

 Not present; used with the particle from.
In spring the fields, in autumn hills I love;At morn the plains, at noon the shady grove;But Delia always; absent from her fight,Nor plains at morn, nor groves at noon delight. Pope's Past.
Where there is advantage to be given,Both more and less have given him the revolt;And none serve with him but constrained things,Whole hearts are absent too. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Whether they were absent or present, they were vexed alike. Wisd. xi. 11.
 Absent in mind, inattentive; regardless of the present object.
I distinguish a man that is absent, because he thinks of something else, from him that is absent, because he thinks of nothing. Addison, Spectator, № 77.

Absent (verb)
To Abse'nt. v.a. To withdraw, to forbear to come into presence.
If thou didst ever hold me in thy heart,Absent thee from felicity a while,And in this harsh world draw thy breath in pain,To tell my tale. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
But if thou think'st trial unsought may findUs both securer, than thus warn'd though seem'st,Go — for thy stay, not free, absents thee more. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix. l. 372
Tho' I am forc'd, thus to absent myselfFrom all I love, I shall contrive some means,Some friendly intervals, to visit thee. Southern's Spartan Dame.
The Arengo, however, is still called together in cases of extraordinary importance; and if, after due summons, any member absents himself, he is to be fined to the value of about a penny English. Addison's Remarks on Italy.

Absentaneous
Absenta'neous. adj. Relating to absence; absent. Dict.

Absentee
Absente'e. n.s. He that is absent from his station or employment, or country.  A word used commonly with regard to Irishmen living out of their country.
Then was the first statute made against absentees, commanding all such as had land in Ireland, to return and reside thereupon. Sir John Davies on Ireland.
A great part of estates in Ireland are owned by absentees, and such as draw over the profits raised out of Ireland, refunding nothing. Child's Discourse on Trade.

Absinthiated
Absi'nthiated. part. [from absinthium, Lat. wormwood.] Imbittered, impregnated with wormwood. Dict.

Absis
A'bsis. See APSIS.

Absist
To Absi'st. v.n. [absisio, Lat.] To stand off, to leave off. Dict.

Absolute
A'bsolute. adj. [absolutus, Lat.]

 Complete; applied as well to persons as things.
Because the things that proceed from him are perfect, without any manner of defect or maim; it cannot be, but that the words of his mouth are absolute, and lack nothing which they should have, for performance of that thing whereunto they tend. Hooker, b. ii. § 6.
 Unconditional; as, an absolute promise.
Although it runs in forms absolute, yet it is indeed conditional, as depending upon the qualification of the person to whom it is pronounced. South's Sermons
 Not relative; as, absolute space.
I see still the distinctions of sovereign and inferior, of absolute and relative worship, will bear any man out in the worship of any creature with respect to God, as well at least as it doth in the worship of images. Stillingfl. Def. of Disc. on Rom. Idol.
An absolute mode is that which belongs to its subject, without respect to any other beings whatsoever: but a relative mode is derived from the regard that one being has to others. Watt's Logic.
In this sense we speak of the ablative case absolute in grammar.
 Not limited; as, absolute power.
My crown is absolute, and holds of none;I cannot in a base subjection live,Nor suffer you to take, though I would give. Dryd. Ind. Emp.
 Positive, certain, without any hesitation.  In this sense it rarely occurs.
            Long is it since I saw him,But time hath nothing blurr'd those lines of favour,Which then he wore; the snatches in his voice,And burst of speaking were as his: I'm absolute,'Twas very Cloten. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
What is his strength by land? —— Great and increasing: but by seaHe is an absolute master. Shakespeare's Antony and Cleopatra.

Absolutely
A'bsolutely. adv. [from absolute.]

 Completely, without restriction.
All the contradictions which grow in those minds, that neither absolutely climb the rock of virtue, no freely sink into the sea of vanity. Sidney.
What merit they can build upon having joined with a protestant army, under a king they acknowledged, to defend their own liberties and properties, is, to me, absolutely inconceivable; and, I believe, will equally be so for ever. Swift's Presb. Plan.
 Without relation.
Absolutely we cannot discommend, we cannot absolutely approve either willingness to live, or forwardness to die. Hooker, b. v.
These then being the perpetual causes of zeal; the greatest good, or the greatest evil; either absolutely so in themselves, or relatively so to us; it is therefore good to be zealously affected for the one against the other. Sprat's Sermons.
No sensible quality, as light, and colour, and heat, and sound, can be subsistent in the bodies themselves, absolutely considered, without a relation to our eyes and ears, and other organs of sense.  These qualities are only the effects of our sensation, which arise from the different motions, upon our nerves, from objects without, according to their various modifications and positions. Bentley's Sermons.
 Without limits or dependance.
The prince long time had courted fortune's love,But, once possess'd, did absolutely reign:Thus, with their Amazons, the heroes strove,And conquer'd first those beauties they would gain. Dryden's Annus Mirabilis
 Without condition.
And of that nature, for the most part, are things absolutely unto all mens salvation necessary, either to be held or denied, either to be done or avoided. Hooker's Preface.
 Peremptorily, positively.
Being as I am, why didst not thouCommand me absolutely not to go,Going into such danger, as thou saidst? Parad. Lost, b. ix.

Absoluteness
A'bsoluteness. n.s. [from absolute.]

 Compleatness.
 Freedom from dependance, or limits.
The absoluteness and illimitedness of his commission was generally much spoken of. Clarendon, b. viii.
There is nothing that can raise a man to that generous absoluteness of condition, as neither to cringe, to fawn, or to depend meanly; but that which gives him that happiness within himself, for which men depend upon others. South's Serm.
Despoticism.
He kept a strait hand on his nobility, and chose rather to advance clergymen and lawyers, which were more obsequious to him, but had less interest in the people; which made for his absoluteness, but not for his safety. Bacon's Henry VII.

Absolution
Absolu'tion. n.s. [absolutio, Lat.]

 Acquittal.
Absolution, in the civil law, imports a full acquittal of a person by some final sentence of law; also, a temporary discharge of his farther attendance upon a mesne process, through a failure or defect in pleading; as it does likewise in the canon law, where, and among divines, it likewise signifies a relaxation of him from the obligation of some sentence pronounced either in a court of law, or else in foro pænitentiali.  Thus there is, in this kind of law, one kind of absolution, termed judicial, and another, stiled a declaratory or extrajudicial absolution. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.
 The remission of sins, or penance, declared by ecclesiastical authority.
The absolution pronounced by a priest, whether papist or protestant, is not a certain infallible ground to give the person, so absolved, confidence towards God. South's Sermons.

Absolutory
A'bsolutory. adj. [absolutorius, Lat.] That which absolves.
Though an absolutory sentence should be pronounced in favour of the persons, upon the account of nearness of blood; yet, if adultery shall afterwards be truly proved, he may be again proceeded against as an adulterer. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Absolve
To Abso'lve. v.a. [absolvo, Lat.]

 To clear, to acquit of a crime in a judicial sense.
        Your great goodness, out of holy pity,Absolv'd him with an axe. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
Our visitors, blest in peace, forget their wars,Enjoy past dangers, and absolve the stars. Tickell.
As he hopes, and gives out, by the influence of his wealth, to be here absolved; in condemning this man, you have an opportunity of belying that general scandal, of redeeming the credit lost by former judgments. Swift's Miscellanies.
 To set free from an engagement or promise.
Compell'd by threats to take that bloody oath,And the act ill, I am absolv'd by both. Waller's Maid's Trag.
This command, which must necessarily comprehend the persons of our natural fathers, must mean a duty we owe them, distinct from our obedience to the magistrate, and from which the most absolute power of princes cannot absolve us. Locke.
 To pronounce a sin remitted, in the ecclesiastical sense.
But all is calm in this eternal sleep;Here grief forgets to groan, and love to weep;Ev'n superstition loses ev'ry fear;For God, not man, absolves our frailties here. Pope's Eloisa to Abelard.
 To finish, to complete.
If that which is so supposed infinitely distinct from what is now current, is distinct from us by a finite interval, and not infinitely, then that one circulation which preceded it, and must necessarily be like ours, and consequently absolved in the space of twenty-four hours. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
                What causeMov'd the creator, in his holy restThrough all eternity, so late to buildIn chaos; and the work begun, how soonAbsolv'd. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vii. l. 94.

Absonant
A'bsonant. adj. [See Absonous.] Contrary to reason, wide from the purpose.

Absonous
A'bsonous. adj. [absonus, Lat. ill-sounding.] Absurd, contrary to reason.
To suppose an uniter of a middle constitution, that should partake of some of the qualities of both, is unwarranted by any of our faculties; yea, most absonous to our reason. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica, c. 4.

Absorb
To Abso'rb. v.a. [absorbeo, Lat. preter, absorbed; part. pret. absorbed, or absorbt.]

 To swallow up.
                Some tokens shewOf fearless friendship, and their sinking matesSustain; vain love, tho' laudable, absorptBy a fierce eddy, they together foundThe vast profundity. Phillips.
Moses imputed the deluge to the disruption of the abyss; and St. Peter, to the particular constitution of that earth, which made it obnoxious to be absorpt in water. Burn. Theory.
 To suck up. See Absorbent.
Supposing the forementioned consumption should prove so durable, as to absorb and extenuate the said sanguine parts to an extreme degree, it is evident, that the fundamental parts must necessarily come into danger. Harvey on Consumptions.

Absorbent
Abso'rbent. n.s. [absorbens, Lat.]
A medicine that, by the softness or porosity of its parts, either causes the asperities of pungent humours, or dries away superfluous moisture in the body. Quincy.
There is a third class of substances, commonly called absorbents; as, the various kinds of shells, coral, chalk, crab eyes, &c. which likewise raise an effervescence, and are therefore called alkalis, though not so properly, for they are not salts. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Absorpt
Abso'rpt. part. [from absorb.] Swallowed up; used as well, in a figurative sense, of persons, as, in the primitive, of things.
What can you expect from a man, who has not talked these five days? who is withdrawing his thoughts, as far as he can, from all the present world, its customs and its manners, to be fully possessed and absorpt in the past. Pope's Letters

Absorption
Abso'rption. n.s. [from absorb.] The act of swallowing up.
It was below the dignity of those sacred penmen, or the spirit of God that directed them, to shew us the causes of this disruption, or of this absorption; this is left to the enquiries of men. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.

Abstain
To Absta'in. v.n. [abstineo, Lat.] To forbear, to deny one's self any gratification; with the particle from.
If thou judge it hard and difficult,Conversing, looking, loving, to abstainFrom love's due rites, nuptial embraces sweet;And, with desires, to languish without hope. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x. l. 993.
To be perpetually longing, and impatiently desirous of any thing, so that a man cannot abstain from it, is to lose a man's liberty, and to become a servant of meat and drink, or smoke. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
Even then the doubtful billows scarce abstainFrom the toss'd vessel on the troubled main. Dryden's Virgil.

Abstemious
Abste'mious. adj. [abstemius, Lat.] Temperate, sober, abstinent, refraining from excess or pleasures. It is used of persons; as, an abstemious hermit: and of things; as, an abstemious diet. It is spoken likewise of things that cause temperance.
The instances of longevity are chiefly amongst the abstemious.  Abstinence in extremity will prove a mortal disease; but the experiments of it are very rare. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
Clytorean streams the love of wine expel,(Such is the virtue of the abstemious well)Whether the colder nymph that rules the flood,Extinguishes, and balks the drunken god:Or that Melampus (so have some assur'd)When the mad Prætides with charms he cur'd,And pow'rful herbs, both charms and simples castInto the sober spring, where still their virtues last. Dryd. Fab.

Abstemiously
Abste'miously. adv. [from abstemious.] Temperately, soberly, without indulgence.

Abstemiousness
Abste'miousness. n.s. [See Abstemious.] The quality of being abstemious.

Abstention
Abste'ntion. n.s. [from abstineo, Lat.] The act of holding off, or restraining; restraint. Dict.

Absterge
To Abste'rge. v.a. [abstergo, Lat.] To cleanse by wiping; to wipe.

Abstergent
A'bstergent. adj. Cleansing; having a cleansing quality.

Absterse
To Abste'rse. [See ABSTERGE.] To cleanse, to purify; a word very little in use, and less analogical than absterge.
Nor will we affirm, that iron receiveth, in the stomach of the ostrich, no alteration; but we suspect this effect rather from corrosion than digestion; not any tendence to chilification by the natural heat, but rather some attrition from an acid and vitriolous humidity in the stomach, which may absterse and shave the scorious parts thereof. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii.

Abstersion
Abste'rsion n.s. [abstersio, Lat.] The act of cleansing. See Absterge.
The seventh cause is abstersion; which is plainly a scouring off, or incision of the more viscous humours, and making the humours more fluid, and cutting between them and the part; as is found in nitrous water, which scoureth linen cloth speedily from the foulness. Bacon's Natural History, № 42.

Abstersive
Abste'rsive. adj. [from absterge.] That has the quality of absterging or cleansing.
It is good, after purging, to use apozemes and broths, not so much opening as those used before purging; but abstersive and mundifying clysters also are good to conclude with, to draw away the reliques of the humours. Bacon's Nat. History.
A tablet stood of that abstersive tree,Where Æthiops' swarthy bird did build to nest. Sir J. Denh.
There, many a flow'r abstersive grew,Thy fav'rite flow'rs of yellow hue. Swift's Miscellanies.

Abstinence
A'bstinence. n.s. [abstinentia, Lat.]

 Forbearance of any thing; with the particle from.
Because the abstinence from a present pleasure, that offers itself, is a pain, nay, oftentimes a very great one: it is no wonder that that operates after the same manner pain does, and lessens, in our thoughts, what is future; and so forces us, as it were, blindfold into its embraces. Locke.
 Fasting, or forbearance of necessary food. It is generally distinguished from temperance, as the greater degree from the less; sometimes as single performances from habits; as, a day of abstinence, and a life of temperance.
Say, can you fast? your stomachs are too young:And abstinence ingenders maladies. Shakesp. Love's Lab. Lost.
Religious men, who hither must be sentAs awful guides of heavenly government;To teach you penance, fasts, and abstinence,To punish bodies for the souls offence. Dyrden's Ind. Emp.
And the  faces of them, which have used abstinence, shall shine above the stars; whereas our faces shall be blacker than darkness. 2 Esdras, vii. 55.

Abstinency
A'bstinency. n.s. The same with Abstinence.
Were our rewards for the abstinencies, or riots, of this present life, under the prejudices of short or finite, the promises and threats of Christ would lose much of their virtue and energy. Hammond's Fundam.

Abstinent
A'bstinent. adj. [abstinens, Lat.] That uses abstinence, in opposition to covetous, rapacious, or luxurious. It is used chiefly of persons.

Abstorted
Absto'rted. adj. [abstortus, Lat.] Forced away, wrung from another by violence. Dict.

Abstract (adjective)
A'bstract. adj. [abstractus, Lat. See the verb To ABSTRACT.]

 Separated from something else, generally used with relation to mental perceptions; as, abstract mathematics, abstract terms, in opposition to concrete.
Mathematics, in its latitude, is usually divided into pure and mixed. And though the pure do handle only abstract quantity in general, as geometry, arithmetic; yet that which is mixed, doth consider the quantity of some particular determinate subject. So astronomy handles the quantity of heavenly motions, music of sounds, and mechanics of weights and powers. Wilkin's Mathematical Magick.
Abstract terms signify the mode or quality of a being, without any regard to the subject in which it is; as, whiteness, roundness, length, breadth, wisdom, mortality, life, death. Watt's Logick.
 With the particle from.
Another fruit from the considering things in themselves, abstract from our opinions and other mens notions and discourses on them, will be, that each man will pursue his thoughts in that method, which will be most agreeable to the nature of the thing, and to his apprehension of what it suggests to him. Locke.

Abstract (noun)
A'bstract. n.s. [from the verb]

 A smaller quantity, containing the virtue or power of a greater.
You shall there find a man, who is the abstractOf all faults all men follow. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.
If you are false, these epithets are small;You're then the things, and abstract of them all. Dryd. Aar.
 An epitome made by taking out the principal parts.
When Mnemon came to the end of a chapter, he recollected the sentiments he had remarked; so that he could give a tolerable analysis and abstract of every treatise he had read, just after he had finished it. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.
 The state of being abstracted.
The hearts of great princes, if they be considered, as it were in abstract, without the necessity of states, and circumstances of time, can take no full and proportional pleasure in the exercise of any narrow bounty. Wotton.

Abstract (verb)
To Abstra'ct. v.a. [abstraho, Lat.]

 To take one thing from another.
Could we abstract from these pernicious effects, and suppose this were innocent, it would be too light to be a matter of praise. Decay of Piety.
 To separate ideas.
Those, who cannot distinguish, compare and abstract, would hardly be able to understand and make use of language, or judge or reason to any tolerable degree. Locke.
 To reduce to an epitome.
If we would fix in the memory the discourses we hear, or what we design to speak, let us abstract them into brief compends, and review them often. Watt's Improv. of the Mind.

Abstracted
A'bstracted. part. adj. [from abstract.]

 Separated.
That space the evil one abstracted stoodFrom his own evil, and for the time remain'dSupidly good. Milton.
 Refined, abstruse.
Abstrated spiritual love, they likeTheir souls, exhal'd. Donne.
 Absent of mind, inattentive to present objects; as, an abstracted scholar.

Abstractedly
Abstra'ctedly. adv. With abstraction, simply, separately from all contingent circumstances.
Or whether more abstractedly we look,Or on the writers, or the written book:Whence, but from heav'n, could men unskill'd in arts.In several ages born, in several parts,Weave such agreeing truths? or how, or whyShould all conspire to cheat us with a lie?Unask'd their pains, ungrateful their advice,Starving their gain, and martyrdom their price. Dryden's Religio Laici.

Abstraction
Abstra'ction. n.s. [abstractio, Lat.]

 The act of abstracting.
The word abstraction signifies a withdrawing some part of an idea from other parts of it; by which means, such abstracted ideas are formed, as neither represent any thing corporeal or spiritual; that is, any thing peculiar or proper to mind or body. Watt's Logick.
 The state of being abstracted.

 Absence of mind, inattention.

 Disregard of worldly objects.

Abstractive
Abstra'ctive. adj. [from abstract.] Having the power or quality of abstracting.

Abstractly
Abstra'ctly. adv. [from abstract.] In an abstract manner, absolutely, without reference to any thing else.
Matter abstractly and absolutely considered, cannot have born an infinite duration now past and expired. Bentley's Sermons.

Abstricted
Abstri'cted. part. adj. [abstrictus, Lat.] Unbound. Dict.

Abstringe
To Abstri'nge. v.a. [abstringo, Lat.] To unbind. Dict.

Abstrude
To Abstru'de. v.a. [abstrudo, Lat.] To thrust off, or pull away. Dict.

Abstruse
Abstru'se. adj. [abstrusus, Lat. thrust out of sight.]

 Hidden.
          Th' eternal eye, whose sight discernsAbstrusest thoughts, from forth his holy mount,And from within the golden lamps that burnNightly before him, saw, without their light,Rebellion rising. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. v. l. 712.
 Difficult, remote from conception or apprehension. It is opposed to obvious and easy.
So spake our Sire, and, by his count'nance, seem'dEntr'ring on studious thoughts abstruse. Parad. Lost, b. viii.
The motions and figures withing the mouth are abstruse, and not easy to be distinguished, especially those of the tongue, which is moved through the help of many muscles, so easily, and habitually, and variously, that we are scarce able to give a judgment of motions and figures thereby framed. Holder's Elements of Speech.
No man could give a rule of the greatest beauties, and the knowledge of them was so abstruse, that there was no manner of speaking which could express them. Dryd. Dufresnoy.

Abstrusely
Abstru'sely. adv. In an abstruse manner; obscurely, not plainly, or obviously.

Abstruseness
Abstru'seness. n.s. [from abstruse.] The quality of being abstruse; difficulty, obscurity.
It is not oftentimes so much what the scripture says, as what some men persuade others it says, that makes it seem obscure, and that as to some other passages that are so indeed, since it is the abstruseness of what is taught in them, that makes them almost inevitably so; it is little less saucy, upon such a score, to find fault with the style of the scripture, than to do so with the author for making us but men. Boyle on the Scripture.

Abstrusity
Abstru'sity. n.s. [from abstruse.]

 Abstruseness.

That which is abstruse. A word seldom used.
Authors are also suspicious, nor greedily to be swallowed, who pretend to write of secrets, to deliver antipathies, sympathies, and the occult abstruseness of things. Brown's Vul. Err.

Absume
To Absu'me. v.a. [absumo, Lat.] To bring an end by a gradual waste; to eat up.
That which had been burning an infinite time could never be burnt, no not so much as any part of it; for if it had burned part after part, the whole must needs be absumed in a portion of time. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Absurd
Absu'rd. adj. [absurdus, Lat.]

 Unreasonable, without judgment, as used of men.
Seeming wise men may make shift to get opinion; but let no man choose them for employment; for certainly you had better take for business a man somewhat absurd, than over formal. Bacon's Essay, 27.
 Inconsistent, contrary to reason, used of sentiments or practices.
The thing itself appeared desirable to him, and accordingly he could not but like and desire it; but then, it was after a very irrational absurd way, and contrary to all the methods and principles of a rational agent; which never wills a thing really and properly, but it applies to the means, by which it is to be acquired. South's Sermons.
A man, who cannot write with wit on a proper subject, is dull and stupid; but one, who shews it in an improper place, is as impertinent and absurd. Addison. Spectator, № 291.
But grant that those can conquer, those can cheat,'Tis phrase absurd to call a villain great:Who wickedly is wise, or madly brave,Is but the more a fool, the more a knave. Pope's Essay on Man.

Absurdity
Absu'rdity. n.s. [from absurd.]

 The quality of being absurd; want of judgment applied to men; want of propriety applied to things.
How clear soever this idea of the infinity of number be, there is nothing more evident than the absurdity of the actual idea of an infinite number. Locke.
 That which is absurd; as, his travels were full of absurdities. In which sense it has a plural.
That satisfaction we receive from the opinion of some preeminence in ourselves, when we see the absurdities of another, or when we reflect on any past absurdities of our own. Addison. Spectator, № 249.

Absurdly
Absu'rdly. adv. [from absurd.] After an absurd manner; improperly, unreasonably.
But man we find the only creature,Who, led by folly, combats nature;Who, when she loudly cries, forbear,With obstinacy fixes there;And where his genius least inclines,Absurdly bends his whole designs. Swift's Miscellanies.
We may proceed yet further with the atheist, and convince him, that not only his principle is absurd, but his consequences also as absurdly deduced from it. Bentley's Sermons.

Absurdness
Absu'rdness. n.s. [from absurd.] The quality of being absurd; injudiciousness, impropriety. See Absurdity; which is more frequently used.

Abundance
Abu'ndance. n.s. [abondance, Fr.]

 Plenty; a sense chiefly poetical.
At the whisper of thy word,Crown'd abundance spreads my board. Crashaw.
The doubled charge his subjects love supplies,Who, in that bounty, to themselves are kind;So glad Egyptians see their Nilus rise,And, in his plenty, their abundance find. Dyrd. Ann. Mir.
 Great numbers.
The river Inn, during its course through the Tyrol, is generally shut up between a double range of mountains, that are most of them covered with woods of fir-trees. Abundance of peasants are employed in hewing down of the largest of these trees, that, after they are barked and cut into shape, are tumbled down. Addison on Italy.
 A great quantity.
Their chief enterprize was the recovery of the Holy land; in which worthy, but extremely difficult, action, it is lamentable to remember what abundance of noble blood hath been shed with very small benefit unto the Christian state. Sir Walter Raleigh's Essays.
 Exuberance, more than enough.
For well I wot, most might sovereign,That all this famous antique history,Of some, th' abundance of an idle brainWill judged be, and painted forgery. Spens. Fairy Q. b. ii.

Abundant
Abu'ndant. adj. [abundans, Lat.]

 Plentiful.
          Good the moreCommunicated, more abundant grows;The author not impair'd, but honour'd more. Par. Lost, b. v.
 Exuberant.
If the vessels are in a state of too great rigidity, so as not to yield, a strong projectile motion occasions their rupture, and hæmorrhages; especially in the lungs, where the blood is abundant. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Fully stored. It is followed sometimes by in, commonly by with.
The world began but some ages before these were found out, and was abundant with all things at first; and men not very numerous; and therefore were not put so much to the use of their wits, to find out ways for living commodiously. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
 It is applied generally to things, sometimes to persons.
The Lord, the Lord God, merciful and gracious, long-suffering and abundant in goodness and truth. Exod. xxxiv. 6.

Abundantly
Abu'ndantly. adv. [from abundant.]

 In plenty.
Let the waters bring forth abundantly the moving creature that hath life. Genesis, i. 20.
          God on theeAbundantly his gifts hath also pour'd;Inward and outward both, his image fair. Par. Lost, b. viii.
 Amply, liberally, more than sufficiently.
What the example of our equals wants of authority, is abundantly supplied in the imaginations of friendship, and the repeated influences of a constant conversation. Rogers's Serm.
Heroic poetry has ever been esteemed the greatest work of human nature.  In that rank has Aristotle placed it; and Longinus is so full of the like expressions, that he abundantly confirms the other's testimony. Dryden's State of Innocence, Pref.

Abuse (noun)
Abu'se. n.s. [from the verb abuse.]

 The ill use of any thing.
The casting away things profitable for the sustenance of man's life, is an unthankful abuse of the fruits of God's good providence towards mankind. Hooker, b. v. § 9.
                Little knowsAny, but God alone, to value rightThe good before him, but perverts best thingsTo worst abuse, or to their meanest use. Parad. Lost, b. iv.
 A corrupt practice, bad custom.
The nature of things is such, that, if abuses be not remedied, they will certainly encrease. Swift for Advancem. of Relig.
 Seducement.
Was it not enough for him to have deceived me, and through the deceit abused me, and, after the abuse, forsaken me, but that he must now, of all the company, and before all the company, lay want of beauty to my charge. Sidney, b. ii.
 Unjust censure, rude reproach, contumely.
            I dark in light, expos'dTo daily fraud, contempt, abuse, and wrong. Samps. Agon.

Abuse (verb)
To Abu'se. v.a. [abutor, Lat.]
In abuse the verb, s has the sound of z; in the noun, the common sound.

 To make an ill use of.
They that use this world, as not abusing it; for the fashion of this world passeth away. 1. Cor. vii. 31.
He has fixed and determined the time for our repentance, beyond which he will no longer await the perverseness of men, no longer suffer his compassion to be abused. Roger's Sermons.
 To deceive, to impose upon.
The world hath been much abused by the opinion of making gold: the work itself I judge to be possible; but the means hitherto propounded, are, in the practice, full of error. Bacon's Natural History, № 126.
              He perhaps,Out of my weakness and my melancholy,As he is very potent with such spirits,Abuses me to damn me. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
It imports the misrepresentation of the qualities of things and actions, to the common apprehensions of men, abusing their mind with false notions; and so, by this artifice, making evil pass for good, and good for evil, in all the great concerns of life. South's Sermons.
Nor be with all these tempting words abus'd;These tempting words were all to Sappho us'd. Pope's Sappho to Phaon.
 To treat with rudeness, to reproach.
I am no strumpet, but of life as honestAs you that thus abuse me. Shakespeare's Othello.
But he mocked them, and laughed at them, and abused them shamefully, and spake proudly. 1 Mac. vii. 34.
Some praise at morning what they blame at night,But always think the last opinion right.A muse by these is like a mistress us'd.This hour she's idoliz'd, the next abus'd. Pope's Ess. on Crit.
The next criticism upon the stars seems to be introduced for no other reason, but to mention Mr. Bickerstaff, whom the author every-where endeavours to imitate and abuse. Addison.

Abuser
Abu'ser. n.s. [from the verb abuse.]

 He that makes an ill use.

 He that deceives.
Next thou, th' abuser of thy prince's ear. Denh. Sophy.
 He that reproaches with rudeness.

 A ravisher, a violater.

Abusive
Abu'sive. adj. [from abuse.]

 Practising abuse.
The tongue mov'd gently first, and speech was low,Till wrangling science taught it noise and show,And wicked wit arose, thy most abusive foe. Pope's Miscell.
Dame Nature, as the learned show,Provides each animal its foe;Hounds hunt the hare, the wily foxDevours your geese, the wolf your flocks.Thus envy pleads a natural claim,To persecute the muse's fame,On poets in all times abusive,From Homer down to Pope inclusive. Swift's Miscellanies.
 Containing abuse; as, an abusive lampoon.
Next, Comedy appear'd with great applause,Till her licentious and abusive tongueWaken'd the magistrates coercive pow'r. Roscommon.
 Deceitful; a sense little used, yet not improper.
It is verified by a number of examples, that whatsoever is gained by an abusive treaty, ought to be restored in integrum. Bacon's Considerations on War with Spain.

Abusively
Abu'sively. adv. [from abuse.]

 Improperly, by a wrong use.
The oil, abusively called spirit, of roses swims at the top of the water, in the form of a white butter; which I remember not to have observed in any other oil drawn in any limbeck. Boyle's Sceptical Chymistry.
 Reproachfully.

Abusiveness
Abu'siveness. n.s. [from abuse.] The quality of being abusive; foulness of language.
Pick out of mirth, like stones out of thy ground,Profaneness, filthiness, abusiveness.These are the scum, with which coarse wits abound:The fine may spare these well, yet not go less. Herbert.

Abut
To Abu't. v.n. obsolete. [aboutir, to touch at the end, Fr.] To end at, to border upon; to meet, or approach to, with the particle upon.
                  Two mighty monarchies,Whose high upreared and abutting frontsPerilous the narrow ocean parts asunder. Shakesp. Henry V.
In entering the same, we will first pitch at the Looes, two several corporations, distinguished by the addition of east and west, abutting upon a navigable creek, and joined by a fair bridge of many arches. Carew's Survey of Cornwall.

Abutment
Abu'tment. n.s. [from abut.] That which abuts, or borders upon another.

Abuttal
Abu'ttal. n.s. [from abut.] The butting or boundaries of any land. A writing declaring on what lands, highways, or other places, it does abut. Dict.

Abysm
Aby'sm. n.s. [abysme, old Fr. now written contractedly abîme.] A gulf; the same with abyss.
My good stars, that were my former guides,Have empty left their orbs, and shot their firesInto the abysm of hell. Shakespeare's Antony and Cleopatra.

Abyss
Aby'ss. n.s. [abyssus, Lat. Ἄβυσσος, bottomless, Gr.]

 A depth without bottom.
Who shall tempt with wand'ring feetThe dark, unbottom'd, infinite abyss,And, through the palpable obscure, find outThis uncouth way. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 405.
 A great depth, a gulph.
The yawning earth disclos'd th' abyss of hell:The weeping statues did the wars foretell,And holy sweat from brazen idols fell. Dryd. Virg. Georg. i.
 In a figurative sense, that in which any thing is lost.
For sepulchres themselves must crumbling fallIn time's abyss, the common grave of all. Dryd. Juv. Sat. x.
If, discovering how far we have clear and distinct ideas, we confine our thoughts within the contemplation of those things, that are within the reach of our understandings, and launch not out into that abyss of darkness, out of a presumption, that nothing is beyond our comprehension. Locke.
 The body of waters supposed at the center of the earth.
We are here to consider what is generally understood by the great abyss, in the common explication of the deluge; and 'tis commonly interpreted either to be the sea, or subterraneous waters hid in the bowels of the earth. Burnet's Theor. Earth.
 In the language of divines, hell.
From that insatiable abyss,Where flames devour, and serpents hiss,Promote me to thy seat of bliss. Roscommon.

Ac
Ac, Ak or Ake.
Being initials in the names of places, as Acton, signify an oak, from the Saxon ac, an oak. Gibson's Camden.

Acacia
Aca'cia. n.s. [Lat.]

 A drug brought from Egypt, which, being supposed the inspissated juice of a tree, is imitated by the juice of sloes, boiled to the same consistence. Dictionaire de Comm. Savary. Trevoux.
 A tree commonly so called here, though different from that which produces the true acacia; and therefore termed pseudoacacia, or Virginian acacia.
It hath a papilionaceous flower, from whose flower-cup rises the pointal, wrapped in a fimbriated membrane, which afterwards becomes a pod, opening into two parts, in which are contained several kidney-shaped seeds. Miller.

Academial
Acade'mial. adj. [from academy.] Relating to an academy, belonging to an academy.

Academian
Acade'mian. n.s. [from academy.] A scholar of an academy or university; a member of an university. Wood, in his Athenæ Oxonienses, mentions a great feast made for the academians.

Academical
Acade'mical. adj. [academicus, Lat.] Belonging to an university.
He drew him first into the fatal circle, from a kind of resolved privateness at his house at Lampsie in South Wales; where, after the academical life, he had taken such a taste of the rural, as I have heard him say, that he could well have bent his mind to a retired course. Wotton.

Academician
Academi'cian. n.s. [academicien, Fr.] The member of an academy. It is generally used in speaking of the professors in the academies of France.

Academick (adjective)
Acade'mick. adj. [academicus, Lat.] Relating to an university.
While thro' poetic scenes the genius roves,Or wanders wild in academic groves. Dunciad, b. iv. l. 481.

Academick (noun)
Acade'mick. n.s. [from academy.] A student of an university.
A young academic shall dwell upon a journal that treats of trade in a dictatorial style, and shall be lavish in the praise of the author; while, at the same time, persons well skilled in those different subjects, hear the tattle with contempt. Watt's Improvement of the Mind, p. i. c. 5.

Academist
Aca'demist. n.s. [from academy.] The member of an academy.
It is observed by the Parisian academists, that some amphibious quadrupeds, particularly the sea-calf or seal, hath his epiglottis extraordinarily large. Ray on the Creation.

Academy
A'cademy. n.s. [anciently, and properly, with the accent on the first syllable, now frequently on the second. Academia, Lat. from Academus of Athens, whose house was turned into a school, from whom the Groves of Academe in Milton.]

 An assembly or society of men, uniting for the promotion of some art.
Our court shall be a little academy,Still and contemplative in living arts. Shak. Love's Lab. Lost.
 The place where sciences are taught.
Amongst the academies, which were composed by the rare genius of those great men, these four are reckoned as the principal; namely, the Athenian school, that of Sicyon, that of Rhodes, and that of Corinth. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 An university.

 A place of education, in contradistinction to the universities or public schools.

Acanthus
Aca'nthus. n.s. [Lat.] The name of the herb bears-foot, remarkable for being the model of the foliage on the Corinthian chapiter.
                        On either sideAcanthus, and each od'rous bushy shrub,Fenc'd up the verdant wall. Milt. Parad. Lost, b. iv. l. 696.

Acatalectic
Acatale'ctic. n.s. [ὰκαταλήκτικος, Gr.] A verse which has the compleat number of syllables, without defect or superfluity.

Accede
To Acce'de. v.n. [accedo, Lat.] To be added to, to come to; generally used in political accounts; as, another power has acceded to the treaty; that is, has become a party.

Accelerate
To Acce'lerate. v.a. [accelero, Lat.]

 To make quick, to hasten, to quicken motion; to give a continual impulse to motion, so as perpetually to encrease.
Take new beer, and put in some quantity of stale beer into it; and see whether it will not accelerate the clarification by opening the body of the beer, whereby the  grosser parts may fall down into lees. Bacon's Natural History, № 307.
If the rays endeavour to recede from the densest part of the vibration, they may be alternately accelerated and retarded by the vibrations overtaking them. Newton's Optics.
Spices quicken the pulse, and accelerate the motion of the blood, and dissipate the fluids; from whence leanness, pains in the stomach, loathings, and fevers. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
Lo! from the dread immensity of spaceReturning, with accelerated course,The rushing comet to the sun descends. Thoms. Sum. l. 1690.
 It is generally applied to matter, and used chiefly in philosophical language; but is sometimes used on other occasions.
In which council the king himself, whose continual vigilancy did suck in sometimes causeless suspicions, which few else knew, inclined to the accelerating a battle. Bacon's Henry VII.
Perhaps it may point out to a student now and then, what may employ the most useful labours of his thoughts, and accelerate his diligence in the most momentous enquiries. Watt's Impr.

Acceleration
Accelera'tion. n.s. [acceleratio, Lat.]

 The act of quickening motion.
The law of the acceleration of falling bodies, discovered first by Galileo, is,  that the velocities acquired by falling, being as the time in which the body falls, the spaces through which it passes, will be as the squares of the velocities, and the velocity and time taken together, as in a quadruplicate ratio of the spaces.
 The state of the body accelerated, or quickened in its motion.
The degrees of acceleration of motion, the gravitation of the air, the existence or non-existence of empty spaces, either coacervate or interspersed, and many the like, have taken up the thoughts and times of men in disputes concerning them. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Accend
To Acce'nd. v.a. [accendo, Lat.] To kindle, to set on fire; a word very rarely used.
Our devotion, if sufficiently accended, would, as theirs, burn up innumerable books of this sort. Decay of Piety.

Accension
Acce'nsion. n.s. [accensio, Lat.] The act of kindling, or the state of being kindled.
The fulminating damp will take fire at a candle, or other flame, and, upon its accension, gives a crack or report, like the discharge of a gun, and makes likewise an explosion so forcible as sometimes to kill the miners, break their limbs, shake the earth, and force coals, stones, and other bodies, even though they be of very great weight and bulk, from the bottom of the pit or mine. Woodward's Natural History, p. iv.

Accent (noun)
A'ccent. n.s. [accentus, Lat.]

 The manner of speaking or pronouncing, with regard either to force or elegance.
I know, Sir, I am no flatterer; he that beguiled you in a plain accent was a plain knave; which, for my part, I will not be. Shakespeare's King Lear.
Your accent is something finer than you could purchase in so removed a dwelling. Shakespeare's As you like it.
 In grammar, the marks made upon syllables to regulate their pronunciation.
Accent, as in the Greek names and usage, seems to have regarded the tune of the voice; the acute accent raising the voice in some certain syllables to a higher, i.e. more acute pitch or tone, and the grave depressing it lower, and both having some emphasis, i.e. more vigorous pronunciation. Holder's Elem.
 Poetically, language or words.
              How many ages henceShall this our lofty scene be acted o'er,In states unborn, and accents yet unknown. Shak. Jul. Cæsar.
Winds on your wings to heav'n her accents bear;Such words as heav'n alone is fit to hear. Dryd. Virg. Past. 3.
 A modification of the voice, expressive of the passions or sentiments.
The tender accent of a woman's cryWill pass unheard, will unregarded die;When the rough seaman's louder shouts prevail,When fair occasion shews the springing gale. Prior.

Accent (verb)
To Acce'nt v.a. [from accentus, Lat.]

 To pronounce, to speak words with particular regard to the grammatical marks or rules.
Having got somebody to mark the last syllable but one, where it is long, in words above two syllables (which is enough to regulate her pronunciation, and accentingthe words) let her read daily in the gospels, and avoid understanding them in Latin, if she can. Locke on Education, § 177.
 In poetry, to pronounce or utter in general.
O my unhappy lines! you that beforeHave serv'd my youth to vent some wanton cries,And, now congeal'd with grief, can scarce imploreStrength to accent, Here my Albertus lies! Wotton.
 To write or note the accents.

Accentuate
To Acce'ntuate. v.a. [accentuer, Fr.] To place the proper accents over the vowels.

Accentuation
Accentua'tion. n.s. [from accentuate.]

 The act of placing the accent in pronunciation.

 Marking the accent in writing.

Accept
To Acce'pt v.a. [accipio, Lat. accepter, Fr.]

 To take with pleasure; to receive kindly; to admit with approbation.  It is distinguished from receive, as specific from general; noting a particular manner of receiving.
Neither do ye kindle fire on my altar for nought. I have no pleasure in you, faith the Lord of hosts, neither will I accept an offering at your hand. Malachi, i. 10.
Then Peter opened his mouth, and said, Of a truth I perceive that God is no respecter of persons: but, in every nation, he that feareth him, and worketh righteousness, is accepted with him. Acts, x. 34, 35.
You have have been graciously pleased to accept this tender of my duty. Dryden's Dedication to his Fables.
Charm by accepting, by submitting sway,Yet have your humour most when you obey. Pope.
 It is used in a kind of juridical sense; as, to accept terms, accept a treaty.
His promise Palamon accepts, but pray'dTo keep it better than the first he made. Dryden's Fables.
 In the language of the bible, to accept persons, is to act with personal and partial regard.
He will surely reprove you, if you do secretly accept persons. Job, xiii. 10.
 It is sometimes used with the particle of.
I will appease him with the present that goeth before me, and afterward I will see his face; peradventure he will accept of me. Genesis, xxxii. 20.

Acceptability
Acceptabi'lity. n.s. The quality of being acceptable. See Acceptable.
He hath given us his natural blood to be shed, for the remission of our sins, and for the obtaining the grace and acceptability of repentance. Taylor's Worthy Communicant.

Acceptable
Acce'ptable. adj. [acceptable, Fr. from the Latin.] It is pronounced by some with the accent in the first syllable, as by Milton; by others, with the accent on the second.

 That which is likely to be accepted; grateful; pleasing. It is used with the particle to before the person accepting.
This woman, whom thou mad'st to be my help,And gav'st me as thy perfect gift, so good,So fit, so acceptable, so divine,That from her hand I could expect no ill. Parad. Lost, b. ii.
I do not see any other method left for men of that function to take, in order to reform the world, than by using all honest arts to make themselves acceptable to the laity. Swift's Proj. &c.
After he had made a peace so acceptable to the church, and so honourable to himself, he spent the remainder of his life at Ripaille, and died with an extraordinary reputation of sanctity. Addison on Italy.

Acceptableness
Acce'ptableness. n.s. [from acceptable.] The quality of being acceptable.
It will thereby take away the acceptableness of that conjunction. Grew's Cosmologia Sacra, b. ii. c. 2.

Acceptably
Acce'ptably. adv. [from acceptable.] In an acceptable manner; so as to please; with the particle to. For the accent, see Acceptable.
Do not omit thy prayers, for want of a good oratory; for he that prayeth upon God's account, cares not what he suffers, so he be the friend of Christ; nor where nor when he prays, so he may do it frequently, fervently, and acceptably. Taylor's Guide to Devotion.
If you can teach them to love and respect other people, they will, as your age requires it, find ways to express it acceptably to every one. Locke on Education, § 145.

Acceptance
Acce'ptance. n.s. [acceptance, Fr.]

 Reception with approbation.
By that acceptance of his sovereignty, they also accepted of his laws; why then should any other laws be now used amongst them? Spenser's State of Ireland.
If he tells us his noble deeds, we must also tell him our noble acceptance of them. Shakespeare's Coriolanus
Some men cannot be fools with so good acceptance as others. South's Sermons.
Thus I imbolden'd spake, and freedom us'dPermissive, and acceptance found. Par. Lost, b. viii. l. 435.
 The meaning of a word as it is received or understood; acceptation.
That pleasure is man's chiefest good, because indeed, it is the perception of good that is properly pleasure, is an assertion most certainly true, though, under the common acceptance of it, not only false but odious: for, according to this, pleasure and sensuality pass for terms equivalent; and therefore he, who takes it in this sense, alters the subject of the discourse. South.

Acceptance (in law)
Acce'ptance. [in law.] The receiving of a rent, whereby the giver binds himself, for ever, to allow a former fact done by another, whether it be in itself good or not. Cowel.

Acceptation
Accepta'tion. n.s. [from accept.]

 Reception, whether good or bad. This large sense seems now wholly out of use.
Yet, poor soul! knows he no other, but that I do suspect, neglect, yea, and detest him? For, every day, he finds one way or other to set forth himself unto me; but all are rewarded with like coldness of acceptation. Sidney, b. ii.
What is new finds better acceptation, that what is good or great. Denham's Sophy.
 Good reception, acceptance.
Cain, envious of the acceptation of his brother's prayer and sacrifice, slew him; making himself the first manslayer, and his brother the first martyr. Raleigh's History of the World, b. i.
 The state of being acceptable, regard.
Some things, although not so required of necessity, that, to leave them undone, excludeth from salvation, are, notwithstanding, of so great dignity and acceptation with God, that most ample reward in heaven is laid up for them. Hooker, b. ii.
They have those enjoyments only as the consequences of the state of esteem and acceptation they are in with their parents and governours. Locke on Education, § 53.
 Acceptance in the juridical sense. This sense occurs rarely.
As, in order to the passing away a thing by gift, there is required a surrender of all right on his part that gives; so there is required also an acceptation on his part to whom it is given. South's Sermons.
 The meaning of a word, as it is commonly received.
Thereupon the earl of Lauderdale made a discourse upon the several questions, and what acceptation these words and expressions had. Clarendon, b. viii.
All matter is either fluid or solid, in a large acceptation of the words, that they may comprehend even all the middle degrees between extreme fixedness and coherency, and the most rapid intestine motion of the particles of bodies. Bentl. Serm.

Accepter
An Acce'pter. n.s. [from accept.] The person that accepts.

Acceptilation
Acceptila'tion. n.s. [acceptilatio, Lat.] A term of the civil law, importing the remission of a debt by an acquittance from the creditor, testifying the receipt of money which has never been paid.

Acception
Acce'ption. [acception, Fr. from acceptio, Lat.] The received sense of a word; the meaning.
That this hath been esteemed the due and proper acception of this word, I shall testify by one evidence, which gave me the first hint of this notion. Hammond on Fundamentals.

Access
Acce'ss. n.s. [In some of its senses, it seems derived from accessus, in others, from accessio, Lat. acces, Fr.]

 The way by which any thing may be approached.
There remained very advantageous access for temptations to enter and invade men, the fortifications being very slender, little knowledge of immortality, or any thing beyond this life, and no assurance that repentance would be admitted for sin. Hammond on Fundamentals.
And here th' access a gloomy grove defends;And here th' unnavigable lake extends,O'er whose unhappy waters, void of light,No bird presumes to steer his airy flight. Dyrd. Æneid vi.
 The means, or liberty, of approaching either to things or men.
When we are wrong'd, and would unfold our griefs,We are deny'd access unto his person,Ev'n by those men that most have done us wrong. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. 2.
They go commission'd to require a peace,And carry presents to procure access. Dryd. Æn. vii. l. 209.
                 He grants what they besought;Instructed, that to God is no accessWithout Mediator, whose high office nowMoses in figures bears. Milton's Par. Lost, b. xii. l. 239.
 Encrease, enlargement, addition.
The gold was accumulated, and store treasure, for the most part; but the silver is still growing. Besides, infinite is the access of territory and empire by the same enterprise. Bacon's Holy War
Although to opinion, there be many gods, may seem an access in religion, and such as cannot at all conflict with atheism, yet doth it deductively, and upon inference, include the same; for unity is the inseparable and essential attribute of Deity. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i. c. 10.
                Nor think superfluous their aid;I, from the influence of thy looks, receiveAccess in every virtue; in thy sightMore wise, more watchful, stronger. Paradise Lost, b. ix.
                        The reputationOf virtuous actions past, if not kept upWith an access, and fresh supply, of new ones,Is lost and soon forgotten. Denham's Sophy.
 It is sometimes used, after the French, to signify the returns of fits of a distemper; but this sense seems yet scarcely received into our language.
For as relapses make diseasesMore desperate than their first accesses. Hud. p. iii. cant. ii.

Accessariness
A'ccessariness. n.s. [from accessary.] The state of being accessary.
Perhaps this will draw us into a negative accessariness to the mischiefs. Decay of Piety.

Accessary
A'ccessary. adj. [A corruption, as it seems, of the word accessory, which see; but now more commonly used than the proper word.]
That which, without being the chief agent in a crime, contributes to it. But it had formerly a good and general sense.
As for those things that are accessary hereunto, those things that so belong to the way of salvation, &c. Hooker, b. iii. § 3.
He had taken upon him the government of Hull, without any apprehension or imagination, that it would ever make him accessary to rebellion. Clarendon, b. viii.

Accessible
Acce'ssible. adj. [accessibilis, Lat. accessible, Fr.] That which may be approached; that which we may reach or arrive at.
It is applied both to persons and things, with the particle to.
In conversation, the tempers of men are open and accessible, their attention is awake, and their minds disposed to receive the strongest impressions; and what is spoken is generally more affecting, and more apposite to particular occasions. Rogers.
As an island, we are accessible on every side, and exposed to perpetual invasions; against which it is impossible to fortify ourselves sufficiently, without a power at sea. Addison's Freeholder.
Those things, which were indeed inexplicable, have been rackt and tortured to discover themselves, while the plainer and more accessible truths, as if despicable while easy, are clouded and obscured. Decay of Piety.
Some lie more open to our senses and daily observation; others are more occult and hidden, and though accessible, in some measure, to our senses, yet not without great search and scrutiny, or some happy accident. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Accession
Acce'ssion. n.s. [accessio, Lat. accession, Fr.]

 Encrease by something added, enlargement, augmentation.
There would not have been found the difference here set down betwixt the force of the air, when expanded, and what that force should have been according to the theory, but that the included inch of air received some little accession during the trial. Boyle's Spring of the Air.
The wisest among the nobles began to apprehend the growing power of the people; and therefore, knowing what an accession thereof would accrue to them, by such an addition of property, used all means to prevent it. Swift on the Contests in Athens and Rome.
Charity, indeed, and works of munificence are the proper discharge of such over-proportioned accessions, and the only virtuous enjoyment of them. Roger's Sermons, ii. p. 37.
 The act of coming to, or joining one's self to; as, accession to a confederacy.
Beside, what wise objections he preparesAgainst my late accession to the wars?Does not the fool perceive his argumentIs with more force against Achilles bent? Dryden's Fables.
 The act of arriving at; as, the king's accession to the throne.

Accessorily
A'ccessorily. adv. [from accessory.] In the manner of an accessory.

Accessory (adjective)
A'ccessory. adj. Joined to another thing, so as to increase it; Additional.
In this kind there is not the least action, but it doth somewhat make to the accessory augmentation of our bliss. Hooker.

Accessory (noun)
A'ccessory. n.s. [accessorius, Lat. accessoire, Fr. This word, which had anciently a general signification, is now almost confined to forms of law.]

 Applied to persons.
A man that is guilty of a felonious offence, not principally, but by participation; as, by commandment, advice, or concealment.  And a man may be accessory to the offence of another, after two sorts, by the common law, or by statute: and, by the common law, two ways also; that is, before or after the fact.  Before the fact; as, when one commandeth or adviseth another to commit a felony, and is not present at the execution thereof; for his presence makes him also a principal: wherefore there cannot be an accessory before the fact in manslaughter; because manslaughter is sudden and not prepensed.  Accessory after the fact, is, when one receiveth him, whom he knoweth to have committed felony.  Accessory by statute, is he that abets, counsels, or hides any man committing, or having committed an offence made felony by statute. Cowel.
By the common law, the accessories cannot be proceeded against, till the principal has received his trial. Spens. State of Irel.
But pause, my soul! and study, ere thou fallOn accidental joys, th' essential.Still before accessories do abideA trial, must the principal be try'd. Donne.
        Now were all transform'dAlike, to serpents all, as accessoriesTo his bold riot. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x. l. 520.
 Applied to things.
An accessory is said to be that which does accede unto some principal fact or thing in law; and, as such, generally speaking, follows the reason and nature of its principal. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Accidence
A'ccidence. n.s. [a corruption of accidents, from accidentia, Lat.]
The little book containing the first rudiments of grammar, and explaining the properties of the eight parts of speech.
I do confess I do want eloquence,And never yet did learn mine accidence. Taylor the Water-poet.

Accident
A'ccident. n.s. [accidens, Lat.]

 The property or quality of any being, which may be separated from it, at least in thought.
If she were but the body's accident,and her sole being did in it subsist,As white in snow, she might herself absent,And in the body's substance not be miss'd. Sir John Davies.
An accidental mode, or an accident, is such a mode as is not necessary to the being of a thing; for the subject may be without it, and yet remain of the same nature that it was before; or it is that mode which may be separated or abolished from its subject. Watt's Logick.
 In grammar, the property of a word.
The learning of a language is nothing else but the informing of ourselves, what composures of letters are, by consent and institution, to signify such certain notions of things, with their modalities and accidents. Holder's Elements of Speech.
 That which happens unforeseen; casualty, chance.
General laws are like general rules in physic, according whereunto, as no wise man will desire himself to be cured, if there be joined with his disease some special accident, in regard whereof, that whereby others in the same infirmity, but without the like accident, recover health, would be, to him, either hurtful, or, at the least, unprofitable. Hooker, b. v. § 9.
The flood, and other accidents of time, made it one common field and pasture with the land of Eden. Raleigh's Hist. World.
Thus we rejoic'd, but soon our joy is turn'dInto perplexity, and new amaze;For whither is he gone? What accidentHath rapt him from us? Paradise Regained, b. i.
And trivial accidents shall be forborn,That others may have time to take their turn. Dryd. Fables.
The reformation owed nothing to the good intentions of king Henry.  He was only an instrument of it (as the logicians speak) by accident. Swift's Miscellanies.

Accidental (adjective)
Accide'ntal. adj. [from accident.]

 Having the quality of an accident, nonessential; used with the particle to, before than in which the accident inheres.
A distinction is to be made between what pleases naturally in itself, and what pleases upon the account of machines, actors, dances, and circumstances, which are merely accidental to the tragedy. Rymer's Tragedies of the last Age
This is accidental to a state of religion, and therefore ought to be reckoned among the ordinary difficulties of it. Tillotson.
 Casual, fortuitous, happening by chance.
Thy sin's not accidental, but a trade. Shakesp. Meas. for Meas.
                So shall you hearOf accidental judgments, casual slaughters;Of deaths put on by cunning, and forc'd cause. Shakes. Ham.
Look upon things of the most accidental and mutable nature; accidental in their production, and mutable in their continuance; yet God's prescience of them is as certain in him, as the memory of them is, or can be, in us. South's Sermons.
 In the following passage it seems to signify adventitious.
Ay, such a minister as wind to fire,That adds an accidental fierceness toIts natural fury. Denham's Sophy.

Accidental (noun)
Accide'ntal. n.s. [accidental, Fr. See ACCIDENT.] A property nonessential.
Conceive, as much as you can, of the essentials of any subject, before you consider its accidentals. Watts's Logick.

Accidentally
Accide'ntally. adv. [from accidental.]

 After an accidental manner; nonessentially.
Other needful points of public matters, no less concerning the good of the commonwealth, though but accidentally depending upon the former. Spenser's State of Ireland.
I conclude choler accidentally better, and acrimonious, but not in itself. Harvey on Consumptions.
 Casually, fortuitously.
Although virtuous men do sometimes accidentally make their way to preferment, yet the world is so corrupted, that no man can reasonably hope to be rewarded in it, merely upon account of his virtue. Swift's Miscellanies.

Accidentalness
Accide'ntalness. n.s. [from accidental.] The quality of being accidental. Dict.

Accipient
Acci'pient. n.s. [accipiens, Lat.] A receiver, perhaps sometimes used for recipient. Dict.

Accite
To Acci'te. v.a. [accito, Lat.] To call, to summons; a word not in use now.
Our coronation done, we will acciteNo prince, no peer, shall have just cause to say,Heav'n shorten Henry's happy life one day. Shakes. Henry IV.

Acclaim
Accla'im. n.s. [acclamo, Lat. from which probably first the verb acclaim, now lost, and then the noun.] A shout of praise acclamation.
Back from pursuit thy pow'rs, with loud acclaim,Thee only extoll'd Milton's Par. Lost, b. iii. l. 397.
The herald ends; the vaulted firmamentWith loud acclaims, and vast applause, is rent. Dryd. Fables.

Acclamation
Acclama'tion. n.s. [acclamatio, Lat.] Shouts of applause; such as those with which a victorious army salutes the general.
It hath been the custom of christian men, in token of the greater reverence, to stand, to utter certain words of acclamation, and, at the name of Jesus, to bow. Hooker, b. v. § 29.
                  Gladly then he mix'dAmong those friendly pow'rs, who him receiv'dWith joy, and acclamations loud, that one,That, of so many myriads fall'n, yet oneReturn'd, not lost. Milt. Parad. Lost, b. vi. l. 23.
Such an enchantment is there in words, and so fine a thing does it seem to some, to be ruined plausibly, and to be ushered to their destruction with panegyric and acclamation. South. Ser.

Acclivity
Accli'vity. n.s. [from acclivus, Lat.] The steepness or slope of a line inclining to the horizon, reckoned upwards; as, the ascent of an hill is the acclivity, the descent is the declivity. Quincy.
The men, leaving their wives and younger children below, do, not without some difficulty, clamber up the acclivities, dragging their kine with them, where they feed them, and milk them, and make butter and cheese, and do all the dairy-work. Ray on the Creation.

Acclivous
Accli'vous. adj. [acclivus, Lat.] Rising with a slope.

Accloy
To Acclo'y. v.a. [See CLOY.]

 To fill up, in an ill sense; to croud, to stuff full; a word almost obsolete.
At the well-head the purest streams arise:But mucky filth his branching arms annoys,And with uncomely weeds the gentle wave accloys. Fairy Q.
 To fill to satiety; in which sense cloy is still in use.
They that escape best in the temperate zone, would be accloyed with long nights, very tedious, no less than forty days. Ray on the Creation.

Accoil
To Acco'il. v.n. [See Coil.] To croud, to keep a coil about, to bustle, to be in a hurry; a word now out of use.
About the cauldron many cooks accoil'd,With hooks and ladles, as need did require;The while the viands in the vessel boil'd,They did about their business sweat, and sorely toil'd. Fairy Q.

Accolent
A'ccolent. n.s. [accolens, Lat.] He that inhabits near a place; a borderer. Dict.

Accommodable
Acco'mmodable. adj. [accommodabilis, Lat.] That which may be fitted; with the particle to.
As there is infinite variety in the circumstances of persons, things, actions, times and places; so we must be furnished with such general rules as are accommodable to all this variety, by a wise judgment and discretion. Watts's Logick.

Accommodate (adjective)
Accommo'date. adj. [accommodatus, Lat.] Suitable, fit; used sometimes with the particle for, but more frequently with to.
They are so acted and directed by nature, as to cast their eggs in such places as are most accommodate for the exclusion of their young, and where there is food ready for them so soon as they be hatched. Ray on the Creation.
In these cases, we examine the why, the what, and the how, of things, and propose means accommodate to the end. L'Estrange.
God did not primarily intend to appoint this way of worship, and to impose it upon them as that which was most proper and agreeable to him, but that he condescended to it as most accommodate to their present state and inclination. Tillots. Serm. v.

Accommodate (verb)
To Acco'mmodate. v.a. [accommodo, Lat.]

 To supply with conveniences of any kind.
                          These three,Three thousand confident, in act as many;For three performers are the file, when allThe rest do nothing; with this word stand; stand,Accommodated by the place, (more charmingWith their own nobleness, which could have turn'dA distaff to a lance) gilded pale looks. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 With the particle to, to adapt, to fit, to make consistent with.
He had altered many  things, not that they were not natural before, but that he might accommodate himself to the age in which he lived. Dryden on Dramatic Poetry.
'Twas his misfortune to light upon an hypothesis, that could not be accommodated to the nature of things, and human affairs; his principles could not be made to agree with that constitution and order which God had settled in the world. Locke.

Accommodately
Acco'mmodately. adv. [from accommodate.] Suitably, fitly.

Accommodation
Accommoda'tion. n.s. [from accommodate.]

 Provision of conveniences.

In the plural, conveniences, things requisite to ease or refreshment.
The king's commissioners were to have such accommodations, as the other thought fit to leave to them; who had been very civil to the king's commissioners. Clarendon, b. viii.
 Adaptation, fitness; with the participle to.
The organization of the body, with accommodation to its functions, is fitted with the most curious mechanism. Hale's Origin.
 Composition of a difference, reconciliation, adjustment.

Accompanable
Acco'mpanable. adj. [from accompany.] Sociable; a word now not used.
A show, as it were, of an accompanable solitariness, and of a civil wildness. Sidney, b. i.

Accompanier
Acco'mpanier. n.s. [from accompany.] The person that makes part of the company; companion. Dict.

Accompany
To Acco'mpany. v.a. [accompagner, Fr.]

 To be with another as a companion.
Go visit her, in her chaste bower of rest,Accompany'd with angel-like delights. Spenser, Sonnet iii.
The great business of the senses being to make us take notice of what hurts or advantages the body, it is wisely ordered by nature, that pain should accompany the reception of several ideas. Locke.
 To join with.
With regard to sheep, as folly is usually accompanied with perverseness, so it is here. There is something so monstrous to deal in a commodity, which we are not allowed to export; there is, I say, something so sottish, that it wants a name, in our language, to express it by. Swift's short View of Ireland.

Accomplice
Acco'mplice. n.s. [complice, Fr. from complex, a word in the barbarous Latin, much in use, Complices sertæ prudentius.]

 An associate, a partaker, usually in an ill sense.
There were several scandalous reports industriously spread by Wood, and his accomplices, to discourage all opposition against his infamous project. Swift.
 A partner, or co-operator; in a sense indifferent.
If a tongue would be talking without a mouth, what could it have done, when it had all its organs of speech, and accomplices of sound, about it. Addison. Spectator, № 247.
 It is used with the particle to before a thing, and with before a person.
Childless Arturius, vastly rich before,Thus by his losses multiplies his store,Suspected for accomplice to the fire,That burnt his palace but to build it higher. Dryd. Juv. Sat.
Who, should they steal, for want of his relief,He judg'd himself accomplice with the thief. Dryden's Fables.

Accomplish
To Acco'mplish. v.a. [accomplir, Fr. from compleo, Lat.]

 To complete, to execute fully; as, to accomplish a design.
He that is far off shall die of the pestilence, and he that is near shall fall by the sword, and he that remaineth, and is besieged, shall die by the famine. Thus I will accomplish my fury upon them. Ezekiel, vi. 12.
 To complete a period of time.
He would accomplish seventy years in the desolations of Jerusalem. Daniel, ix. 2.
 To fulfil; as a prophecy.
                  The vision,Which I made known to Lucius ere the strokeOf this yet scarce cold battle, at this instantIs full accomplish'd. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
We see every day those events exactly accomplished, which our Saviour foretold at so great a distance. Addison on the Christian Religion.
 To gain, to obtain.
Tell him from me (as he will win my love)He bear himself with honourable action;Such as he hath observ'd in noble ladiesUnto their lords, by them accomplished. Shak. Tam. of a Shrew.
I'll make my heaven in a lady's lap,And deck my body in gay ornaments.Oh miserable thought, and more unlikely,Than to accomplish twenty golden crowns. Shak.. Henry V.
 To adorn, or furnish, either mind or body.
                          From the tentsThe armourers accomplishing the knights,With busy hammers closing rivets up,Give dreadful note of preparation. Shakespeare's Henry V.

Accomplished
Acco'mplished. participial adj.

 Complete in some qualification.
For who expects, that, under a tutor, a young gentleman should be an accomplished public orator or logician. Locke on Ed.
 Elegant, finished in respect of embellishments; used commonly with respect to acquired qualifications, without including moral excellence.
                      The next I took to wife,O that I never had! fond wish too late,Was in the vale of Sorec, Dalila,That specious monster, my accomplish'd snare. Samson Agon.

Accomplisher
Acco'mplisher. n.s. [from accomplish.] The person that accomplishes. Dict.

Accomplishment
Acco'mplishment. n.s. [accomplissement, Fr.]

 Completion, full performance, perfection.
Thereby he might evade the accomplishment of those afflictions, he now but gradually endureth. Brown's Vulg. Errours.
This would be the accomplishment of their common felicity, in case, by their evil, either through destiny or advice, they suffered not the occasion to be lost. Sir John Haywood.
He thought it impossible to find, in any one body, all those perfections which he sought for the accomplishment of a Helena; because nature, in any individual person, makes nothing that is perfect in all its parts. Dryden's Dufresnoy, Pref.
 Completion; as, of a prophecy.
The miraculous success of the apostles preaching, and the accomplishment of many of their predictions, which, to those early christians, were matters of faith only, are, to us, matters of sight and experience. Atterbury's Sermons.
 Embellishment, elegance, ornament of mind or body.
Young heirs, and elder brothers, from their own reflecting upon the estates they are born to, and therefore thinking all other accomplishments unnecessary, are of no manner of use but to keep up their families. Addison. Spectator, № 123.
 The act of obtaining anything.
The means suggested by policy and worldly wisdom, for the attainment of those earthly enjoyments, are unfit for that purpose, not only upon the account of their insufficiency for, but also of their frequent opposition and contrariety to, the accomplishment of such ends. South's Sermons.

Accompt
Acco'mpt. n.s. [Fr. compter and compte, anciently accompter. Skinner.] An account, a reckoning. See Account.
The soul may have time to call itself to a just accompt of all things past, by means whereof repentance is perfected. Hooker, b. v. § 46.
Each Christmas they accompts did clear;And wound their bottom round the year. Prior.

Accomptant
Acco'mptant. n.s. [accomptant, Fr.] A reckoner, computer. See Accountant.
As the accompt runs on, generally the accomptant goes backward. South's Sermons.

Accompting-day
Acco'mpting-day. The day on which the reckoning is to be settled.
To whom thou much dost owe, thou much must pay;Think on the debt against th' accompting-day. Sir J. Denham.

Accord (noun)
Acco'rd. n.s. [accord, Fr.]

 A compact; an agreement.
If both are satisfy'd with this accord,Swear by the laws of knighthood on my sword. Dryd. Fab.
 Concurrence, union of mind.
At last such grace I found, and means I wrought,That I that lady to my spouse had won,Accord of friends, consent of parents sought,Affiance made, my happiness begun. Spenser's Fairy Queen, b. ii. c. 4.
They gathered themselves together, to fight with Joshua and Israel, with one accord. Joshua, ix. 2.
 Harmony, symmetry, just correspondence of one  thing with another.
Beauty is nothing else but a just accord and mutual harmony of the members, animated by a healthful constitution. Dryden's Dufresnoy, Pref.
 Musical note.
Try if there were in one steeple two bells of unison, whether the striking of the one would move the other, more than if it were another accord. Bacon's Natural History, № 281.
We must not blame Apollo, but his lute,If false accords from her false strings be sent. Sir Jo. Davies.
 Voluntary motion.
            Ne Guyon yet spake word,Till that they came unto an iron door,Which to them open'd of its own accord. Fairy Q. b. ii. c. 7.
Will you blame any man for doing that of his own accord, which all men should be compelled to do, that are not willing of themselves. Hooker.
All animal substances, exposed to the air, turn alkaline of their own accord; and some vegetables, by heat, will not turn acid, but alkaline. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Action in speaking, correspondent to the words.
Titus, I am come to talk with thee. —— No, not a word: how can I grace my talk,Wanting a hand to give it that accord? Shakesp. Titus And.

Accord (verb active)
To Acco'rd. v.a. [derived, by some, from corda the string of a musical instrument, by others, from corda hearts, in the first, implying harmony, in the other, unity.]
To make agree; to adjust one thing to another; with the particle to.
The first sports the shepherds showed, were full of such leaps and gambols, as being accorded to the pipe which they bore in their mouths, even as they danced, made a right picture of their chief god Pan, and his companions the satyrs. Sidney, b. i.
Her hands accorded the lute's music to the voice; her panting heart danced to the music. Sidney, b. ii.
The lights and shades, whose well accorded strife,Gives all the strength and colour of our life. Pope's Epist.

Accord (verb neuter)
To Acco'rd. v.n. To agree, to suit one with another; with the particle with.
Things are often spoke, and seldom meant;But that my heart accordeth with my tongue,Seeing the deed is meritorious,And to preserve my sovereign from his foe. Shak. Hen. VI.
Several of the main parts of Moses's history, as concerning the flood, and the first fathers of the several nations of the world, do very well accord with the most ancient accounts of profane history. Tillotson, Sermon i.

Accordance
Acco'rdance. n.s. [from accord.]

 Agreement with a person; with the particle with.
And prays he may in long accordance bide,With that great worth which hath such wonders wrought. Fairfax, b. ii. stanza 63.
 Conformity to something.
The only way of defining of sin, is, by the contrariety to the will of God; as of good, by the accordance with that will. Hammond's Fundamentals.

Accordant
Acco'rdant. adj. [accordant, Fr.] Willing; in a good humour.
The prince discovered to Claudio, that he loved your niece my daughter, and meant to acknowledge it this night in a dance; and, if he found her accordant, he meant to take the present time by the top, and instantly break with you of it. Shakespeare's Much ado about Nothing.

According
Acco'rding. prep. [from accord.]

 In manner suitable to, agreeably to, in proportion.
Our churches are places provided, that the people might there assemble themselves in due and decent manner, according to their several degrees and orders. Hooker, b. v. § 13.
Our zeal, then, should be according to knowledge. And what kind of knowledge? Without all question, first, according to the true, saving, evangelical knowledge. It should be according to the gospel, the whole gospel: not only according to its truths, but precepts: not only according to its free grace, but necessary duties: not only according to its mysteries, but also its commandments. Sprat's Sermons.
How much more noble is the same that is built on candour and ingenuity, according to those beautiful lines of Sir John Denham, in his Poem on Fletcher's works. Addis. Spect.
A man may, with prudence and a good conscience, approve of the professed principles of one party more than the other, according as he thinks they best promote the good of church and state. Swift on the Sentiments of a Church of Engl. man.
 With regard to.
God made all things in number, weight, and measure, and gave them to be considered by us according to these properties, which are inherent in created beings. Holder on Time.

Accordingly
Acco'rdingly. adv. [from accord.] Agreeably, suitably, conformably.
Sirrah, thou'rt said to have a stubborn soul,That apprehends no further than this world;And squar'st thy life accordingly. Shakesp. Measure for Meas.
As the actions of men are of sundry distinct kinds, so the laws thereof must accordingly be distinguished. Hooker, b. i.
Whoever is so assured of the authority and sense of scripture, as to believe the doctrine of it, and to live accordingly, shall be saved. Tillotson's Preface.
Mealy substances, fermented, turn sour. Accordingly, given to a weak child, they still retain their nature; for bread will give them the cholic. Arbuthnot on Aliments

Accost
To Acco'st. v.a. [accoster, Fr.] To speak to first; to address; to salute.
You mistake, knight: accost her, front her, board her, woo her, assail her. Shakespeare's Twelfth Night.
At length, collecting all his serpent wiles,With soothing words renew'd, him thus accosts. Parad. Reg.
I first accosted him: I su'd, I sought,And, with a loving force, to Pheneus brought. Dryd. Æneid.

Accostable
Acco'stable. adj. [from accost.] Easy of access; familiar.
They were both indubitable, strong, and high-minded men, yet of sweet and accostable nature, almost equally delighting in the press and affluence of dependents and suitors. Wotton.

Account (noun)
Acco'unt. n.s. [from the old French accompt, from compactus, Lat. originally written accompt, which see; but, by gradually softening the pronunciation, in time the orthography changed to account.]

 A computation of debts or expences; a register of facts relating to money.
At many times I brought in my accounts,Laid them before you; you would throw them off.And say you found them in mine honesty. Shakesp. Timon.
When my young master has once got the skill of keeping accounts (which is a business of reason more than arithmetic) perhaps it will not be amiss, that his father from thenceforth require him to do it in all his concernments. Locke on Education.
 The state or result of a computation; as, the account stands thus between us.
Behold this I have found, saith the Preacher, counting one by one, to find out the account. Ecclesiasticus, vii. 27.
 Such a state of persons or things, as may make them more or less worthy of being considered in the reckoning.  Value, or estimation.
For the care that they took for their wives and their children, their brethren and kinsfolks, was in least account with them: but the greatest and principal fear was for the holy temple. 2 Maccab. xv. 18.
That good affection, which things of smaller account have once set on work, is by so much the more easily raised higher. Hooker, b. v. § 35.
I should make more account of their judgment, who are men of sense, and yet have never touched a pencil, than of the opinion given by the greatest part of painters. Dryden's Dufresn.
We would establish our souls in such a solid and substantial virtue, as will turn to account in that great day, when it must stand the test of infinite wisdom and justice. Add. Spect. № 399.
 Distinction, dignity, rank.
There is such a peculiarity in Homer's manner of apostrophizing Eumæus, and speaking of him in the second person: it is generally applied, by that poet, only to men of account and distinction. Pope's Odyssey; notes.
 A reckoning verified by finding the value of a thing equal to what it was accounted.
Considering the usual motives of human actions, which are pleasure, profit, and ambition, I cannot yet comprehend how those persons find their account in any of the three. Swift's Address to Parliament.
 A reckoning referred to, or sum charged upon any particular person; and thence, figuratively, regard, consideration, sake.
If he hath wronged thee, or oweth thee ought, put that on my account. Philemon, i. 8.
This must be always remembered, that nothing can come into the account of recreation, that is not done with delight. Locke on Education, § 197.
In matters where his judgment led him to oppose men on a public account, he would do it vigorously and heartily. Atterbury's Sermons.
The assertion is our Saviour's, though uttered by him in the person of Abraham, the father of the faithful; who, on the account of that character, is very fitly introduced. Idem.
These tribunes, a year or two after their institution, kindled great dissensions between the nobles and the commons, on the account of Coriolanus, a nobleman, whom the latter had impeached. Swift's Contests in Athens and Rome.
Nothing can recommend itself to our love, on any other account, but either as it promotes our present, or is a means to assure to us a future happiness. Roger's Sermons.
Sempronius gives no thanks on this account. Addison's Cato.
 A narrative, relation; in this use it may seem to be derived from conte, Fr. a tale, a narration.

 The review or examination of an affair taken by authority; as, the magistrate took an account of the tumult.
Therefore is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain king, which would take account of his servants; and when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which owed him ten thousand talents. Matt. xix. 23, 24.
 The relation and reasons of a transaction given to a person in authority.
Fie, my lord, fie! a soldier, and afraid! What need we fear who knows it, when none can call our power to account? Shakespeare's Macbeth.
The true ground of morality can only be the will and law of a God, who sees men in the dark, has in his hands rewards and punishments, and power enough to call to account the proudest offender. Locke.
 Explanation; assignment of causes.
It is easy to give account, how it comes to pass, that though all men desire happiness, yet their wills carry them so contrarily. Locke.
It being, in our author's account, a right acquired by betting, to rule over those he had begotten, it was not a power possible to be inherited, because the right, being consequent to, and built on, an act perfectly personal, made that power so too, and impossible to be inherited. Locke.
 An opinion concerning things previously established.
These were designed to join with the forces at sea, there being prepared a number of flat-bottomed boats to transport the land-forces, under the wing of the great navy: for they made no account, but that the navy should be absolutely master of the seas. Bacon's Considerations on War with Spain.
A prodigal young fellow, that had sold his clothes, upon the sight of a swallow, made account that summer was at hand, and away went his shirt too. L'Estrange, Fable cxxvii.
 The reasons of any thing collected.
Being convinced, upon all accounts, that they had the same reason to believe the history of our Saviour, as that of any other person to which they themselves were not actually eyewitnesses, they were bound, by all the rules of historical faith, and of right reason, to give credit to this history. Addison on the Christian Religion.
 In law.
Account is, in the common law, taken for a writ or action brought against a man, that, by means of office or business undertaken, is to render an account unto another; as, a bailiff toward his master, a guardian to his ward. Cowell.

Account (verb)
To Acco'unt. v.a. [See ACCOUNT.]

 To esteem, to think, to hold in opinion.
That also was accounted a land of giants. Deut.
 To reckon, to compute.
The calendar months are likewise arbitrarily and unequally settled by the same power; by which months we, to this day, account, and they measure, and make up, that which we call the Julian year. Holder on Time.
 To give an account, to assign the causes; in which sense it is followed by the particle for.
If any one should ask, why our general continued so easy to the last? I know no other way to account for it, but by that unmeasurable love of wealth, which his best friends allow to be his predominant passion. Swift.
 To make up the reckoning; to answer for practices.
Then thou shalt see him plung'd, when least he fears,At once accounting for his deep arrears. Dryd. Juv. Sat. xiii.
They have no uneasy presages of a future reckoning, wherein the pleasures they now taste, must be accounted for; and may, perhaps, be outweighed by the pains, which shall then lay hold of them. Atterbury's Sermons.
 To appear as the medium by which any thing may be explained.
Such as have a faulty circulation through the lungs, ought to eat very little at a time; because the increase of the quantity of fresh chyle, must make that circulation still more uneasy; which, indeed, is the case of consumptive and some asthmatic persons, and accounts for the symptoms they are troubled with after eating. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 To assign to, with the particle to.
For some years, really accrued the yearly sum of two hundred thousand pounds to the king's coffers: and it was, in truth, the only project that was accounted to his own service. Clarendon.
 To hold in esteem.
Silver was nothing accounted of in the days of Solomon. Chron.

Account-book
Acco'unt-book. n.s. A book containing accounts.
I would endeavour to comfort myself upon the loss of friends, as I do upon the loss of money; by turning to my account-book, and seeing whether I have enough left for my support. Swift, Letter lxii.

Accountable
Acco'untable. adj. [from account.] Of whom an account may be required; who must answer for: followed by the particle to before the person, and for before the thing.
                Accountable to none,But to my conscience and my God alone. Oldham.
Thinking themselves excused from standing upon their own legs, or being accountable for their own conduct, they very seldom trouble themselves with enquiries. Locke on Education.
The good magistrate will make no distinction; for the judgment is God's; and he will look upon himself as accountable at his bar for the equity of it. Atterbury's Sermons.

Accountant (adjective)
Accou'ntant. adj. [from account.] Accountable to; responsible for.
             His offence is so, as it appearsAccountant to the law upon that pain. Shakesp. Meas. for Meas.
                        I love her too,Not out of absolute lust (though, peradventure,I stand accountant for as great a sin)But partly led to diet my revenge. Shakespeare's Othello.

Accountant (noun)
Accou'ntant. n.s. [See Accomptant.] A computer; a man skilled or employed in accounts.
The different compute of divers states; the short and irreconcileable years of some; the exceeding errour in the natural frame of others; and the false deductions of ordinary accountants in most. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Accounting
Acco'unting. n.s. [from account.] The act of reckoning, or making up of accounts.
This method faithfully observed, must keep a man from breaking, or running behind hand in his spiritual estate; which, without frequent accountings, he will hardly be able to prevent. South's Sermons.

Accouple
To Acco'uple. v.a. [accoupler, Fr.] To join, to link together.
He sent a solemn embassage to treat a peace and league with the king; accoupling it with an article in the nature of a request. Bacon's Henry VII.

Accourage
To Acco'urage. v.a. [obsolete. See COURAGE.] To animate.
That forward pair she ever would assuage,When they would strive due reason to exceed;But that same froward twain would accourage,And of her plenty add unto her need. Fairy Queen, b. ii. c. ii.

Accourt
To Acco'urt. v.a. [See To COURT.] To entertain with courtship, or courtesy; a word now not in use.
Who all this while were at their wanton rest,Accourting each her friend with lavish feast. Fairy Q. b. ii. c. ii.

Accoutre
To Accoutre. v.a. [accoûtrer, Fr.] To dress, to equip.
Is it for this they study? to grow pale,And miss the pleasures of a glorious meal?For this, in rags accoutred are they seen,And made the may-game of the public spleen? Dryd. Persius.

Accoutrement
Acco'utrement. n.s. [accoûtrement, Fr.] Dress, equipage, furniture relating to the person; trappings, ornaments.
I profess requital to a hair's breadth; not only in the simple office of love, but in all the accoutrement, complement, and ceremony of it. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
I have seen the pope officiate at St. Peter's, where, for two hours together, he was busied in putting on or off his different accoutrements, according to the different parts he was to act in them. Addison, Spectator, № 201.
How gay with all th' accoutrements of war,The Britons come, with gold well-fraught they come. Phil.
Christianity is lost among them, in the trappings and accoutrements of it; with which, instead of adorning religion, they have strangely disguised it, and quite stifled it in the croud of external rites and ceremonies. Tillotson, Sermon xxviii.

Accretion
Accre'tion. n.s. [accretio, Lat.] The act of growing to another, so as to encrease it.
Plants do nourish; inanimate bodies do not: they have an accretion, but no alimentation. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 602.
The changes seem to be effected by the exhaling of the moisture, which may leave the tinging corpuscles more dense, and something augmented by the accretion of the oily and earthy parts of that moisture. Newton's Optics.
Infants support abstinence worst, from the quantity of aliment consumed in accretion. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Accretive
Accre'tive. adj. [from accretion.] Growing; that which by growth is added.
If the motion be very slow, we perceive it not: we have no sense of the accretive motion of plants and animals: and the sly shadow steals away upon the dial; and the quickest eye can discover no more but that it is gone. Glanv. Scepsis Scient.

Accroach
To Accro'ach. v.a. [accrocher, Fr.] To draw to one as with a hook; to gripe, to draw away by degrees what is another's.

Accroachment
Accro'achment. n.s. [from accroach.] The act of accroaching. Dict.

Accrue
To Accrue. v.n. [from the participle accrû, formed from accróitre, Fr.]

 To accede to, to be added to; as, a natural production or effect, without any particular respect to good or ill.
The Son of God, by his incarnation, hath changed the manner of that personal subsistence; no alteration thereby accruing to the nature of God. Hooker, b. v. § 54.
 To be added, as an advantage or improvement, in a sense inclining to good rather than ill; in which meaning it is more frequently used by later authors.
From which compact there arising an obligation upon every one, so to convey his meaning, there accrues also a right to every one, by the same signs, to judge of the sense or meaning of the person so obliged to express himself. South's Sermons.
Let the evidence of such a particular miracle be never so bright and clear, yet it is still but particular; and must therefore want that kind of force, that degree of influence, which accrues to a standing general proof, from its having been tried or approved, and consented to, by men of all ranks and capacities, of all tempers and interests, of all ages and nations. Atterbury's Sermons.
 To append to, or arise from; as, an ill consequence; this sense seems to be less proper.
His scholar Aristotle, as in many other particulars, so likewise in this, did justly oppose him, and became one of the authors; choosing a certain benefit, before the hazard that might accrue from the disrespects of ignorant persons. Wilk. Math. Mag.
 In a commercial sense, to be produced, or arise; as, profits.
The yearly benefit, that, out of those his works, accrueth to her majesty, amounteth to one thousand pounds. Carew's Surv.
The great profits which have accrued to the duke of Florence from his free port, have set several of the states of Italy on the same subject. Addison on Italy.
 Sometimes to follow, as loss; but less properly.
The benefit or loss of such a trade accruing to the government, until it comes to take root in the nation. Temple's Misc.

Accubation
Accuba'tion. n.s. [from accubo, to lye down to, Lat.] The antient posture of leaning at meals.
It will appear, that accubation, or lying down at meals, was a gesture used by very many nations. Brown's Vulgar Err. b. v.

Accumb
To Accu'mb. v.a. [accumbo, Lat.] To lie at the table, according to the ancient manner. Dict.

Accumulate
To Accu'mulate. v.a. [from accumulo, Lat.] To heap one thing upon another; to pile up, to heap together.  It is used either literally, as, to accumulate money, or, figuratively, as, to accumulate merit or wickedness.
If thou dost slander her, and torture me,Never pray more; abandon all remorse;On horrors head horrors accumulate;For nothing can'st thou to damnation add. Shakesp. Othello.
Crusht by imaginary treason's weight,Which too much merit did accumulate. Sir John Denham.

Accumulation
Accumula'tion. n.s. [from accumulate.]

 The act of accumulating.
Some, perhaps, might otherwise wonder at such an accumulation of benefits, like a kind of embroidering, or listing of one favour upon another. Wotton.
One of my place in Syria, his lieutenant,For quick accumulation of renown,Which he atchiev'd by th' minute, lost his favour. Shakespeare's Antony and Cleopatra.
 The state of being accumulated.
By the regular returns of it in some people, and their freedom from it after the morbid matter is exhausted, it looks as there were regular accumulations and gatherings of it, as of other humours in the body, growing perhaps on some people as corns. Arbuthnot on Diet.

Accumulative
Accu'mulative. adj. [from accumulate.]

 That which accumulates.

 That which is accumulated.
If the injury meet not with meekness, it then acquires another accumulative guilt, and stands answerable not only for its own positive ill, but for all the accidental, which it causes in the sufferer. Government of the Tongue, § 4.

Accumulator
Accumula'tor. n.s. [from accumulate.] He that accumulates; a gatherer or heaper together.
Injuries may fall upon the passive man, yet there would be no broils and quarrels, the great accumulators and multipliers of injuries; which demonstrates how unjustly meekness is charged with so much as accidental production of them. Decay of Piety.

Accuracy
A'ccuracy. n.s. [accuratio, Lat.] Exactness, nicety.
The man who hath the stupid ignorance, or hardened effrontery! to insult the revealed will of God; or the petulant conceit to turn it into ridicule; or the arrogance to make his own perfections the measure of the Divinity; or, at best, that can collate a text, or quote an authority, with an insipid accuracy; or demonstrate a plain proposition, in all the formality of A's and B's; these now are the only men worth mentioning. Delany.
We consider the uniformity of the whole design, accuracy of the calculations, and skill in restoring and comparing passages of ancient authors. Arbuthnot on Coins, Pref.

Accurate
A'ccurate. adj. [accuratus, Lat.]

 Exact, as opposed to negligence or ignorance, applied to persons.

 Exact, without defect or failure, applied to things.
No man living has made more accurate trials than Reaumure, that brightest ornament of France. Colson Elements of Nat. Phil.

Accurately
A'ccurately. adv. [from accurate.] In an accurate manner; exactly, without errour, nicely.
The sine of incidence is either accurately, or very nearly, in a given ratio to the sine of refraction. Newt. Opt. ax. v.
That all these distances, motions, and quantities of matter, should be so accurately and harmoniously adjusted in this great variety of our system, is above the fortuitous hits of blind material causes, and must certainly flow from that eternal fountain of wisdom. Bentley's Sermons.

Accurateness
A'ccurateness. n.s. [from accurate.] Exactness, nicety.
But sometime after, suspecting that in making this observation I had not determined the diameter of the sphere with sufficient accurateness, I repeated the experiment. Newton's Opt.

Accurse
To Accu'rse. v.a. [See CURSE.] To doom to misery; to invoke misery upon any one.
As if it were an unlucky comet, or as if God had so accursed it, that it should never shine to give light in things concerning our duty any way towards him. Hooker, b. iii. § 4.

Accursed
Accu'rsed. part. adj.

 That which is cursed or doomed to misery.
'Tis is the most certain sign the world's accurst,That the best things corrupted are and worst. Denh. Poems.
 That which deserves the curse; execrable; hateful; detestable; and, by consequence, wicked; malignant.
                        Some holy angelFly to the court of England, and unfoldHis message ere he come; that a swift blessingMay soon return to this our suffering country,Under a hand accurs'd! Shakespeare's Macbeth.
The chief parts of the misery of wicked men, and those accursed spirits, the devils, is this, that they are of a disposition contrary to God. Tillotson, Sermon iv.
They, like the seed from which they sprung, accurst,Against the gods immortal hatred nurst. Dryden's Ovid.

Accusable
Accu'sable. adj. [from the verb accuse.] That which may be censured; blamable; culpable.
There would be a manifest defect, and her improvision justly accusable; if animals, so subject unto diseases from bilious causes, should want a proper conveyance for choler. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Accusation
Accusa'tion. n.s. [from accuse.]

 The act of accusing.
Thus they in mutual accusation spentThe fruitless hours, but neither self-condemning,And of their vain contest appear'd no end. Milt. Par. Lost.
 The charge brought against any one by the accuser.
                              You readThese accusations, and these grievous crimesCommitted by your person, and your followers. Shakespeare's Richard II.
All accusation, in the very nature of the thing, still supposing, and being founded upon some law: for where there is no law, there can be no transgression; and where there can be no transgression, I am sure there ought to be no accusation. South.
 In the sense of the courts —
A declaration of some crime preferred before a competent judge, by the intervention of an inscription lawfully made, in order to inflict some judgment on the guilty person. Ayl. Parer.

Accusative
Accu'sative. n. adj. [accusativus, Lat.] A term of grammar, signifying the relation of the noun; on which the action implied in the verb terminates.

Accusatory
Accu'satory. adj. [from accuse.] That which produceth or containeth an accusation.
In a charge of adultery, the accuser ought to set forth, in the accusatory libel, some certain and definite time. Ayl. Parerg.

Accuse
To Accu'se.  v.a. [accuso, Lat.]

 To charge with a crime. It requires the particle of before the subject of accusation.
He stripp'd the bears-foot of its leafy growth;And, calling western winds, accus'd the spring of sloth. Dryden's Virgil, Georg. iv. l. 205.
The professors are accused of all the ill practices which may seem to be the ill consequences of their principles. Add. on Italy.
 It sometimes admits the particle for.
Never send up a leg of a fowl at supper, while there is a cat or dog in the house, that can be accused for running away with it: But, if there happen to be neither, you must lay it upon the rats, or a strange greyhound. Swift's Directions to the Cook.
 To blame or censure, in opposition to applause or justification.
Their conscience bearing witness, and their thoughts the mean while accusing or else excusing one another. Rom. ii. 15.
Your valour would your sloth too much accuse,And therefore, like themselves, they princes choose. Dryden's Tyrannick Love.

Accuser
Accu'ser. n.s. [from accuse.] He that brings a charge against another.
There are some persons forbidden to be accusers, on the score of their sex, as women; others, of their age, as pupils and infants; others, upon the account of some crimes committed by them; and others, on the score of some filthy lucre to propose to gain thereby; others, on the score of their conditions, as libertines against their patrons; and others, through a suspicion of calumny, as having once already given false evidence; and, lastly, others on account of their poverty, as not being worth more than fifty aurei. Ayliffe's Paragon.
— That good man, who drank the pois'nous draught,With mind serene, and could not wish to seeHis vile accuser drink as deep as he. Dryd. Juv. Sat. xiii.
If the person accused maketh his innocence plainly to appear upon his trial, the accuser is immediately put to an ignominious death; and, out of his goods and lands, the innocent person is quadruply recompensed. Gulliver's Travels.

Accustom
To Accu'stom. v.a. [accoûtumer, Fr.] To habituate, to enure, with the particle to. It is used chiefly of persons.
                How shall we breathe in other airLess pure, accustom'd to immortal fruits? Par. Lost, b. xi.
It has been some advantage to accustom one's self to books of the same edition. Watts's Improvement of the Mind, p. i. c. 17.

Accustomable
Accu'stomable. adj. [from accustom.] Of long custom or habit; habitual, customary.
Animals even of the same original, extraction, and species, may be diversified by accustomable residence in one climate, from what they are in another. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Accustomably
Accu'stomably. adv. According to custom.
Touching the king's fines accustomably paid for the purchasing of writs original, I find no certain beginning of them, and do therefore think that they also grew up with the chancery. Bacon's Alienation.

Accustomance
Accu'stomance. n.s. [accoûtumance, Fr.] Custom, habit, use.
Through accustomance and negligence, and perhaps some other causes, we neither feel it in our own bodies, nor take notice of it in others. Boyle's Works.

Accustomarily
Accu'stomarily adv. In a customary manner; according to common or customary practice.

Accustomary
Accu'stomary. adj. [from accustom.] Usual, practised; according to custom.

Accustomed
Accu'stomed. [from accustom.] According to custom; frequent; usual.
Look how she rubs her hands. — It is an accustomed action with her, to seem thus washing her hands: I have known her continue in this a quarter of an hour. Shakesp. Macbeth.

Ace
A'ce. n.s. [As not only signified a piece of money, but any integer, from whence is derived the word ace, or unit. Thus As signified the whole inheritance. Arbuthnot on Coins.]

 An unit; a single point on cards or dice.
When lots are shuffled together in a lap, urn, or pitcher; or if a man blindfold casts a die, what reason in the world can he have to presume, that he shall draw a white stone rather than a black, or throw an ace rather than a fife. South Sermons.
 A small quantity.
He will not bate an ace of absolute certainty; but however doubtful or improbable the thing is, coming from him it must go for an indisputable truth. Government of the Tongue, § 11.
I'll not wag an ace farther: the whole world shall not bribe me to it. Dryden's Spanish Friar.

Acephalous
Ace'phalous. n.a. [ἀκέφαλος, Gr.] Without a head. Dict.

Acerb
Ace'rb. adj. [acerbus, Lat.] Acid, with an addition of roughness, as most fruits are before they are ripe. Quincy.

Acerbity
Ace'rbity. n.s. [acerbitas, Lat.]

 A rough sower taste.

 Applied to men, sharpness of temper; severity.
True it is, that the talents for criticism, namely, smartness, quick censure, vivacity of remark, indeed all but acerbity, seem rather the gifts of youth than of old age. Pope's Intr. to Dun.

Acervate
To Ace'rvate. v.a. [acervo, Lat.] To heap up. Dict.

Acervation
Acerva'tion. n.s. [from acervate.] The act of heaping together.

Acervose
Ace'rvose. adj. Full of heaps. Dict.

Acescent
Ace'scent. adj. [acescens, Lat.] That which has a tendency to sourness or acidity.
The same persons, perhaps, had enjoyed their health as well with a mixture of animal diet, qualified with a sufficient quantity of acescents; as, bread, vinegar, and fermented liquors. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Acetose
Aceto'se. adj. That which has in it acids or vinegar. Dict.

Acetosity
Aceto'sity. n.s. [from acetose.] The state of being acetose, or of containing vinegar. Dict.

Acetous
Ace'tous. adj. [from acetum, vinegar, Lat.] Having the quality of vinegar, sour.
Raisins, which consist chiefly of the juice of grapes, inspissated in the skins or husks by the avolation of the superfluous moisture through their pores, being distilled in a retort, did not afford any vinous, but rather an acetous spirit. Boyle of Spirits.

Ache (noun)
Ache. n.s. [ac, Sax. ἄχος, Gr. now generally written ake, and in the plural akes, of one syllable; the primitive manner being preserved chiefly in poetry, for the sake of the measure.] A continued pain. See Ake.
            I'll rack thee with old cramps;Fill all thy bones with aches, make thee roar,That beasts shall tremble at thy din. Shakespeare's Tempest.
A coming show'r your shooting corns presage,Old aches throb, your hollow tooth will urge. Swift's Misc.

Ache (verb)
To Ache v.n. [See Ache.] To be in pain.
Upon this account, our senses are dulled and spent by any extraordinary intention, and our very eyes will ache, if long fixed upon any difficultly discerned object. Glanv. Scepsis, c. xiv.

Achieve
To Achi'eve. v.a. [achever, Fr. to complete.]

 To perform, to finish a design propserously.
Our toils, my friends, are crown'd with sure success:The greater part perform'd, achieve the less. Dryd. Æneid.
 To gain, to obtain.
Experience is by industry achiev'd,And perfected by the swift course of time. Shakespeare's Two Gentlemen of Verona.
Tranio, I burn, I pine, I perish, Tranio,If I achieve not this young modest girl. Shakespeare's Taming the Shrew.
Thou hast achiev'd our liberty, confin'dWithin hell-gates till now. Milton's Par. Lost, b. ii. l. 368.
Show all the spoils by valiant kings achiev'd,And groaning nations by their arms reliev'd. Prior.

Achievement
An Achi'evement. n.s. [achevement, Fr.]

 The performance of an action.
 From every coast that heaven walks about, Have thither come the noble martial crew, That famous hard achievements still pursue. Fairy Queen, b. i.
 The escutcheon, or ensigns armorial, granted to any man for the performance of great actions.
 Then shall the war, and stern debate, and strife Immortal, be the bus'ness of my life; And in thy fane, the dusty spoils among, High on the burnish'd roof, my banner shall be hung; Rank'd with my champions bucklers, and below With arms revers'd, th' achievements of the foe. Dryd. Fab.
Achievement, in the first sense, is derived from achive, as it signifies to perform; in the second, from achieve, as it imports to gain.

Achiever
An Achi'ever. n.s. He that performs; he that obtains what he endeavours after.
A victory is twice itself, when the achiever brings home full numbers. Shakespeare's Much ado about Nothing.

Achor
Achor. n.s. [achor, Lat. ἀχὼρ, Gr. furfur.]
A species of the herpes; it appears with a crusty scab, which causes an itching on the surface of the head, occasioned by a salt sharp serum oozing through the skin. Quincy.

Acid
A'cid. adj. [acidus, Lat. acide, Fr.] Sour, sharp.
 Wild trees last longer than garden trees; and in the same kind, those whose fruit is acid, more than those whose fruit is sweet. Bacon's Natural History, № 585.
 Acid, or sour, proceeds from a salt of the same nature, without mixture of oil; in austere tastes the oily parts have not disentangled themselves from the salts and earthy parts; such is the taste of unripe fruits. Arbuthnot on aliments.
 Liquors and substances are called acids, which being composed of pointed particles, affect the taste in a sharp and piercing manner.  The common way of trying, whether any particular liquor hath in it any particles of this kind, is by mixing it with syrup of violets, which it will turn of a red colour; but if it contains alkaline or lixivial particles, it changes that syrup green. Quincy.

Acidity
Aci'dity. n.s. [from acid.] The quality of being acid; an acid taste; sharpness; sourness.
 Fishes, by the help of a dissolvent liquor, corrode and reduce their meats, skin, bones, and all, into a chylus or cremor; and yet this liquor manifests nothing of acidity to the taste. Ray on the Creation.
 When the taste of the mouth is bitter, it is a sign of a redundance of a bilious alkali, and demands a quite different diet from the case of acidity or sourness. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Acidness
A'cidness. n.s. [from acid.] The quality of being acid; acidity. See Acidity.

Acidulae
Aci'dulæ. n.s. [that is, aquæ acidulæ.]
Medicinal springs impregnated with sharp particles, as all the nitrous, chalybeate, and alum-springs are. Quincy.
 The acidulæ, or medical springs, emit a greater quantity of their minerals than usual; and even the ordinary springs, which were before clear, fresh and limpid, become thick and turbid, and are impregnated with sulphur and other minerals, as long as the earthquake lasts. Woodward's Natural History, p. 4.

Acidulate
To Aci'dulate. v.a. [aciduler, Fr.] To impregnate or tinge with acids in a slight degree.
 The muriatic scurvy is evidently a diet of fresh unsalted things, watery liquors acidulated, farinaceous emollient substances, sour milk, butter, and acid fruits. Arbuthnot on Alim.

Acknowledge
To Ackno'wledge. v.a. [a word formed, as it seems, between the Latin and English, from agnosco, and knowledge, which is deduced from the Saxon, cnaƿan, to know.]

 To own the knowledge of; to own any thing or person in a particular character.
 My people do already know my mind, And will acknowledge you and Jessica, In place of lord Bassanio and myself. Shakesp. Mer. of Ven.
 None that acknowledge God, or providence, Their souls eternity did ever doubt. Sir John Davies.
 To confess; as, a fault.
 For I acknowledge my transgressions; and my sin is ever before me. Psalm li. 3.
 To own; as, a benefit; sometimes with the participle to before the person conferring the benefit.
                                         His spirit Taught them; but they his gifts acknowledg'd not. Par. Lost.
 In the first place, therefore, I thankfully acknowledge to the Almighty power the assistance he has given me in the beginning, and the prosecution of my present studies. Dryden's Æneis.

Acknowledging
Ackno'wledging. adj. [from acknowledge.] Grateful; ready to acknowledge benefits received.
He has shewn his hero acknowledging and ungrateful, compassionate and hard-hearted; but, at the bottom, fickle and self-interested. Dryden's Virgil, Dedication.

Acknowledgment
Ackno'wledgement. n.s. [from acknowledge.]

Concession of any character in another; as, existence, superiority.
The due contemplation of human nature doth, by a necessary connexion and chain of causes, carry us up to the unavoidable acknowledgement of the Deity; because it carries every thinking man to an original of every successive individual. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
Concession of the truth of any position.
Immediately upon the acknowledgement of the christian faith, the eunuch was baptized by Philip. Hooker, b. iii. § 1.
Confession of a fault.

Confession of a benefit received; gratitude.

Act of attestation to any concession; such as homage.
There be many wide countries in Ireland, in which the laws of England were never established, nor any acknowledgement of subjection made. Spenser's State of Ireland.
The second is an acknowledgement to his majesty for the leave of fishing upon his coasts;  and though this may not be grounded upon any treaty, yet, if it appears to be an ancient right on our side, and custom on theirs, not determined or extinguished by any treaty between us, it may with justice be insisted upon. Temple's Miscellanies.

Acme
A'cme. n.s. [ἄκμη, Gr.]
The height of any thing; more especially used to denote the height of a distemper, which is divided into four periods.  1. The arche, the beginning or first attack.  2. Anabasis, the growth.  3.  Acme, the height.    And,  4.  Paracme, which is the declension of the distemper.   Quincy.

Acolothist
Aco'lothist. n.s. [ακολουθέω, Gr.] One of the lowest order in the  Romish  church, whose office is to prepare the elements for the offices, to light the church, &c.
In the Romish communion it is duty, according to the papal law, when the bishop sings mass, to order all the inferior clergy to appear in their proper habits; and to see that all the offices of the church be rightly performed; to ordain the acolothist, to keep the sacred vessels, &c. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Acolyte
A'colyte. n.s. The same with Acolothist.

Aconite
A'conite. n.s. [aconitum, Lat.] Properly the herb wolfs-bane, but commonly used in poetical language for poison in general.
Our land is from the rage of tygers freed, Nor nourishes the lion's angry feed; Nor pois'nous aconite is here produc'd, Or grows unknown, or is, when known, refus'd. Dryd. Virg.
Despair, that aconite does prove, And certain death to others, love, That poison never yet withstood, Does nourish mine, and turns to blood. Granville's Poems.

Acorn
A'corn. n.s. [Æcꞃn, Sax, from ac, an oak, and coꞃn, corn or grain; that is, the grain of the oak.]
The feed or fruit born by the oak.
What roots old-age contracteth into errours, and how such as are but acorns in our younger brows, grow oaks in our older heads, and become inflexible. Brown's Pref. to Vulgar Errours.
Contents with food which nature freely bred, On wildings and on strawberries they fed; Cornels and bramble-berries gave the rest, And falling acorns furnished out a feast. Dryden's Ovid.
He that is nourished by the acorns he picked up under an oak, or the apples he gathered from the trees in the wood, has certainly appropriated them to himself. Locke.

Acousticks
Aco'usticks. n.s. [Ἀκουστικὰ, of ἀκούω, Gr. to hear.]

 The doctrine or theory of sounds.

 Medicines to help the hearing. Quincy.

Acquaint
To Acqua'int. v.a. [accointer, Fr.]

 To make familiar with; applied either to persons or things.
We that acquaint ourselves with ev'ry zone, And pass the tropicks, and behold each pole; When we come home, are to ourselves unknown, And unacquainted still with our own soul. Sir J. Davies.
There with thee, new welcome saint, Like fortunes may her soul acquaint; With thee there clad in radiant sheen. Mil. on March. Win.
Before a man can speak on any subject, it is necessary to be acquainted with it. Locke on Education, § 171.
Acquaint yourselves with things ancient and modern, natural, civil, and religious, domestic and national; things of your own and foreign countries; and, above all, be well acquainted with God and yourselves; learn animal nature, and the workings of your own spirits. Watts's Logick.
 To inform.
But for some other reasons, my grave Sir, Which is not fit you know, I not acquaint My father of this business. Shakespeare's Twelfth Night.
I have lately received a letter from a friend in the country, wherein he acquaints me, that two or three men of the town are got among them, and have brought down particular words and phrases, which were never before in those parts. Tatler.

Acquaintance
Acqua'intance. n.s. [accointance, Fr.]

The state of being acquainted with; familiarity, knowledge. It is applied as well to persons as things, with the particle with.
 Nor was his acquaintance less with the famous poets of his age, than with the nobleman and ladies. Dryd.
Our admiration of a famous man lessens upon our nearer acquaintance with him; we seldom hear of a celebrated person, without a catalogue of some notorious weaknesses and infirmities. Addis. Spectator,  № 256.
Would we be admitted into an acquaintance with God: let us study to resemble him. We must be partakers of a divine nature, in order to partake of this high privilege and alliance. Atterbury's Sermons.
Familiar knowledge, simply without preposition.
                     Brave soldier, pardon me, That any accent breaking from my tongue, Should 'scape the true acquaintance of mine ear. Shak. K. John.
This keeps the understanding long in converse with an object, and long converse brings acquaintance. South's Sermons.
In what manner he lived with those who were of his neighbourhood and acquaintance, how obliging his carriage was to them, what kind offices he did, and was always ready to do them, I forbear particularly to say. Atterbury's Sermons.
A slight or initial knowledge, short of friendship, as applied to persons.
I hope I am pretty near seeing you, and therefore I would cultivate an acquaintance; because if you do not know me when we meet, you need only keep one of my letters, and compare it with my face; for my face and letters are counterparts of my heart. Swift to Pope, Letter xii.
A long noviciate of acquaintance should precede the vows of friendship. Bolingbroke.
The person with whom we are acquainted; he of whom we have some knowledge, without intimacy of friendship.
In this sense, the plural is, in some authors, acquaintance, in others acquaintances.
But she, all vow'd unto the red-cross knight, His wand'ring peril closely did lament, Ne in this new acquaintance could delight, But her dear heart with anguish did torment. F. Queen, b. i.
That young men travel under some tutor, I allow well, so that he be such a one that may be able to tell them, what acquaintances they are to seek, what exercises or discipline the place yieldeth. Bacon, Essay xix.
This, my lord, has justly acquired you as many friends, as there are persons who have the honour to be known to you; meer acquaintance you have none, you have drawn them all into a nearer line; and they who have conversed with you, are for ever after inviolably yours. Dryd. Juvenal, Dedicat.
We see he is ashamed of his nearest acquaintances. Boyle against Bentley.

Acquainted
Acqua'inted. [from acquaint.] Familiar, well known; not new.
Now call we our high court of parliament; That war or peace, or both at once, may be As things acquainted and familiar to us. Shakesp. Henry IV.

Acquest
Acqu'est. n.s. [acquest, Fr., from acquerir, written by some acquist, with a view to the word acquire, or acquisita.] Attachment, acquisition; the thing gained.
New acquests are more burden than strength. Bac. Hen. VII.
Mud, reposed near the ostia of those rivers, makes continual additions to the land, thereby excluding the sea, and preserving these shells as trophies and signs of its new acquests and encroachments. Woodward's Nat. Hist. p. i.

Acquiesce
To Acquie'sce. v.n. [acquiescer, Fr. acquiescere, Lat.] To rest in, or remain satisfied with, without opposition or discontent.
Neither a bare approbation of, nor a mere wishing, nor unactive complacency in; nor, lastly, a natural inclination to things virtuous and good, can pass before God for a man's willing of such things; and, consequently, if men, upon this account, will needs take up and acquiesce in an airy ungrounded persuasion, that they will those things which really they not will, they fall thereby into a gross and fatal delusion. South.
He hath employed his transcendent wisdom and power, that by these he might make way for his benignity, as the end wherein they ultimately acquiesce. Grew's Cosmolog. Sac. b. i.

Acquiescence
Acquie'scence. n.s. [from acquiesce.]

A silent appearance of consent, distinguished on one side from avowed consent, on the other from opposition.
Neither from any of the nobility, nor of the clergy, who were thought most averse from it, there appeared any sign of contradiction to that; but an entire acquiescence in all the bishops thought fit to do. Clarendon.
Satisfaction, rest, content.
Many indeed have given over their pursuits after fame, either from disappointment, or from experience of the little pleasure which attends it, or the better informations or natural coldness of old-age; but seldom from a full satisfaction and acquiescence in their present enjoyments of it. Addis. Spectator, № 256.
Submission.
The greatest part of the world take up their persuasions concerning good and evil, by an implicit faith, and a full acquiescence in the word of those, who shall represent things to them under these characters. South's Sermons.

Acquirable
Acqui'rable. adj. [from acquire.] That which may be acquired or obtained; attainable.
Those rational instincts, the connate principles engraven in the human soul, though they are truths acquirable and deducible by rational consequence and argumentation, yet they seem to be inscribed in the very crasis and texture of the soul, antecedent to any acquisition by industry or the exercise of the discursive faculty in man. Hales's Origin of Mankind.
If the powers of cogitation and volition, and sensation, are neither inherent in matter as such, nor acquirable to matter by any motion or modification of it; it necessarily follows, that they proceed from some cogitative substance, some incorporeal inhabitant within us, which we call spirit and soul. Bentley.

Acquire
To Acqui're. v.a. [acquerir, Fr. acquiro, Lat.] To gain by one's own labour or power; to obtain what is not received from nature, or transmitted by inheritance.
I've done enough. A lower place not well, May make too great an act: for learn this, Silius, Better to leave undone, than by our deed Acquire too high a fame, while he, we serve, 's away. Shakespeare's Antony and Cleopatra.

Acquired
Acqu'ired. particip. adj. [from acquire.] Gained by one's self, in opposition to those things which are bestowed by nature.
We are seldom at ease,  and free enough from the solicitation of our natural or adopted desires; but a constant succession of uneasiness, out of that stock, which natural wants, or acquired habits, have heaped up, take the will in their turns. Locke.

Acquirement
An Acqui'rement. n.s. [from acquire.] That which is acquired; gain; attainment. The word may be properly used in opposition to the gifts of nature.
These his acquirements, by industry, were exceedingly both enriched and enlarged by many excellent endowments of nature. Hayward on Edward VI.
By a content and acquiescence in every species of truth, we embrace the shadow thereof: or so much as may palliate its just and substantial acquirements. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i.
It is very difficult to lay down rules for the acquirement of such a taste as that I am here speaking of. The faculty must, in some degree, be born with us. Addison. Spectator, № 409.

Acquirer
An Acqui'rer. n.s. [from acquire.] The person that acquires; a gainer.

Acquisition
Acquisi'tion. n.s. [acquisitio, Lat.]

The act of acquiring or gaining.
Each man has but a limited right to the good things of the world; and the natural allowed way, by which he is to compass the possession of these things, is by his own industrious acquisition of them. South's Sermons.
The thing gained; acquirement.
                     Great Sir, all acquisition Of glory as of empire, here I lay before Your royal feet. Denham's Sophy.
A state can never arrive to its period in a more deplorable crisis, than when some prince lies hovering like a vulture to dismember its dying carcase; by which means it becomes only an acquisition to some mighty monarchy, without hopes of a resurrection. Swift on the Dissensions in Athens and Rome.

Acquisitive
Acqu'isitive. adj. [acquisitivus, Lat.] That which is acquired or gained.
He died not in his acquisitive but in his native soil; nature herself, as it were, claiming a final interest in his body, when fortune had done with him. Wotton.

Acquist
Acqu'ist. n.s. [see Acquest.] Acquirement; attainment; gain.
His servant here with new acquist Of true experience from this great event, With peace and consolation hath dismist. M. Sampson Agon.

Acquit
To Acqu'it. v.a. [acquiter, Fr.  See QUIT.]

To set free.
Ne do I wish (for wishing were but vain) To be acquit from my continual smart; But joy her thrall for ever to remain, And yield for pledge my poor captived heart. Spens. Son. xlii.
To clear from a charge of guilt; to absolve; opposed to condemn, either simply with an accusative, as, the jury acquitted him, or with the particles from or of, which is more common, before the crime.
If I sin, then thou markest me, and thou wilt  not acquit me from mine iniquity. Job, x. 14.
By the suffrage of the most and best, he is already acquitted, and, by the sentence of some, condemned. Dryden's Conquest of Granada, Dedic.
He that judges, without informing himself to the utmost that he is capable, cannot acquit himself of judging amiss. Locke.
Neither do I reflect upon the memory of his majesty, whom I entirely acquit of any imputation upon this matter. Swift.
To clear from any obligation.
Steady to my principles, and not dispirited with my afflictions, I have, by the blessing of God on my endeavours, overcome all difficulties; and, in some measure, acquitted myself of the debt which I owed the publick, when I undertook this work. Dryden.
In a similar sense, it is said, The man has acquitted himself well; that is, he discharged his duty.

Acquitment
Acqu'itment. n.s. [from acquit.] The state of being acquitted; or act of acquitting.
The word imports properly an acquitment or discharge of a man upon some precedent accusation, and a full trial and cognizance of his cause had thereupon. South's Sermons.

Acquittal
Acqu'ittal. n.s. In law, is a deliverance and setting free from the suspicion or guiltiness of an offence. Cowell.
The constant design of both these orators, was to drive some one particular point, either the condemnation or acquittal of an accused person, a persuasive to war, and the like. Swift.

Acquittance (noun)
Acqu'ittance. n.s. [from acquit.]

The act of discharging from a debt.
                                    But soon shall find Forbearance, no acquittance, ere day end Justice shall not return, as beauty, scorn’d. Par. Lost, b. x.
A writing testifying the receipt of a debt.
                            You can produce acquittances For such a sum, from special officers Of Charles his father. Shakesp. Love‘s Labour Lost.
They quickly pay their debt, and then Take no acquittances, but pay again. Donne.
They had got a worse trick than that; the same man bought and sold to himself, paid the money, and gave the acquittance. Arbuthnot's Hist. of John Bull.

Acquittance (verb)
To Acqu'ittance. v.n. To procure an acquittance; to acquit; a word not in present use.
But if black scandal and foul-fac'd reproach Attend the sequel of your imposition, Your meer enforcement shall acquittance me From all the impure blots and stains thereof. Shak. Rich. III.

Acre
A'cre. n.s. [Æcꞃ, Sax.] A quantity of land containing in length forty perches, and four in breadth, or four thousand eight hundred and forty square yards. Dict.
Search ev'ry acre in the high-grown ﬁeld, And bring him to our eye. Shakespeare's K. Lear.

Acrid
A'crid. adj. [acer, Lat.] Of a hot biting taste; bitter; so as to leave a painful heat upon the organs of taste.
Bitter and acrid differ only by the sharp particles of the first, being involved in a greater quantity of oil than those of the last. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Acrimonious
Acrimo'nious. adj. Abounding with acrimony; sharp; corrosive.
If gall cannot be rendered acrimonious and bitter of itself, then whatever acrimony or amaritude redounds in it, must be from the admixture of melancholy. Harvey on Consumptions.

Acrimony
A'crimony. n.s. [acrimonia, Lat.]

Sharpness, corrosiveness.
There be plants that have a milk in them when they are cut; as, figs, old lettuce, sow-thistles, spurge, &c. The cause may be an inception of putrefaction: for those milks have all an acrimony, though one would think they should be lenitive. Bacon‘s Natural History, № 639.
The chymists define salt, from some of its properties, to be a body fusible in the ﬁre, congealable again by cold into brittle glebes or crystals; soluble in water, so as to disappear, not malleable, and having something in it which affects the organs of taste with a sensation of acrimony or sharpness. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
Sharpness of temper, severity, bitterness of thought or language.
This made John the Baptist set himself, with so much acrimony and indignation, to baffle this senseless arrogant conceit of theirs, which made them huff at the doctrine of repentance, as a thing below them, and not at all belonging to them. South.

Acritude
A'critude. n.s. [from acrid.] An acrid taste; a biting heat on the palate.
Green vitriol, mixed with some rays of a pale blue, from the same place; with its astringent and sweetish tastes, is joined some acritude. Grew's Musæum.

Acroamatical
Acroama'tical. adj. [ἀκροάομαι, Gr. I bear.] Of or pertaining to deep learning; the opposite of exoterical.

Acroaticks
Acroa'ticks. n.s. [Ἀκροατικα, Gr.] Aristotle's lectures on the more nice and principal parts of philosophy, to whom none but friends and scholars were admitted by him.

Acronycal
Acro'nycal. adj. [from ἄκρος, summus and νὺξ, nox; importing the beginning of night.] A term of astronomy, applied to the stars, of which the rising and setting is called acronycal, when they either appear above or sink below the horizon at the time of sunset. It is opposed to cosmical.

Acronycally
Acro'nycally. adv. [from acronycal.] At the acronycal time.
He is tempestuous in the summer, when he rises heliacally, and rainy in the winter, when he rises acronycally. Dryden's Æneid, Dedicat.

Acrospire
A'crospire. n.s. [from ἄκρος and σπεῖρα, Gr.] A shoot or sprout from the end of seeds before they are put in the ground.
 Many corns will smilt, or have their pulp turned into a substance like thick cream; and most of those which come without extraordinary pains, will send forth their substance in an acrospire. Mort. Husbandry.

Acrospired
A'crospired. part.adj. Having sprouts, or having shot out.
 For want of turning, when the malt is spread on the floor, it comes and sprouts at both ends, which is called acrospired, and is fit only for swine. Mort. Husbandry.

Across
Acro'ss. adv. [from a for at, or the French à, as it is used in à travers, and cross.] Athwart, laid over something so as to cross it.
The harp hath the concave not along the strings, but across the strings; and no harp hath the sound so melting and prolonged as the Irish harp. Bacon's Natural History.  № 225.
This view'd, but not enjoy'd, with arms across,
He stood, reflecting on his country's loss. Dryd. Fables.
There is a set of artisans, who, by the help of several poles, which they lay across each others shoulders, build themselves up into a kind of pyramid; so that you see a pile of men in the air of four or five rows rising one above another. Addis. on Italy.

Acrostick (adjective)
Acro'stick. adj.

 That which relates to an acrostick.

 That which contains acrosticks.
 Leave writing plays, and choose for thy command Some peaceful province in acrostick land: There thou may’st wings display, and altars raise, And torture one poor word ten thousand ways. Dryden.

Acrostick (noun)
An Acro'stick. n.s. [from ἄκρος and στίχος, Gr.] A poem in which the first letter of every line being taken, makes up the name of the person or thing on which the poem is written.

Acroters
Acroters, or Acroteria. n.s. [In architecture; from ἄκρον, Gr. the extremity of any body.] Little pedestals without bases, placed at the middle and the two extremes of pediments, sometimes serving to support statues.

Act (noun)
Act. n.s. [actum, Lat.]

Something done; a deed; an exploit, whether good or ill.
 I've done enough. A lower place, not well, May make too great an act: for learn this, Silius, Better to leave undone than by our deed Acquire too high a fame, when he, we serve, 's away. Shakespeare's Antony and Cleopatra.
 The conscious wretch must all his acts reveal; Loth to confess, unable to conceal; From the first moment of his vital breath, To his last hour of unrepenting death. Dryd. Æneid vi.
 Agency; the power of producing an effect.
                     I will try the forces Of these thy compounds on such creatures as We count not worth the hanging; but none human; To try the vigour of them, and apply Allayments to their act; and by them gather Their several virtues and effects. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
 Action; the performance of exploits; production of effects.
 'Tis so much in your nature to do good, that your life is but one continued act of placing benefits on many; as the sun is always carrying his light to some part or other of the world. Dryden's Fables, Dedicat.
 Who forth from nothing caIl'd this comely frame, His will and act, his word and work the same. Prior.
 The doing of some particular thing; a step taken; a measure executed.
                      This act persuades me, That this remotion of the duke and her, Is practice only. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 A state of action.
 The seeds of herbs and plants at the first are not in act, but in possibility that which they afterwards grow to be. Hooker.
 God alone excepted, who actually and everlastingly is whatsoever he may be, and which cannot hereafter be that which now he is not; all other things besides are somewhat in possibility, which as yet they are not in act. Hooker, b. i.
                      Sure they're conscious Of some intended mischief, and are ﬂed To put it into act. Denham's Sophy.
 Her legs were buskin'd, and the left before; In act to shoot, a silver bow she bore. Dryd. Fables.
 A part of a play, during which the action proceeds without interruption.
 Many never doubt but the whole condition required by Christ, the repentance he came to preach, will, in that last scene of their last act, immediately before the exit, be as opportunely and acceptably performed, as at any other point of their lives. Hammond's Fundamentals.
 Five acts are the just measure of a play. Roscommon.
 A decree of a court of justice, or edict of a legislature.
 They make edicts for usury to support usurers, repeal daily any wholesome act established against the rich, and provide more piercing statutes daily to chain up and restrain the poor. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
 You that are king, though he do wear the crown, Have caus'd him, by new act of parliament, To blot out me. Shakespeare's Henry VI. p. iii.
 Record of judicial proceedings.
 Judicial acts are all those matters, which relate to judicial proceedings; and being reduced into writing by a publick notary, are recorded by the authority of the judge. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Act (verb)
To Act. v.a. [ago, actum, Lat.]

 To be in action, not to rest.
 He hangs between in doubt to act or rest. Pope's Ess. on Man.
 To perform the proper functions.
 Albeit the will is not capable of being compelled to any of its actings, yet it is capable of being made to act with more or less difficulty, according to the different impressions it receives from motives or objects. South's Sermons.
 To practise the arts or duties of life; to conduct one's self.
 'Tis plain, that she who, for a kingdom now, Would sacrifice her love, and break her vow, Not out of love, but interest, acts alone, And would, ev'n in my arms, lie thinking of a throne. Dryden's Conquest of Granada.
 The desire of happiness, and the constraint it puts upon us to act for it, no body accounts an abridgment of liberty. Locke.
 The splendour of his office, is the token of that sacred character which he inwardly bears: and one of these ought constantly to put him in mind of the other, and excite him to act up to it, through the whole course of his administration. Atterbury's Sermons.
 It is our part and duty to co-operate with this grace, vigorously to exert those powers, and act up to those advantages to which it restores us.  He has given eyes to the blind, and feet to the lame. Roger's Sermons.
 To bear a borrowed character, as, a stage-player.
 Honour and shame from no condition rise; Act well your part, there all the honour lies. Pope's Essay on Man, cp. 4. l. 193.
 To counterfeit; to feign by action.
 His former trembling once again renew'd, With acted fear the villain thus pursu'd. Dryd. Æneid. 2.
 To produce effects in some passive subject.
 Hence 'tis we wait the wond'rous cause to find How body acts upon impassive mind. Garth's Dispensary.
 The stomach, the intestines, the muscles of the lower belly, all act upon the aliment; besides, the chyle is not sucked, but squeezed into the mouths of the lacteals, by the action of the fibres of the guts. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 To actuate; to put in motion; to regulate the movements.
 Most people in the world are acted by levity and humour, by strange and irrational changes.  South's Sermons.
 Perhaps they are as proud as Lucifer, as covetous as Demas, as false as Judas, and, in the whole course of their conversation, act, and are acted, not by devotion, but design. Idem.
 We suppose two distinct incommunicable consciousnesses acting the same body, the one constantly by day, the other by night; and, on the other side, the same consciousness acting by intervals two distinct bodies. Locke.

Action
A'ction. n.s. [action, Fr.  actio Lat.]

 The quality or state of acting, opposite to rest.
 O noble English, that could entertain With half their forces the full power of France; And let another half stand laughing by, All out of work, and cold for action. Shakesp. Henry V.
 An act or thing done; a deed.
                      This action, I now go on, Is for my better grace. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
 God never accepts a good inclination instead of a good action, where that action may he done; nay, so much the contrary, that, if a good inclination be not seconded by a good action, the want of that action is made so much the more criminal and inexcusable. South's Sermons.
 Agency, operation.
 It is better therefore, that the earth should move about its own center, and make those useful vicissitudes of night and day, than expose always the same side to the action of the sun. Bentley.
 He has settled laws, and laid down rules, conformable to which natural bodies are governed in their actions upon one another. Cheyne's Philosophical Principles.
 The series of events represented in a fable.
 This action should have three qualifications. First, it should be but one action; secondly, it should be an entire action; and, thirdly, it should be a great action. Addis. Spectat. № 267.
 Gesticulation; the accordance of the motions of the body, with the words spoken; a part of oratory.
 — He that speaks doth gripe the hearer’s wrist, While he that hears makes fearful action With wrinkled brows. Shakesp. King John.
 Our oratours are observed to make use of less gesture or action than those of other countries. Addison. Spectat. № 407.
 [In law.] It is used with the preposition against before the person, and for before the thing.
 Actions are personal, real , and mixt: action personal belongs to a man against another, by reason of any contract, offence, or cause, of like force with a contract or offence made or done by him or some other, for whose fact he is to answer. Action real is given to any man against another, that possesses the thing required or sued for in his own name, and no other man's. Action mixt is that which lies as well against or for the thing which we seek, as against the person that hath it; called mixt, because it hath a mixt respect both to the thing and to the person.
 Action is divided into civil, penal, and mixt. Action civil is that which tends only to the recovery of that which is due to us; as, a sum of money formerly lent. Action penal is that which aims at some penalty or punishment in the party sued, be it corporal or pecuniary: as, in common law, the next friends of a man feloniously slain shall pursue the law against the murderer. Action mixt is that which seeks both the thing whereof we are deprived, and a penalty also for the unjust detaining of the same.
 Action upon the case, is an action given for redress of wrongs done without force against any man, by law not specially provided for.
 Action upon the statute, is an action brought against a man upon breach of a statute. Cowell.
 There was never man could have a juster action against filthy fortune than I, since all other things being granted me, her blindness is the only lett. Sidney.
                  For our reward then, First, all our debts are paid; dangers of law, Actions, decrees, judgments, against us quitted. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
 In the plural, in France, the same as stocks in England.

Action-taking
A'ction-taking. adj. Accustomed to resent by means of law; litigious.
A knave, a rascal, an eater of broken meats, a filthy worsted-stocking knave; a lily-liver'd action-taking knave. Shakespeare's King Lear.

Actionable
A'ctionable. adj. [from action.] That which admits an action in law to be brought against it; punishable.
After he had been thus, as a man would think, quite extinguished, his process was formed; whereby he was found guilty of nought else, that I could learn, which was actionable, but of ambition. Howel's Vocal Forest.

Actionary
A'ctionary, or A'ctionist. n.s. [from action.] One that has a share in actions or stocks.

Actitation
Actita'tion. n.s. [from actito, Lat.] Action quick and frequent.  Dict.

Activate
To A'ctivate. v.a. [from active.] To make active. This word is perhaps used only by the author alleged.
 As snow and ice, especially being holpen, and their cold activated by nitre or salt, will turn water into ice, and that in a few hours; so it may be, it will turn wood or stiff clay into stone, in longer time. Bacon's Nat. History, № 83.

Active
A'ctive. adj. [activus, Lat.]

 That which has the power or quality of acting.
 These particles have not only a vis inertiæ, accompanied with such passive laws of motion, as naturally result from that force, but also they are moved by certain active principles, such as that of gravity, and that which causes fermentation, and the cohesion of bodies. Newton's Opticks.
 That which acts, opposed to passive, or that which suffers.
 — When an even flame two hearts did touch, His office was indulgently to fit Actives to passives, correspondency Only his subject was. Donne.
 If you think that by multiplying the additaments in the same proportion, that you multiply the ore, the work will follow, you may be deceived: for quantity in the passive will add more resistance than the quantity in the active will add force. Bacon's Physical Remains.
 Busy, engaged in action; opposed to idle or sedentary, or any state of which the duties are performed only by the mental powers.
 'Tis virtuous action that must praise bring forth, Without which, slow advice is little worth; Yet they who give good counsel, praise deserve, Though in the active part they cannot serve. Sir. J. Denham.
 Practical; not merely theoretical.
 The world hath had in these men fresh experience, how dangerous such active errors are. Hooker, Preface.
 Nimble; agile; quick.
 Some bend the stubborn bow for victory; And some with darts their active sinews try. Dryd. Æn. vii.
 In grammar.
A verb active is that which signifies action, as does, I teach. Clarke's Latin Grammar.

Actively
A'ctively. adv. [from active.] In an active manner; busily; nimbly. In an active signification; as, the word is used actively.

Activeness
A'ctiveness. n.s. [from active.] The quality of being active; quickness; nimbleness. This is a word more rarely used than activity.
What strange agility and activeness do our common tumblers and dancers on the rope attain to, by continual exercise? Wilkins's Mathematical Magick.

Activity
A'ctivity. n.s. [from active.] The quality of being active, applied either to things or persons.
 Salt put to ice, as in the producing of the artificial ice, increaseth the activity of cold. Bacon's Natural History № 73.
Our adversary will not be idle, though we are; he watches every turn of our soul, and incident of our life; and, if we remit our activity, will take advantage of our indolence. Rogers.

Actor
A'ctor. n.s. [actor, Lat.]

 He that acts, or performs any thing.
 The virtues of either age may correct the defects of both: and good for succession, that young men may be learners, while men in age are actors. Bacon, Essay civ.
 He, who writes an Encomium Neronis, if he does it heartily, is himself but a transcript of Nero in his mind, and would, no doubt, gladly enough see such pranks, as he was famous for, acted again, though he dares not be the actor of them himself. South's Sermons.
 He that personates a character; a stage-player.
                                 Would you have Such an Herculean actor in the scene, And not this hydra? They must sweat no less To fit their properties, than t'express their parts. Ben Johnson's Catiline.
 When a good actor doth his part present, In every act he our attention draws, That at the last he may find just applause. Sir J. Denham.
 These false beauties of the stage are no more lasting than a rain-bow; when the actor ceases to shine upon them, when he gilds them no longer with his reflection, they vanish in a twinkling. Dryd. Spanish Friar, Dedication.

Actress
A'ctress. n.s. [actrice, Fr.]

 She that performs any thing.
 Virgil has, indeed, admitted Fame as an actress in the Æneid; but the part she acts is very short, and none of the most admired circumstances of that divine work. Addis. Spect.
 A woman that plays on the stage.
              We sprights have just such natures, We had, for all the world, when human creatures; And therefore I that was an actress here, Play all my tricks in hell, a goblin there. Dryd. Tyr. Love.

Actual
A'ctual. adj. [actuel, Fr.]

 That which comprises action.
 In this slumbry agitation, besides her walking and other actual performances, what, at any time, have you heard her say? Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 Really in act; not merely potential.
                             Sin, there in pow'r before Once actual; now in body, and to dwell Habitual habitant. Milt. Paradise Lost, b. x. l. 587.
 In act; not purely in speculation.
 For he that but conceives a crime in thought, Contracts the danger of an actual fault: Then what must he expect, that still proceeds To finish sin, and work up thoughts to deeds? Dryden's Juvenal, Sat. xiii.

Actuality
Actua'lity. n.s. [from actual.] The state of being actual.
The actuality of these spiritual qualities is thus imprisoned, though their potentiality be not quite destroyed; and thus a crass, extended, impenetrable, passive, divisible, unintelligent substance is generated, which we call matter. Cheyn. Phil. Prin.

Actually
A'ctually. adv. [from actual.] In act; in effect; really.
All mankind acknowledge themselves able and sufficient to do many things, which actually they never do. South.
Read one of the chronicles written by an author of this frame of mind, and you will think you were reading a history of the kings of Israel or Judah, where the historians were actually inspired, and where, by a particular scheme of providence, the kings were distinguished by judgments or blessings, according as they promoted idolatry, or the worship of the true God. Addison. Spectator, № 483.
Though our temporal prospects should be full of danger, or though the days of sorrow should actually overtake us, yet still we must repose our selves on God. Rogers, Sermon xix.

Actualness
A'ctualness. n.s. [from actual.] The quality of being actual.

Actuary
A'ctuary. n.s. [actuarius, Lat.] The register who compiles the minutes of the proceedings of a court; a term of the civil law.
Suppose the judge should say, that he would have the keeping of the acts of court remain with him, and the notary will have the custody of them with himself: certainly, in this case, the actuary or writer of them ought to be preferred. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Actuate (adjective)
A'ctuate. adj. [from the verb To actuate.] Put into action; animated; brought into effect.
The active informations of the intellect, filling the passive reception of the will, like form closing with matter, grew actuate into a third and distinct perfection of practice. South.

Actuate (verb)
To A'ctuate. v.a. [from ago, actum, Lat.] To put into action; to invigorate or encrease the powers of motion.
The light made by this animal depends upon a living spirit, and seems, by some vital irradiation, to be actuated into this lustre. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii. c. 6.
Such is every man, who has not actuated the grace given him, to the subduing of every reigning sin. Decay of Piety.
Men of the greatest abilities are most fired with ambition; and, on the contrary, mean and narrow minds are the least actuated by it. Addison's Spectator № 255.
Our passions are the springs which actuate the powers of our nature. Rogers, Sermon iii.

Actuose
Actuo'se. adj. [from act.] That which hath strong powers of action; a word little used.

Acuate
To A'cuate. v.a. [acuo, Lat.] To sharpen, to invigorate with any powers of sharpness.

Aculeate
Acu'leate. adj. [aculeatus, Lat.] That which has a point or sting; prickly; that which terminates in a sharp point.

Acumen
Acu'men. n.s. [Lat.] A sharp point; ﬁguratively, quickness of intellects.
The word was much affected by the learned Aristarchus in common conversation, to signify genius or natural acumen. Pope's Dunciad, b. iv. notes.

Acuminated
Acu'minated. particip.adj. Ending in a point; sharp-pointed.
This is not acuminated and pointed, as in the rest, but seemeth, as it were, cut off. Brown‘s Vulgar Errours, b. vii. c. 14.
I appropriate this word, Noli me tangere, to a small round acuminated tubercle, which hath not much pain, unless it be touched or rubbed, or otherways exasperated by topicks. Wiseman's Surgery.

Acute
Acu'te. adj. [acutus, Lat.]

 Sharp, ending in a point; opposed to obtuse or blunt.
 Having the ideas of an obtuse and an acute angled triangle, both drawn from equal bases and between parallels, I can, by intuitive knowledge, perceive the one not to be the other, but cannot that way know whether they be equal. Locke.
 In a ﬁgurative sense applied to men; ingenious; penetrating; opposed to dull or stupid.
 The acute and ingenious author, among many very ﬁne thoughts, and uncommon reflections, has started the notion of seeing all things in God. Locke.
 Spoken of the senses, vigorous; powerful in operation.
 Were our senses altered, and made much quicker and acuter, the appearance and outward scheme of things would have quite another face to us. Locke.
 Acute disease. Any disease, which is attended with an increased velocity of blood, and terminates in a few days. Quincy.

 Acute accent; that which raises or sharpens the voice.

Acutely
Acu'tely. adv. [from acute.] After an acute manner; sharply; it is used as well in the ﬁgurative as primitive sense.
He that will look into many parts of Asia and America, will ﬁnd men reason there, perhaps, as acutely as himself, who yet never heard of a syllogism. Locke.

Acuteness
Acu'teness. n.s. [from acute, which see.]

 Sharpness.

 Force of intellects.
 They would not be so apt to think, that there could be nothing added to the acuteness and penetration of their understandings. Locke.
 Quickness and vigour of senses.
 If eyes so framed could not view at once the hand and the hour-plate, their owner could not be beneﬁted by that acuteness; which, whilst it discovered the secret contrivance of the machine, made him lose its use. Locke.
 Violence and speedy crisis of a malady.
 We apply present remedies according to indications, respecting rather the acuteness of the disease, and precipitancy of the occasion, than the rising and setting of stars. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 13.
 Sharpness of sound.
 This acuteness of sound will shew, that whilst, to the eye, the bell seems to be at rest, yet the minute parts of it continue in a very brisk motion, without which they could not strike the air. Boyle.

Adacted
Ada'cted. participial adj. [adactus, Lat.] Driven by force; a word little used. Dict.

Adage
A'dage. n.s. [adagium, Lat.] A maxim handed down from antiquity; a proverb.
Shallow unimproved intellects, that are conﬁdent pretenders to certainty; as if, contrary to the adage, science had no friend but ignorance. Glanville's Scepsis Scientiﬁca, c. 2.
Fine fruits of learning! old ambitious fool, Dar’st thou apply that adage of the school;  As if 'tis nothing worth that lies conceal'd; And science is not science, till reveal’d? Dryd. Pers. Sat. i.

Adagio
Ada'gio. n.s. [Italian.] A term used by musicians, to mark a slow time.

Adam's-apple
A'dam's-apple. n.s. [in anatomy.] A prominent part of the throat.

Adamant
A'damant. n.s. [adamas, Lat. from α and δάμνω, Gr. that is, insuperable, infrangible.]

 A stone, imagined by writers, of impenetrable hardness.
 So great a fear my name amongst them spread, That they suppos’d I could rend bars of steel, And spurn in pieces posts of adamant. Shakesp. Henry V.
 Satan, with vast and haughty strides advanc'd, Came tow’ring, arm’d in adamant, and gold. Parad. Lost.
                                 Eternal Deities, Who rule the world with absolute decrees, And write whatever time shall bring to pass, With pens of adamant, on plates of brass. Dryden's Fables.
The diamond.
 Hardness, wherein some stones exceed all other bodies, and among them the adamant all other stones, being exalted to that degree thereof, that art in vain endeavours to counterfeit it, the factitious stones of chymists, in imitation, being easily detected by an orinary lapidist. Ray on the Creation.
 Adamant is taken for the loadstone.
 Let him change his lodging from one end and part of the town to another, which is a great adamant of acquaintance. Bacon, Essay xix.
You draw me, you hard-hearted adamant! But yet you draw not iron; for my heart Is true as steel. Shakespeare's Midsum Night's Dream.

Adamantean
Adamante'an. adj. [from adamant.] Hard as adamant.
He ran on embattel'd armies clad in iron,  And weaponless himself,
Made arms ridiculous, useless the forgery Of brazen shield and spear, the hammer'd cuirass, Chalybean temper'd steel, and frock of mail Adamantean proof. Milton's Samson Agonistes, l. 134.
This word occurs perhaps only in this passage.

Adamantine
Adama'ntine. adj. [adamantinus, Lat.]

Made of adamant.
 Wide is the fronting gate, and rais’d on high With adamantine columns, threats the sky. Dryd. Æn. vi.
Having the qualities of adamant; as, hardness, indissolubility.
 Could Eve's weak hand, extended to the tree, In sunder rend that adamantine chain, Whose golden links, effects and causes be, And which to God's own chair doth ﬁx'd remain? Davies.
 An eternal sterility must have possessed the world, where all things had been fixed and fastened everlastingly with the adamantine chains of speciﬁc gravity; if the Almighty had not spoken and said, Let the earth bring forth grass, the herb yielding seed, and the fruit-tree yielding fruit after its kind; and it was so. Bentley's Sermons.
In adamantine chains shall death be bound, And hell's grim tyrant feel th' eternal wound. Pope's Messiah.
 Tho’ adamantine bonds the chief restrain, The dire restraint his wisdom will defeat, And soon restore him to his regal seat. Pope's Odyssey, b. i.

Adapt
To Ada'pt. v.a. [adopto, Lat.] To ﬁt one thing to another; to suit; to proportion.
'Tis true, but let it not be known, My eyes are somewhat dimmish grown; For nature, always in the right, To your decays adapts my sight. Swift's Miscellanies.
It is not enough that nothing offends the ear, but a good poet will adapt the very sounds, as well as words, to the things he treats of. Pope's Letters.

Adaptation
Adapta'tion. n.s. [from adapt.] The act of fitting one thing to another; the fitness of one thing to another.
Some species there be of middle natures, that is, of bird and beast, as batts; yet are their parts so set together, that we cannot define the beginning or end of either, there being a commixtion of both, rather than adaptation or cement of the one unto the other. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii. c. ii.
Their adhesion may be in part ascribed, either to some elastical motion in the pressed glass, or to the exquisite adaptation of the almost numberless, though very small, asperities of the one, and the numerous little cavities of the other; whereby the surfaces do lock in with one another, or are, as it were, clasped together. Boyle.

Adaption
Ada'ption. n.s. [from adapt.] The act of ﬁtting.
 It were alone a sufficient work to shew all the necessities, the wise contrivances, and prudent adaptions, of these admirable machines, for the beneﬁt of the whole. Cheyne's Phil. Princip.

Adcorporate
To Adco'rporate. v.a. [from ad and corpus.] To unite one body with another; more usually wrote accorporate; which see.

Add
To Add. v.a. [addo, Lat.]

To join something to that which was before.
Mark if his birth makes any difference; If to his words it adds one grain of sense. Dryd. Conq. of Gran.
They, whose muses have the highest ﬂown, Add not to his immortal memory, But do an act of friendship to their own. Dryd.
To perform the mental operation of adding one number or conception to another.
 Whatsoever positive ideas man has in his mind, of any quantity, he can repeat it, and add it to the former, as easily as he can add together the ideas of two days, or two years. Locke.

Addable
A'ddable. adj. [from add.] That which may be added. Addible is more proper.
The first number in every addition is called the addable number, the other, the number or numbers added, and the number invented by the addition, the aggregate or sum. Cocker's Arithmetick.

Addecimate
To Adde'cimate. v.a. [addecimo, Lat.] To take or ascertain tithes. Dict.

Addeem
To Adde'em. v.a. [from deem.] To esteem; to account. This word is now out of use.
She scorns to be addeem’d so worthless-base, As to be mov'd to such an infamy. Daniel's Civil Wars.

Adder
A'dder. n.s. [Æꞇꞇꞃ, Æꞇꞇoꞃ, Naꝺꝺꞃ, as it seems from ıꞇꞇꞃ, Sax. poison.] A serpent, a viper, a poisonous reptile; perhaps of any species. In common language, adders and snakes are not the same.
Or is the adder better than the eel, Because his painted skin contents the eye. Shak. As you like it.
An adder did it; for, with doubler tongue Than thine, thou serpent, never adder stung. Shakespeare's Midsum. Night's Dream.
The adder teaches us where to strike, by her curious and fearful defending of her head. Taylor of living holy.

Adder's-grass
A'dder's-grass. n.s. The name of a plant, imagined by Skinner to be so named, because serpents lurk about it.

Adder's-tongue
A'dder's-tongue. n.s. [ophioglossum, Lat.] The name of an herb.
It hath no visible ﬂower; but the seeds are produced on a spike, which resembles a serpent's tongue; which seed is contained in many longitudinal cells, which open, and cast forth the seeds when ripe.  It grows wild in moist meadows, and is used in medicine. Millar.
The most common simples with us in England, are comfrey, bugle, agrimony, sanicle, paul's-betony, fluellin, periwinkle, adder's-tongue. Wiseman's Surgery.

Adder's-wort
A'dder's-wort. n.s. An herb so named, on account of its virtue, real or supposed, of curing the bite of serpents.

Addibility
Addibi'lity. n.s. [from addible.] The possibility of being added.
This endless addition, or addibility (if any one like the word better) of numbers, so apparent to  the mind, is that which gives us the clearest and most distinct idea of infinity. Locke.

Addible
A'ddible. adj. [from add.] Possible to be added. See Addable.
The clearest idea it can get of infinity, is the confused, incomprehensible remainder of endless, addible numbers, which affords no prospect of stop, or boundary. Locke.

Addice
A'ddice. n.s. [for which we corruptly speak and write adz, from aꝺꞅ, Sax. an axe.]
The addice hath its blade made thin and somewhat arching. As the axe hath its edge parallel to its handle, so the addice hath its edge athwart the handle, and is ground to a basil on its inside to its outer edge. Moxon's Mechanical Exercises.

Addict
To Addi'ct. v.a. [addico, Lat.]

 To devote, to dedicate, in a good sense; which is rarely used.
 Ye know the house of Stephanus, that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints. 1 Cor. xvi. 15.
 It is commonly taken in a bad sense; as, he addicted himself to vice.

Addictedness
A'ddictedness. n.s. [from addicted.] The quality or state of being addicted.
Those, that know how little I have remitted of my former addictedness to make chymical experiments, will believe, that the design was to give occasion to the more knowing artists to lay aside their reservedness. Boyle.

Addiction
Addi'ction. n.s. [addictio, Lat.]

 The act of devoting, or giving up.

The state of being devoted.
 It is a wonder how his grace should g'ean it; Since his addiction was to courses vain; His companies unletter'd, rude, and shallow; His hours fill’d up with riots, banquets, sports. Shak. Hen. V.

Additament
An A'dditament. n.s. [additamentum, Lat.] The addition, or thing added.
Iron will not incorporate with brass, nor other metals, of itself, by simple ﬁre: so as the enquiry must be upon the calcination, and the additament, and the charge of them. Bacon.
In such a palace there is first the case or fabrick, or moles of the structure itself; and, besides that, there are certain additaments that contribute to its ornament and use; as, various furniture, rare fountains and aqueducts, curious motions of divers things appendicated to it. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Addition
Addi'tion. n.s. [from add.]

 The act of adding one thing to another; opposed to diminution.
 The infinite distance between the Creator and the noblest of all creatures can never be measured, nor exhausted by endless addition of finite degrees. Bentley's Sermons.
 Additament, or the thing added.
 It will not be modestly done, if any of our own wisdom intrude or interpose, or be willing to make additions to what Christ and his Apostles have designed. Hammond's Fundam.
 Some such resemblances, methinks, I find Of our last evening's talk, in this thy dream, But with addition strange! Milt. Paradise Lost, b. v.
 The abolishing of villanage, together with the custom permitted, among the nobles, of selling their lands, was a mighty addition to the power of the commons. Swift on the Dissensions in Athens and Rome.
 In arithmetick.
 Addition is the reduction of two or more numbers of like kind, together into one sum or total. Cocker's Arithmetick.
 In law. A title given to a man, over and above his christian name and surname,  shewing his estate, degree, occupation, trade, age, place of dwelling. Cowell.
                              Only retain The name, and all th‘ addition to a king; The sway, revenue, execution of th' last, Beloved sons, be yours; which to conﬁrm, This coronet part between you. Shakesp. King Lear.
                          From this time, For what he did before Corioli, call him, With all th' applause and clamour of the host, Caius Marcius Coriolanus. Bear th' addition nobly ever. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
 There arose new disputes upon the persons named by the king, or rather against the additions and appellations of title, which were made to their names. Clarendon, b. viii.

Additional
Addi'tional. adj. [from addition.] That which is added.
Our kalendar being once reformed and set right, it may be kept so, without any considerable variation, for many ages, by omitting one leap-year; i. e. the additional day, at the end of every 134 years. Holder on Time.
The greatest wits, that ever were produced in one age, lived together in so good an understanding, and celebrated one another with so much generosity, that each of them receives an additional lustre from his cotemporaries. Addison. Spectator.
They include in them that very kind of evidence, which is supposed to be so powerful; and do, withal, afford us several other additional proofs, of great force and clearness. Atter. Serm.

Additory
A'dditory. adj. [from add.] That which has the power or quality of adding.
The additory fiction gives to a great man a larger share of reputation than belongs to him, to enable him to serve some good end or purpose. Arbuthnot's Art of political Lying.

Addle (adjective)
A'ddle. adj. [from aꝺl, a disease, Sax. according to Skinner and Junius; perhaps from ẏꝺl, idle, barren, unfruitful.] Originally applied to eggs, and signifying such as produce nothing, but grow rotten under the hen; thence transferred to brains that produce nothing.
There's one with truncheon, like a ladle, That carries eggs too fresh or addle; And still at random, as he goes, Among the rabble rout bestows. Hudibras, p. ii. cant. ii.
After much solitariness, fasting, or long sickness, their brains were addle, and their bellies as empty of meat as their heads of wit. Burton on Melancholy.
Thus far the poet; but his brains grow addle: And all the rest is purely from this noddle. Dryd. Don Seb.

Addle (verb)
To A'ddle. v.a. [from addle, adj.] To make addle; to corrupt; to make barren.
This is also evidenced in eggs, whereof the sound ones sink, and such as are addled, swim; as do also those that are termed hypenemiæ, or wind-eggs. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv.

Addle-pated
A'ddle-pated. adj. Having addled brains. See Addle.
Poor slaves in metre, dull and addle-pated, Who rhyme below even David's psalms translated. Dryden's Absalom and Achitophel.

Address (noun)
Addre'ss. n.s. [addresse, Fr.]

 Verbal application to any one, by way of persuasion; petition.
 Henry, in knots involving Emma's name, Had half-confess'd and half conceal’d his ﬂame Upon this tree; and as the tender mark Grew with the year, and widen’d with the bark, Venus had heard the virgin's soft address, That, as the wound, the passion might encrease. Prior.
 Most of the persons, to whom these addresses are made, are not wise and skilful judges, but are inﬂuenced by their own sinful appetites and passions. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.
 Courtship.
 They both behold thee with their sisters eyes, And often have reveal'd their passions to me: But, tell me, whose address thou favour'st most; I long to know, and yet I dread to hear it. Addison's Cato.
 About three years since, a gentleman, whom, I am sure, you yourself would have approved, made his addresses to me. Addison. Spectator, № 163.
 Manner of addressing another; as, we say, a man of an happy or a pleasing address; a man of an awkward address.

 Skill, dexterity.
 I could produce innumerable instances from my own memory and observation, of events imputed to the profound skill and address of a minister, which, in reality, were either mere effects of negligence, weakness, humour, passion, or pride, or, at best, but the natural course of things left to themselves. Swift's Thoughts on the present Posture of Affairs.
 Manner of directing a letter; a sense chieﬂy mercantile.

Address (verb)
To Addre'ss. v.a. [addresser, Fr. from dereçar, Span. from dirigo, directum, Lat.]

 To prepare one's self to enter upon any action; as, he addressed himself to the work.
It lifted up its head, and did address Itself to motion, like as it would speak. Shakesp. Hamlet.
With him the Palmer eke, in habit sad, Himself addrest to that adventure hard; So to the river's side they both together far'd. Fairy Q. b. ii.
Then Turnus, from his chariot leaping light,Address'd himself on foot to single fight. Dryden's Æneid.
 To get ready; to put in a state for immediate use.
By this means they fell directly on the English battle; whereupon the earl of  Warwick addressed his men to take the flank. Sir J. Hayward.
Duke Frederick hearing, how that every dayMen of great worth resorted to this forest,Address'd a mighty power, which were on foot, In his own conduct purposely to take His brother here. Shakespeare, As you like it.
To-night in Harfleur we wil be your guest,To-morrow for the march we are addrest. Shak. Henry V.
 To apply to another by words, with various forms of construction.

Sometimes without a preposition.
Are not your orders to address the senate? Addison's Cato.
Sometimes with to.
Addressing to Pollio, his great patron, and himself no vulgar poet, he no longer could restrain the freedom of his spirit, but began to assert his native character, which is sublimity. Dryden's Dedication of Virgil's Past.
Among the croud, but far above the rest, Young Turnus to the beauteous maid addrest. Dryd. Æneid.
Sometimes with the reciprocal pronoun; as, he addressed himself to the general.

Sometimes with the accusative of the matter of the address, which may be the nominative to the passive.
The young hero had addressed his prayers to him for his assistance. Dryd. Æneid, Dedication.
The prince himself, with awful dread possess'd,His vows to great Apollo thus addrest. Dryden, Æneid vi.
His suit was common; but, above the rest, To both the brother-princes thus addrest. Dryden's Fables.
To address, is to apply to the king in form.
The representatives of the nation in parliament, and the privy-council, address'd the king to have it recalled. Swift.

Addresser
Addre'sser. n.s. [from address.] The person that addresses or petitions.

Adducent
Addu'cent. adj. [adducens, Lat.]
A word applied to those muscles that bring forward, close, or draw together the parts of the body to which they are annexed. Quincy.

Addulce
To Addu'lce. v.a. [addoucir, Fr. dulcis, Lat.] To sweeten; a word not now in use.
Thus did the French embassadors, with great shew of their king’s affection, and many sugared words, seek to addulce all matters between the two kings. Bacon's Henry VII.

Adeling
A'deling. n.a. [from æꝺl, Sax. illustrious.] A word of honour among the Angles, properly appertaining to the king's children: king Edward the Confessor, being without issue, and intending to make Edgar his heir, called him adeling. Cowell.

Ademption
Ade'mption. n.s. [adimo, ademptum, Lat.] Taking away; privation. Dict.

Adenography
Adeno'graphy. n.s. [from ἄδηνον and γράφω, Gr.] A treatise of the glands.

Adept (adjective)
Ade'pt. adj. Skilful; throughly versed.
If there be really such adept philosophers as we are told of, I am apt to think, that, among their arcana, they are masters of extremely potent menstruums. Boyle.

Adept (noun)
Ade'pt. n.s. [from adeptus, Lat. that is, adeptus artem.] He that is completely skilled in all the secrets of his art. It is, in its original signification, appropriated to the chymists, but is now extended to other artists.
The preservation of chastity is easy to true adepts. Pope.

Adequate
A'dequate. adj. [adequatus, Lat.] Equal to; proportionate; correspondent to, so as to bear an exact resemblance or proportion. It is used generally in a figurative sense, and often with the particle to.
Contingent death seems to be the whole adequate object of popular courage; but a necessary and unavoidable coffin strikes paleness into the stoutest heart. Harvey on Consumptions.
The arguments were proper, adequate, and sufficient to compass their respective ends. South's Sermons.
All our simple ideas are adequate; because, being nothing but the effects of certain powers in things, fitted and ordained by God to produce such sensations in us, they cannot but he correspondent and adequate to those powers. Locke.
Those are adequate ideas, which perfectly represent their archetypes or objects. Inadequate are but a partial, or incomplete, representation of those archetypes to which they are referred. Watts's Logick.

Adequately
A'dequately. adv. [from adequate.]

 In an adequate manner; with justness of representation; with exactness of proportion.
Gratitude consists adequately in these two things: first, that it is a debt; and, secondly, that it is such a debt as is left to every man's ingenuity, whether he will pay or no. South.
It is used with the particle to.
Piety is the necessary christian virtue, proportioned adequately to the omniscience and spirituality of that infinite Deity. Hammond's Fundamentals.

Adequateness
A'dequateness. n.s. [from adequate.] The state of being adequate; justness of representation; exactness of proportion.

Adespotick
Adespo'tick. adj. Not absolute; not  despotick. Dict.

Adhere
To Adhe're. v.n. [adhæreo, Lat.]

 To stick to; as, wax to the ﬁnger.

To stick, in a ﬁgurative sense; to be  consistent; to hold together.
 Why every thing adheres together, that no dram of a scruple, no scruple of a scruple, no obstacle, no incredulous or unsafe circumstance — Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
 To remain ﬁrmly ﬁxed to a party, person or opinion.
 Good gentlemen, he hath much talk'd of you; And sure I am, two men there are not living, To whom he more adheres. Shaksp. Hamlet.
 Every man of sense will agree with me, that  singularity is laudable, when, in contradiction to  a multitude, it adheres to the dictates of conscience, morality, and honour. Boyle.

Adherence
Adhe'rence. n.s. [from adhere.] See Adhesion.

The quality of adhering, or sticking; tenacity.

In a ﬁgurative sense, ﬁxedness of  mind; attachment; steadiness.
 Their ﬁrm adherence to their religion is no less remarkable than their dispersion; considering it as persecuted or contemned over the whole earth. Addison. Spectator, № 495.
 A constant adherence to one sort of diet may have bad effects on any constitution. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Plain good sense, and a ﬁrm adherence to the point, have proved more effectual than those arts, which are contemptuously called the spirit of negociating. Swift.

Adherency
Adhe'rency. n.s. [The same with adherence.]

 Steady attachment.

 That which adheres.
 Vices have a native adherency of vexation. Decay of Piety.

Adherent (adjective)
Adhe'rent. adj. [from adhere.]

Sticking to.
 Close to the cliff with both his hands he clung, And stuck adherent, and suspended hung. Pope's Odyssey.
 United with.
Modes are said to be inherent or adherent, that is, proper or improper. Adherent or improper modes arise from the joining of some accidental substance to the chief subject, which yet may be separated from it; so, when a bowl is wet, or a boy is cloathed, these are adherent modes; for the water and the clothes are distinct substances which adhere to the bowl, or to the boy. Watts’s Logick.

Adherent (noun)
Adhe'rent. n.s. [from adhere.] The person that adheres; one that supports the cause, or follows the fortune of another; a follower; a partisan.
Princes must give protection to their subjects and adherents when worthy occasion shall require it. Sir W. Raleigh.
A new war must be undertaken upon the advice of those, who, with their partisans and adherents, were to be the sole gainers by it. Swift's Miscellanies.

Adherer
Adhe'rer. n.s. [from adhere.] He that adheres.
He ought to be indulgent to tender consciences; but, at the same time, a firm adherer to the established church. Swift.

Adhesion
Adhe'sion. n.s. [adhæsio, Lat.]

 The act or state of sticking to some thing. Adhesion is generally used in the natural, and adherence in the metaphorical sense; as, the adhesion of iron to the magnet; and adherence of a client to his patron.
 Why therefore may not the minute parts of other bodies, if they be conveniently shaped for adhesion, stick to one another, as well as stick to this spirit? Boyle.
 The rest consisting wholly in the sensible configuration, as smooth and rough; or else more, or less, firm adhesion of the parts, as hard and soft, tough and brittle, are obvious. Locke.
 ——— Prove that all things, on occasion, Love union, and desire adhesion. Prior.
 It is sometimes taken, like adherence, figuratively, for firmness to an opinion, or steadiness in a practice.
 The same want of sincerity, the same adhesion to vice, and aversion from goodness, will be equally a reason for their rejecting any proof whatsoever. Atterbury's Sermons.

Adhesive
Adhe'sive. adj. [from adhesion.] Sticking; tenacious; with to.
If slow, yet sure, adhesive to the tract, Hot-steaming up. Thomson's Autumn, l. 440.

Adhibit
To Adhi'bit. v.a. [adhibeo, Lat.] To apply; to make use of.

Adhibition
Adhibi'tion. n.s. [from adhibit.] Application; use. Dict.

Adiaphorous
Adia'phorous. adj. [ἀδιαφορος, Gr.] Neutral; particularly used of some spirits and salts, which are neither of an acid or alkaline nature. Quincy.
Our adiaphorous spirit may be obtained, by distilling the liquor that is afforded by woods and divers other bodies. Boyle.

Adiaphory
Adia'phory. n.s. [ἀδιαφορία, Gr.] Neutrality; indifference.

Adieu
Adieu'. adv. [from à Dieu, used elliptically for à Dieu je vous commende, used at the departure of friends.] The form of parting, originally importing a commendation to the Divine care, but now used, in a popular sense, sometimes to things inanimate; farewell.
 Ne gave him leave to bid that aged sire Adieu, but nimbly ran her wonted course. Fairy Queen, b. ii.
 Use a more spacious ceremony to the noble lords; you restrained yourself within the list of too cold an adieu; be more expressive to them. Shakespeare's All's well that ends well.
 While now I take my last adieu, Heave thou no sigh, nor shed a tear; Lest yet my half-clos'd eye may view On earth an object worth its care. Prior.

Adipous
A'dipous. adj. [adiposus, Lat.] Fat. Dict.

Adit
A'dit. n.s. [aditus, Lat.] A passage for the conveyance of water under ground; a passage under ground in general; a term among the minemen.
For conveying away the water, they stand in aid of sundry devices; as, adits, pumps, and wheels, driven by a stream, and interchangeably filling and emptying two buckets. Carew's Surv.
The delfs would be so flown with waters (it being impossible to make any adits or soughs to drain them) that no gins or machines could suffice to lay and keep them dry. Ray on the Creat.

Adition
Adi'tion. n.s. [from adeo, aditum, Lat.] The act of going to another. Dict.

Adjacency
Adja'cency. n.s. [from adjaceo, Lat.]

 The state of lying close to another thing.

 That which is adjacent. See Adjacent.
 Because the Cape hath sea on both sides near it, and other lands, remote as it were, equidistant from it; therefore, at that point, the needle is not distracted by the vicinity of adjacencies. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 2.

Adjacent (adjective)
Adja'cenct. adj. [adjacens, Lat.] Lying close; bordering upon something.
It may corrupt within itself, although no part of it issue into the body adjacent. Bacon's Nat. History № 771.
Uniform pellucid mediums, such as water, have no sensible reflection but in their external superficies, where they are adjacent to other mediums of a different density. Newton's Opt.

Adjacent (noun)
Adja'cenct. n.s. That which lies next another.
The sense of the author goes visibly in its own train, and the words receiving a determined sense from their companions and adacents, will not consent to give countenance and colour to what must be supported at any rate. Locke's Ess. upon S. Paul.

Adject
To Adje'ct. v.a. [adjicio, adjectum, Lat.] To add to; to put to another thing.

Adjection
Adje'ction. n.s. [adjectio, Lat.]

 The act of adjecting, or adding.

 The thing adjected or added.
 That unto every pound of sulphur, an adjection of one ounce of quicksilver; or unto every pound of petre, one ounce of sal-armoniac, will much intend the force, and consequently the report, I find no verity. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Adjectitious
Adjecti'tious. adj. [from adjection.] Added; thrown in upon the rest.

Adjective
A'djective. n.s. [adjectivum, Lat.]
A word added to a noun, to signify the addition or separation of some quality, circumstance, or manner of being; as, good, bad, are adjectives, because, in speech, they are applied to nouns, to modify their signification, or intimate the manner of existence in the things signified thereby. Clarke's Latin Gram.
All the versification of Claudian is included within the compass of four or five lines; perpetually closing his sense at the end of a verse, and that verse commonly which they call golden, or two substantives and two adjectives, with a verb betwixt them, to keep the peace. Dryd.

Adjectively
A'djectively. adv. [from adjective.] After the manner of an adjective; a term of grammar.

Adjoin (verb active)
To Adjo'in. v.a. [adjoindre, Fr. adjungo, Lat.] To join to; to unite to; to put to.
Corrections or improvements should be as remarks adjoined, by way of note or commentary, in their proper places, and superadded to a regular treatise. Watts's Improvem. of the Mind.

Adjoin (verb neuter)
To Adjo'in. v.n. To be contiguous to; to lye next so as to have nothing between.
Th' adjoining fane, th' assembled Greks express'd, And hunting of the Caledonian beast. Dryden's Fables.
In learning any thing, as little should be proposed to the mind at once, as is possible; and, that being understood and full mastered, proceed to the next adjoining, yet unknown, simple, unperplexed proposition, belonging to the matter in hand, and tending to the clearing what is principally designed. Locke.

Adjourn
To Adjo'urn. v.a. [adjourner, Fr.]

 To put off to another day, naming the time; a term used in juridical proceedings; as, of parliaments, or courts of justice.
 The queen being absent, 'tis a needful fitness, That we adjourn this court to further day. Shakesp. Hen. VIII.
 By the king's authority alone, and by his writs they are assembled, and by him alone are they prorogued and dissolved; but each house may adjourn itself. Bac. Advice to Sir G. Villiers.
 To put off; to defer; to let stay to another time.
 Then, Jupiter, thou king of gods, Why hast thou thus adjourn'd The graces for his merits due, Being all to dolours turn'd. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 Crown high the goblets with a cheerful draught; Enjoy the present hour, adjourn the future thought. Dryd. Æneid. vii. l. 181.
 The formation of animals being foreign to my purpose, I shall adjourn the consideration of it to another occasion. Woodward's Nat. History, p. iii.

Adjournment
Adjo'urnment. n.s. [adjournment, Fr.] An assignment of a day, or a putting off till another day. Adjournment in eyre, an appointment of a day, when the justices in eyre mean to sit again. Cowell.
We will, and we will not, and then we will not again, and we will. At this rate we run our lives out in adjournments from time to time, out of a fantastical levity that holds us off and on, betwixt hawk and buzzard. L'Estrange.

Adjudge
To Adju'dge. v.a. [adjudico, Lat.]

 To give the thing controverted to one of the parties by a judicial sentence; with the particle to before the person.
 The way of disputing in the schools leads from it, by insisting on one topical argument; by the success of which, victory is adjudged to the opponent, or defendant. Locke.
              The great competitors for Rome Cæsar and Pompey on Pharsalian plains, Where stern Bellona, with one final stroke, Adjudg'd the empire of this globe to one. Phillips.
 To sentence, or condemn to a punishment; with to before the thing.
 But though thou art adjudged to the death; Yet I will favour thee in what I can. Shakesp. Com. of Err.
 Simply, to judge; to decree; to determine.
 He adjudged him unworthy of his friendship and favour; purposing sharply to revenge the wrong he had received. Knolles's History of the Turks.

Adjudicate
To Adju'dicate. v.a. [adjudico, Lat.] To adjudge; to give something controverted to one of the litigants, by a sentence or decision.

Adjudication
Adjudica'tion. n.s. [adjudicatio, Lat.] The act of judging, or of granting something to a litigant, by a judicial sentence.

Adjugate
To A'djugate. v.a. [adjugo, Lat.] To yoke to; to join to another by a yoke. Dict.

Adjument
A'djument. n.s. [adjumentum, Lat.] Help; support. Dict.

Adjunct (adjective)
A'djunct. adj. United with; immediately consequent.
So well, that what you bid me undertake, Though that my death were adjunct to my act, I'd do 't. Shakesp. King John.

Adjunct (noun)
A'djunct. n.s. [adjunctum, Lat.]

 Something adherent or united to another, though not essentially part of it.
 Learning is but an adjunct to ourself, And where we are, our learning likewise is. Shakesp. Love's Labour Lost.
 But I make haste to consider you as abstracted from a court, which (if you will give me leave to use a term of logick) is only an adjunct, not a propriety, of happiness. Dryd. Aureng. Ded.
 The talent of discretion, as I have described it in its several adjuncts and circumstances, is no where so serviceable as to the clergy. Swift's Miscellanies.
 A person joined to another. This sense rarely occurs.
 He made him the associate of his heir apparent, together with the lord Cottington (as an adjunct of singular experience and trust) in foreign travels, and in a business of love. Wotton.

Adjunction
A'djunction. n.s. [adjunctio, Lat.]

 The act of adjoining, or coupling together.

 The thing joined.

Adjunctive
A'djunctive. n.s. [adjunctivus, Lat.]

 He that joins.

 That which is joined.

Adjuration
Adjura'tion. n.s. [adjuratio, Lat.]

 The act of adjuring, or proposing an oath to another.

 The form of oath proposed to another.
When these learned men saw sickness and frenzy cured, the dead raised, the oracles put to silence, the dæmons and evil spirits forced to confess themselves no gods, by persons, who only made use of prayer and adjurations in the name of their crucified Saviour; how could they doubt of their Saviour's power on the like occasions? Addison on the Christian Religion.

Adjure
To Adju're. v.a. [adjuro, Lat.] To impose an oath upon another, prescribing the form in which he shall swear.
                     Thou know'st, the magistrates And princes of my country came in person, Solicited, commanded, threaten'd, urg'd, Adjur'd by all the bonds of civil duty, And of religion, press'd how just it was, How honourable. Milton's Sampson Agonistes, l. 853.
Ye lamps of heav'n! he said, and lifted high His hands now free, thou venerable sky! Inviolable pow'rs! ador'd with dread, Ye fatal fillets! that once bound this head, Ye sacred altars! from whose ﬂames I fled, Be all of you adjured. Dryden, Æneid ii.

Adjust
To Adju'st. v.a. [adjuster, Fr.]

 To regulate; to put in order; to settle in the right form.
 Your Lordship removes all difficulties, and supplies all our wants, faster than the most visionary projector can adjust his schemes. Swift to the Lord High Treasurer.
 To reduce to the true state or standard; to make accurate.
 The names of mixed modes, for the most part, want standards in nature, whereby men may rectify and adjust their signification; therefore they are very various and doubtful. Locke.
 To make conformable. It requires the particle to before the thing to which the conformity is made.
 As to the accomplishment of this remarkable prophecy, whoever reads the account given by Josephus, without knowing his character, and compares it with what our Saviour foretold, would think the historian had been a christian, and that he had nothing else in view, but to adjust the event to the prediction. Addison on the Christian Religion.

Adjustment
Adju'stment. n.s. [adjustement, Fr.]

 Regulation; the act of putting in method; settlement.
 The farther and clearer adjustment of this affair, I am constrained to adjourn to the larger treatise. Woodward's Nat. Hist.<



 The state of being put in method, or regulated.
 It is a vulgar idea we have of a watch or clock, when we conceive of it as an instrument made to shew the hour: but it is a learned idea which the watch-maker has of it, who knows all the several parts of it, together with the various connexions and adjustments of each part. Watts's Logick.

Adjutant
A'djutant. n.s. A petty officer, whose duty is to assist the major,  by distributing the pay, and overseeing the punishment, of the common men.

Adjute
To Adju'te. v.a. [adjuvo, adjutum, Lat.] To help; to concur; a word not now in use.
                     For there be Six bachelors as bold as he, Adjuting to his company; And each one hath his livery. Ben. Johnson's Under-woods.

Adjutor
Adju'tor. n.s. [adjutor, Lat.] A helper. Dict.

Adjutory
Adju'tory. adj. [adjutorius, Lat.] That which helps. Dict.

Adjutrix
An Adju'trix. n.s. [Lat.] She who helps. Dict.

Adjuvant
A'djuvant. adj. [adjuvans, Lat.] Helpful; useful. Dict.

Adjuvate
To A'djuvate. v.a. [adjuvo, Lat.] To help; to further; to put forward. Dict.

Admeasurement
Adme'asurement. n.s. [See Measure.] The adjustment of proportions; the act or practice of measuring according to rule.
Admeasurement is a writ, which lieth for the bringing of those to a mediocrity, that usurp more than their part. It lieth in two cases: one is termed admeasurement of dower, where the widow of the deceased holdeth from the heir, or his guardian, more in the name of her dower, than belongeth to her. The other is admeasuremcnt of pasture, which lieth between those that have common of pasture appendant to their freehold, or common by vicinage, in case any one of them, or more, do surcharge the common with more cattle than they ought. Cowell.
In some counties they are not much more acquainted with admeasurement by acre; and thereby the writs of those counties contain twice or thrice so many acres more than the land hath. Bacon's Hist. Off. Alienat.

Admensuration
Admensura'tion. n.s. [ad and mensura, Lat.] The act, or practice, of measuring out to each his part.

Adminicle
Admi'nicle. n.s. [adminiculum, Lat.] Help; support; furtherance. Dict.

Adminicular
Admini'cular. adj. [from adminiculum, Lat.] That which  gives help. Dict.

Administer
To Admi'nister. v.a. [administro, Lat.]

 To give; to afford; to supply.
                     Let zephyrs bland Administer their tepid genial airs; Naught fear he from the west, whose gentle warmth Discloses well the earth's all-teeming womb. Philips.
 To act as the minister or agent in any employment or office; generally, but not always, with some hint of subordination, to administer the government.
 For forms of government let fools contest, Whate'er is best administer'd, is best. Pope's Essay on Man.
 To administer justice.

 To administer the sacraments.
 Have not they the old popish custom of administering the blessed sacrament of the holy eucharist with wafer-cakes? Hooker, b. iv. § 10.
 To administer an oath.
 Swear by the duty that you owe to heav'n, To keep the oath that we administer. Shakesp. Richard II.
 To administer physick.
 I was carried on men's shoulders, administering physick and phlebotomy. Wafers's Voyage.
 To administer to; to contribute; to bring supplies.
 I must not omit, that there is a fountain rising in the upper part of my garden, which forms a little wandering rill, and administers to the pleasure, as well as the plenty, of the place. Spectator, № 477.
 To perform the office of an administrator, in law. See Administrator.
 Neal's order was never performed, because the executors durst not administer. Arbuthnot and Pope's Martin. Scribler.

Administrate
To Admini'strate. v.a. [administro, Lat.] To exhibit; to give as physick.
The have the same effects in medicine, when inwardly administrated to animal bodies. Woodward's Nat. Hist.

Administration
Administra'tion. n.s. [administratio, Lat.]

 The act of administering or conducting any employment; as, the conducting the publick affairs; dispensing the laws.
 I then did use the person of your father; The image of his pow'r lay then in me: And in th' administration of his law, While I was busy for the commonwealth, Your highness pleased to forget my place. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 In the short time of his administration, he shone so powerfully upon me, that, like the heat of a Russian summer, he ripened the fruits of poetry in a cold climate. Dryden's Dedication of Virgil's Pastorals.
 The active or executive part of government.
 It may pass for a maxim in state, that the administration cannot be placed in too few hands, nor the legislature in too many. Swift's Sentiments of a Church of England Man.
 Those to whom the care of publick affairs is committed.

 Distribution; exhibition; dispensation.
 There is, in sacraments, to be observed their force, and their form of administration. Hooker, b. v.
 By the universal administration of grace, begun by our blessed Saviour, enlarged by his apostles, carried on by their immediate successors, and to be compleated by the rest to the world's end; all types that darkened this faith are enlightened. Sprat's Sermons.

Administrative
Admi'nistrative. adj. [from administrate.] That which administers; that by which any one administers.

Administrator
Administra'tor. n.s. [administrator, Lat.]

 It is properly taken for him that has the goods of a man dying intestate, committed to his charge by the ordinary, and is accountable for the same, whenever it shall please the ordinary to call upon him thereunto. Cowell.
 He was wonderfully diligent to enquire and observe what became of the king of Arragon, in holding the kingdom of Castille, and whether he did hold it in his own right, or as administrator to his daughter. Bacon's Henry VII.
 He that officiates in divine rites.
 I feel my conscience bound to remember the death of Christ, with some society of christians or other, since it is a most plain command; whether the person, who distributes these elements, be only an occasional or a settled administrator. Watts's Improvement of the Mind, p. i. c. 18.
 He that conducts the government.
 The residence of the prince, or chief administrator, of the civil power. Swift's short View of Ireland.

Administratorship
Administra'torship. n.s. [from administrator.] The office of administrator.

Administratrix
Admi'nistratrix. n.s. [Lat.] She who administers in consequence of a will.

Admirability
Admirabi'lity. n.s. [admirabilis, Lat.] The quality or state of being admirable. Dict.

Admirable
A'dmirable. adj. [admirabilis, Lat.] To be admired; worthy of admiration; of power to excite wonder; always taken in a good sense, and applied either to persons or things.
The more power he hath to hurt, the more admirable is his praise, that he will not hurt. Sidney, b. ii.
God was with them in all their afflictions, and, at length, by working their admirable deliverance, did testify that they served him not in vain. Hooker, b. iv. § 2.
What admirable things occur in the remains of several other philosophers? Short, I confess, of the rules of christianity, but generally above the lives of christians. South's Sermons.
                         You can at most To an indiff'rent lover's praise pretend: But you would spoil an admirable friend. Dryd. Aurengz.

Admirableness
A'dmirableness. n.s. [from admirable.] The quality of being admirable; the power of raising wonder.

Admirably
A'dmirably. adv. [from admirable.] So as to raise wonder; in an admirable manner.
The theatre is, I think, the most spacious of any I ever saw, and, at the same time, so admirably well contrived, that, from the very depth of the stage, the lowest sound may be heard distinctly to the farthest part of the audience, as in a whispering place; and yet, if you raise your voice as high as you please, there is nothing like an echo to cause in it the least confusion. Addison on Italy.

Admiral
A'dmiral. n.s. [amiral, Fr. of uncertain etymology.]

 An officer or magistrate that has the government of the king's navy, and the hearing and determining all causes, as well civil as criminal, belonging to the sea. Cowell.

 The chief commander of a fleet.
 He also, in battle at sea, overthrew Rodericus Rotundus, admiral of Spain; in which fight the admiral, with his son, were both slain, and seven of his gallies taken. Knolles's Hist. Turks.
 Make the sea shine with gallantry, and all The English youth flock to their admiral. Waller.
 The ship which carries the admiral or commander of the fleet.
 The admiral galley, wherein the emperor himself was, by great mischance struck upon a sand. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.

Admiralship
A'dmiralship. n.s. [from admiral.] The office or power of an admiral.

Admiralty
Admira'lty. n.s. [ammiraulté, Fr.] The power, or officers, appointed for the administration of naval affairs.

Admiration
Admira'tion. n.s. [admiratio, Lat.]

 Wonder; the act of admiring or wondering.
 Indu'd with human voice, and human sense. Reasoning to admiration. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix.
 They are imitations of the passions, which always move, and therefore, consequently, please; for, without motion, there can be no delight: which cannot be considered but as an active passion. When we view those elevated ideas of nature, the result of that view is admiration, which is always the cause of pleasure. Dryd. Dufresnoy, Pref.
 There is a pleasure in admiration, and this is that which properly causeth admiration, when we discover a great deal in an object, which we understand to be excellent; and yet we see, we know not how much more beyond that, which our understandings cannot fully reach and comprehend. Tillotson's Serm.
 It is taken sometimes in a bad sense, though generally in a good.
 Your boldness I with admiration see; What hope had you to gain a queen like me? Because a hero forc'd me once away, Am I thought fit to be a second prey? Dryd.

Admire (verb active)
To Admi're. v.a. [admiro, Lat. admirer, Fr.]

 To regard with wonder; generally in a good sense.
 'Tis here that knowledge wonders, and there is an admiration that is not the daughter of ignorance. This indeed stupidly gazeth at the unwonted effect; but the philosophic passion truly admires and adores the supreme efficient. Glanville.
 It is sometimes used, in more familiar speech, for to regard with love.

It is used, but rarely, in an ill sense.
 You have displac'd the mirth, broke the good meeting With most admir'd disorder. Shakesp. Macbeth.

Admire (verb neuter)
To Admi're. v.n. To wonder; sometimes with the particle at.
The eye is already so perfect, that I believe the reason of a man would easily have rested here, and admir'd at his own contrivance. Ray on the Creation.

Admirer
An Admi'rer. n.s. [from admire.]

 The person that wonders, or regards with admiration.
 Neither Virgil nor Horace would have gained so great reputation, had they not been the friends and admirers of each other. Addison. Spectator.
 Who most to shun or hate mankind pretend, Seek an admirer, or would fix a friend. Pope's Essay on Man.
In common speech, a lover.

Admiringly
Admi'ringly. adv. [from admire.] With admiration; in the manner of an admirer.
The king very lately spoke of him admiringly and mournfully. Shakesp. All's well that ends well.
We may yet further admiringly observe, that though men usually give freeliest where they have not given before, and make it an excuse of their desistance from giving, that they have given it otherwise. Boyle.

Admissible
Admi'ssible. adj. [admitto, admissum, Lat.] That which may be admitted.
Suppose that this supposition were admissible, yet this would not any way be inconsistent with the eternity of the divine nature and essence. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Admission
Admi'ssion. n.s. [admissio, Lat.]

The act or practice of admitting.
 There was also enacted that charitable law, for the admission of poor suitors without fee; whereby poor men became rather able to vex, than unable to sue. Bacon's Henry VII.
 By means of our solitary situation, and our rare admission of strangers, we know most part of the habitable world, and are ourselves unknown. Bacon's New Atalantis.
 The state of being admitted.
 My father saw you ill designs pursue; And my admission show'd his fear of you. Dryd. Aurengzebe.
 God did then exercise man's hopes with the expectations of a better paradise, or a more initimate admission to himself. South's Sermons.
 Admittance; the power of entering, or being admitted.
 All springs have some degree of heat, none ever freezing, no not in the longest and severest frosts; especially those, where there is such a site and disposition of the strata as gives free and easy admission to this heat. Woodward's Natural History.
                  Our king descends from Jove: And hither are we come, by his command, To crave admission in your happy land. Dryden's Æneid vii.
 In the ecclesiastical law.
 It is, when the patron presents a clerk to a church that is vacant, and the bishop, upon examination, admits and allows of such clerk to be fitly qualified, by saying, Admitto te habilem, &c. AyIiffe's Parergon.
The allowance of an argument; the grant of a position not fully proved.

Admit
To Admi't. v.a. [admitto, Lat.]

 To suffer to enter; to grant entrance.
 Does not one table Bavius still admit?
 To suffer to enter upon an office; in which sense, the phrase of admission into a college, &c. is used.
 The treasurer found it no hard matter so far to terrify him, that, for the king's service, as was pretended, he admitted, for a six-clark, a person recommended by him. Clarendon.
 To allow an argument or position.
 Suppose no weapon can thy valour's pride Subdue, that by no force thou may'st be won, Admit no steel can hurt or wound thy side, And be it heav'n hath thee such favour done. Fairfax, b. ii.
 This argument is like to have the less effect on me, seeing I cannot easily admit the inference. Locke.
 To allow, or grant in general; sometimes with the particle of.
 If you once admit of a latitude, that thoughts may be exalted, and images raised above the life, that leads you insensibly from your own principles to mine. Dryd. on Heroic Poetry.

Admittable
Admi'ttable. adj. [from admit.] The person or thing which may be admitted.
The clerk, who is presented, ought to prove to the bishop, that he is a deacon, and that he has orders; otherwise, the bishop is not bound to admit him; for, as the law then stood, a deacon was admittable. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Admittance
Admi'ttance. n.s. [from admit.]

 The act of admitting; allowance or permission to enter.
 It cannot enter any man's conceit to think it lawful, that every man which listeth should take upon him charge in the church; and therefore a solemn admittance is of such necessity, that, without it, there can be no church-polity. Hooker, b. iii.
 As to the admittance of the weighty elastic parts of the air into the blood, through the coats of the vessels, it seems contrary to experiments upon dead bodies. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 The power or right of entering.
                                          What If I do line one of their hands? — 'tis gold Which buys admittance. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
 Surely a daily expectation at the gate, is the readiest way to gain admittance into the house. South's Sermons.
 'I'here's news from Bertran; he desires Admittance to the king, and cries aloud, This day shall end our fears. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
 There are some ideas which have admittance only through one sense, which is peculiarly adapted to receive them. Locke.
 Custom, or prerogative, of being admitted to great persons; a sense now out of use.
 Now, Sir John, here is the heart of my purpose: you are a gentleman of excellent breeding, of great admittance, authentick in your place and person, generally allowed for your many warlike, courtlike, and learned preparations. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
 Concession of a position.
 Nor could the Pythagorean give easy admittance thereto; for, holding that separate souls successively supplied other bodies, they could hardly allow the raising of souls from other worlds. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i.

Admix
To Admi'x. v.a. [admisceo, Lat.] To mingle with something else.

Admixtion
Admi'xtion. n.s. [from admix.] The union of one body with another, by mingling them.
All metals may be calcined by strong waters, or by admixtion of salt, sulphur, and mercury. Bacon's Physical Remains.
The elements are no where pure in these lower regions; and if there is any free from the admixtion of another, sure it is above the concave of the moon. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica.
There is no way to make a strong and vigorous powder of saltpetre, without the admixtion of sulphur. Brown's Vulgar Err.

Admixture
Admi'xture. n.s. [from admix.] The body mingled with another; perhaps sometimes the act of mingling.
A mass which to the eye appears to be nothing but mere simple earth, shall, to the smell or taste, discover a plentiful admixture of sulphur, alum, or some other mineral. Woodward's Natural History, p. iv.
Whatever acrimony, or amaritude, at any time redounds in it, must be derived from the admixture of another sharp bitter substance. Harvey on Consumptions.

Admonish
To Admo'nish. v.a. [admoneo, Lat.]
To warn of a fault; to reprove gently; to counsel against wrong practices; to put in mind of a fault or a duty; with the particle of, or against, which is more rare, or the infinitive mood of a verb.
One of his cardinals, who better knew the intrigues of affairs, admonished him against that unskilful piece of ingenuity. Decay of Piety.
                 He of their wicked ways Shall them admonish, and before them set The paths of righteousness. Milt. Par. Lost, b. xi.
But when he was admonished by his subject to descend, he came down, gently circling in the air, and singing, to the ground. Dryden's Dedication of Virgil's Past.

Admonisher
Admo'nisher. n.s. [from admonish.] The person that admonishes, or puts another in mind of his faults or duty.
Horace was a mild admonisher; a court-satyrist fit for the gentle times of Augustus. Dryden's Juvenal, Dedicat.

Admonishment
Admo'nishment. n.s. [from admonish.] Admonition; the notice by which one is put in mind of faults or duties: a word not often used.
But yet be wary, in thy studious care. — — Thy grave admonishments prevail with me. Shakespeare's Henry V. p. i.
To th' infinitely Good we owe Immortal thanks, and his admonishment Receive, with solemn purpose to observe Immutably his sovereign will, the end Of what we are. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vii. l. 77.

Admonition
Admoni'tion. n.s. [admonitio, Lat.] The hint of a fault or duty; counsel; gentle reproof.
They must give our teachers leave, for the saving of those souls, to intermingle sometimes. with other more necessary things, admonition concerning these not unnecessary. Hooker.
From this admonition they took only occasion to redouble their fault, and to sleep again; so that, upon a second and third admonition, they had nothing to plead for their unseasonable drowsiness. South's Sermons.

Admonitioner
Admoni'tioner. n.s. [from admonition.] A liberal dispenser of admonition; a general adviser. A ludicrous term.
Albeit the admonitioners did seem at first to like no prescript form of prayer at all, but thought it the best that their minister should always be left at liberty to pray, as his own discretion did serve, their defender, and his associates, have sithence proposed to the world a form as themselves did like. Hooker, b. v. § 27.

Admonitory
Admo'nitory. adj. [admonitorius, Lat.] That which admonishes.
The sentence of reason is either mandatory, shewing what must be done; or else permissive, declaring only what may be done; or, thirdly, admonitory, opening what is the most convenient for us to do. Hooker's Ecclesiastical Polity, b. i.

Admove
To Admo've. v.a. [admovo, Lat.] To bring one thing to another.
If, unto the powder of loadstone or iron, we admove the north-pole of the loadstone, the powders, or small divisions, will erect and conform themselves thereto. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii.

Admurmation
Admurmura'tion. n.s. [admurmuro, Lat.] The act of murmuring, or whispering to another. Dict.

Ado
Ado'. n.s. [from the verb to do, with a before it, as the French affaire, from à and faire.]

Trouble, difficulty.
 He took Clitophon prisoner, whom, with much ado, he keepeth alive; the Helots being villainously cruel. Sidney, b. i.
 They moved, and in the end persuaded, with much ado, the people to bind themselves by solemn oath. Hooker, Pref.
 He kept the borders and marches of the pale with much ado; he held many parliaments, wherein sundry laws were made. Sir John Davies on Ireland.
 With much ado, he partly kept awake; Not suff'ring all his eyes repose to take: And ask'd the stranger, who did reeds invent, And whence began so rare an instrument. Dryden.
 Bustle; tumult; business; sometimes with the particle about.
 Let's follow, to see the end of this ado. Shakesp. Taming of the Shrew.
 All this ado about Adam's fatherhood, and the greatness of its power, helps nothing to establish the power of those that govern. Locke.
 It has a light and ludicrous sense, implying more tumult and shew of business, than the affair is worth; in this sense it is  generally used.
 I made no more ado, but took all their seven points in my target, thus. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 We'll keep no great ado — a friend or two — For, hark, Tybalt being slain so late, It may be thought we held him carelessly, Being our kinsman, if we revel much. Shakesp. Rom. and Jul.
 Come, come, says Puss, without any more ado, 'tis time for me to go to breakfast; cats don't live upon dialogues. L'Estrange, Fab ii.

Adolescence
Adole'scence. n.s. [adolescentia, Lat.]
The age succeeding childhood, and succeeded by puberty; more largely, that part of life in which the body has not yet reached its full perfection.  See Adolescency.
 The sons must have a tedious time of childhood and adolescence, before they can either themselves assist their parents, or encourage them with new hopes of posterity. Bentley's Serm.

Adolescency
Adole'scency. n.s. The same with adolescence.
He was so far from a boy, that he was a man born, and at his full stature, if we believe Josephus, who places him in the last adolescency, and makes him twenty-five years old. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. v. c. 8.

Adopt
To Ado'pt. v.a. [adopto, Lat.]

 To take a son by choice; to make him a son, who was not so by birth.
 Were none of all my father's sisters left; Nay, were I of my mother's kin bereft; None by an uncle's or a grandame's side, Yet I cou'd some adopted heir provide. Dryd. Pers. Sat. vi.
 To place any person or thing in a nearer relation, than they have by nature, to something else.
 Whether, adopted to some neighb'ring star, Thou roll'st above us, in thy wand'ring race,Or, in procession fix'd and regular,Mov'd with the heav'ns majestic pace; Or call'd to more celestial bliss, Thou tread'st, with seraphims, the vast abyss. Dryd.
 We are seldom at ease from the solicitation of our natural or adopted desires; but a constant succession of uneasinesses, out of that stock, which natural wants, or acquired habits, have heaped up, take the will in their turns. Locke.

Adoptedly
Ado'ptedly. adv. [from adopted.] After the manner of something adopted.
Adoptedly, as school-maids change their names, By vain, though apt, affection. Shakesp. Measure for Meas.

Adopter
Ado'pter. n.s. [from adopt.] He that gives some one by choice the rights of'a son.

Adoption
Ado'ption. n.s. [adoptio, Lat.]

 The act of adopting, or taking to one's self what is not native.
 See the hell of having a false woman! My bed shall be abused, my coffers ransacked, my reputation gnawn at; and I shall not only receive this villainous wrong, but stand under the adoption of abominable terms, and by him that does me the wrong. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 The state of being adopted.
                     In which time she purpos'd, By watching, weeping, tendance, kissing, to O'ercome you with her shew: yes, and in time (When she had fitted you with her craft) to work Her son into th' adoption of the crown. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 In every act of our christian worship, we are taught to call upon him under the endearing character of our Father, to remind us of our adoption, that we are made heirs of God, and joint heirs of Christ. Rogers's Sermons.

Adoptive
Ado'ptive. adj. [adoptivus, Lat.]

 He that is adopted by another, and made his son.
 It is impossible an elective monarch should be so free and absolute as an hereditary; no more than it is possible for a father to have so full power and interest in an adoptive son, as in a natural. Bacon's Considerations on a War with Spain.
 He that adapts another, and makes him his son.
 An adopted son cannot cite his adoptive father into court, without his leave. Ayliffe's Parergon Juris Canonici.

Adorable
Ado'rable. adj. [adorable, Fr.] That which ought to be adored; that which is worthy of divine honours.
 On these two, viz. the love of God, and our neighbour, hang both the law and the prophets, says the adorable Author of christianity; and the Apostle says, the end of the law is charity. Cheyne's Philosophical Principles.

Adorableness
Ado'rableness. n.s. [from adorable.] The quality of being adorable; worthiness of divine honours.

Adorably
Ado'rably. adv. [from adorable.] In a manner worthy of adoration.

Adoration
Adora'tion. n.s. [adoratio, Lat.]

 The external homage paid to the Divinity, distinct from mental reverence.
 Solemn and serviceable worship we name, for distinction sake, whatsoever belongeth to the church, or publick society, of God, by way of external adoration. Hooker, b. v. § 4.
 It is possible to suppose, that those who believe a supreme excellent Being, may yet give him no external adoration at all. Stillingfleet's Defence of Discourses on Rom. Idolatry.
 Homage paid to persons in high place or esteem.
 O ceremony, shew me but thy worth: What is thy toll, O adoration! Art thou nought else, but place, degree, and form, Creating awe and fear in other men? Wherein thou art less happy, being fear'd, Than they in fearing. What drink'st thou oft, instead of homage sweet, But poison'd ﬂattery? Shakespeare's Henry V.

Adore
To Ado're. v.a. [adoro, Lat.]

 To worship with external homage; to pay divine honours.
 The mountain nymphs and Themis they adore, And from her oracles relief implore. Dryden.
  It is used, popularly, to denote a high degree of reverence or regard; to reverence; to honor; to love.
 The people appear adoring their prince, and their prince adoring God. Tatler, № 57–

Adorement
Ado'rement. n.s. [from adore.] Adoration; worship; a word scarcely used.
The priests of elder times deluded their apprehensions with sooth-saying, and such oblique idolatries, and won their credulities to the literal and downright adorement of cats, lizzards, and beetles.	Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i. c. 3.

Adorer
Ado'rer. n.s. [from adore.]
He that adores; a worshiper: a term generally used in a low sense; as, by lovers, or admirers.
Being so far provoked as I was in France, I would abate her nothing; thought I profess myself her adorer, not her friend. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
Whilst as th' approaching pageant does appear, And echoing crouds speak mighty Venus near; I, her adorer, too devoutly stand Fast on the utmost margin of the land. Prior.

	A worshipper, in a serious sense.
He was so severe an adorer of truth, as not to dissemble; or to suffer any man to think that he would do any thing, which he resolved not to do. Clarendon.

Adorn
To Ado'rn.  v.a. [adorno, Lat.]

 To dress; to deck the person with ornaments.
 He hath clothed me with the garments of salvation; he hath covered me with the robe of righteousness, as a bridegroom decketh himself with ornaments, and as a bride adorneth herself with her jewels. Isaiah, lxi. 10.
 Yet 'tis not to adorn and gild each part, That shews more cost than art; Jewels at nose and lips, but ill appear. Cowley.
 To set out any place or thing with decorations.
 A gallery adorned with the pictures or statuses of the invention of things useful to human life. Cowley.
 To embellish with oratory or elegance of language.
 This will supply men's tongues with many new things, to be named, adorned, and described, in their discourse. Sprat's History of the Royal Society.
 Thousands there are in darker fame that dewll, Whose names some nobler poem shall adorn; For, though unknown to me, they sure fought well. Dryd.

Adornment
Ado'rnment. n.s. [from adorn.] Ornament; embellishment; elegance.
 Which attribute was not given to the earth, while it was confused; nor to the heavens, before they had motion and adornment.	Raleigh's History of the World.
 She held the very garment of Posthumus in more respect than my noble and natural person, together with the adornment of my qualities. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.

Adown (adverb)
Ado'wn. adv. [from a and down.] Down; on the ground.
Thrice did she sink adown, in deadly sound, And thrice he her reviv'd with busy pain. Fairy Queen, b. i.

Adown (preposition)
Ado'wn. prep. Down; towards the ground; from a higher situation towards a lower.
 In this remembrance Emily ere day Arose, and dress'd herself in rich array; Fresh as the month, and as the morning fair, Adown her shoulders fell her length of hair. Dryd. Fables.

Adread
Adre'ad. adv. [from a and dread; as, aside, athirst, asleep.] In a state of fear; frighted; terrified: now obsolete.
And thinking to make all men adread to such a one an enemy, who would not spare, nor fear to kill so great a prince. Sidney, b. ii.

Adrift
Adri'ft. adv. [from a and drift, from drive.] Floating at random; as, any impulse may drive.
                         Then, shall this mount Of paradise, by might of waves, be mov'd Out of his place, push'd by the horned flood; With all his verdure spoil'd, and trees adrift Down the great river, to the opening gulf, And there take root. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi. l. 832.
It seem'd a corps adrift, to distant sight; But at a distance who could judge aright. Dryd. Fables.
The custom of frequent reflection will keep their minds from running adrift, and call their thoughts home from useless unattentive roving. Locke on Education, § 176.

Adroit
Adro'it. adj. [French.] Dextrous; active; skilful.
 An adroit stout fellow would sometimes destroy a whole family, with justice apparently against him the whole time. Jervas's Introduct. to Don Quixote.

Adroitness
Adro'itness. n.s. [from adroit.] Dexterity; readiness; activity. Neither this word, nor adroit, seem yet completely naturalized.

Adry
Adry'. adv. [from a and dry.] Athirst; thirsty; in want of drink.
He never told any of them, that he was his humble servant, but his well-wisher; and would rather be than thought a malecontent, than drink the king's health when he was not adry. Spect.

Adscititious
Adsciti'tious. adj. [adscititius, Lat.]
That which is taken in to complete something else, though originally extrinsick; supplemental; additional.

Adstriction
Adstri'ction. n.s. [adstrictio, Lat.]
The act of binding together; and applied, generally, to medicaments and applications, which have the power of making the part contract.

Adulation
Adula'tion. n.s. [adulation, Fr. adulatio, Lat.] Flattery; high compliment.
                 O be sick, great Greatness! And bid thy ceremony give thee cure. Think'st thou the firy fever will go out, With titles blown from adulation? Shakesp. Henry V.
 They who flattered him most before, mentioned him now with the greatest bitterness, and called him now the corrupter of the king, and betrayer of the people; without imputing the least crime to him, committed since the time of that exalted adulation, or that was not then as much known to them, as it could be now. Clarendon.

Adulator
Adula'tor. n.s. [adulator, Lat.] A flatterer. Dict.

Adulatory
A'dulatory. adj. [adulatorius, Lat.] Flattering; full of compliments.

Adult (adjective)
Adu'lt. adj. [adultus, Lat.] Grown up; past the age of infancy and weakness.
They would appear less able to approve themselves, not only to the confessor, but even to the catechist, in their adult age, than they were in their minority; as having scarce ever thought of the principles of their religion, since they conned them to avoid correction. Decay of Piety.
The earth, by these applauded schools, 'tis said, This single crop of men and women bred; Who grown adult, (so chance, it seems, enjoin'd) Did, male and female, propagate their kind. Blackmore.

Adult (noun)
Adu'lt. n.s. A person above the age of infancy, or grown to some degree of strength; sometimes full grown: a word used chiefly by medicinal writers.
 The depression of the cranium, without a fracture, can but seldom occur; and then it happens to children, whose bones are more pliable and soft than those of adults. Sharp's Surgery.

Adulter
To Adu'lter. v.a. [adulterer, Fr. adultero, Lat.] To commit adultery with another: a word not classical.
                         His chaste wife He adulters still: his thoughts lye with a whore. Ben. Johns.

Adulterant
Adu'lterant. n.s. [adulterans, Lat.] The person or thing, which adulterates.

Adulterate (adjective)
Adu'lterate. adj. [from To adulterate.]

 Tainted with the guilt of adultery.
 I am possess'd with an adulterate blot; My blood is mingled with the grime of lust; Being strumpeted by thy contagion. Shakesp. Comedy of Err.
 —— That incestuous, that adulterate beast. Idem, Hamlet.
 Corrupted with some foreign mixture.
 It does indeed differ no more, than the maker of adulterate wares does from the vender of them. Governm. of the Tongue.
 They will have all their gold and silver, and may keep their adulterate copper at home; for we are determined not to purchase it with our manufactures. Swift's Miscellanies.

Adulterate (verb)
Adu'lterate. v.a. [adulterer, Fr. adultero, Lat.]

 To commit adultery.
                     But fortune, oh! Adulterates hourly with thine uncle John;  And with her golden hand hath pluckt on France. Shakesp. King John.
 To corrupt by some foreign admixture; to contaminate.
 Common pot-ashes, bought of them that sell it in shops, who are not so foolishly knavish, as to adulterate them with salt-petre, which is much dearer than pot-ashes. Boyle.
 Could a man be composed to such an advantage of constitution, that it should not at all adulterate the images of his mind; yet this second nature would alter the crasis of his understanding. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica, c. xvi.
 The present war has so adulterated our tongue with strange words, that it would be impossible for one of our great-grandfathers to know what his posterity has been doing. Spectator.

Adulterateness
Adu'lterateness. n.s. [from adulterate.] The quality or state of being adulterate, or counterfeit.

Adulteration
Adultera'tion. n.s. [from adulterate.]

 The act of adulterating or corrupting by foreign mixture; contamination.
 To make the compound pass for the rich metal simple, is an adulteration or counterfeiting: but if it be done avowedly, and without disguising, it may be a great saving of the richer metal. Bacon's Natural History, № 798.
 The state of being adulterated, or contaminated.
 Such translations are like the adulteration of the noblest wines, where something of the colour, spirit, and flavour, will remain; and, while they please some injudicious palates, do only raise the indignation of every good taste. Felton on the Class.

Adulterer
Adu'lterer. n.s. [adulter, Lat.] The person guilty of adultery.
With what impatience must the muse behold, The wife by her procuring husband sold; For tho' the law makes null th' adulterer's deed Of lands to her, the cuckold may succeed. Dryd. Juvenal.

Adulteress
Adu'lteress. n.s. [from adulterer.] A woman that commits adultery.
The Spartan lady replied, when she was asked, What was the punishment for adulteresses? There are no such things here. Government of the Tongue, § 3.
A robe of tissue, stiff with golden wire; An upper vest, once Helen's rich attire; From Argos by the fam'd adult'ress brought; With golden flow'rs and winding foliage wrought. Dry. Vir.

Adulterine
Adu'lterine. n.s. [adulterine, Fr. adulterinus, Lat.] A child born of an adulteress: a term of canon law.

Adulterous
Adu'lterous. adj. [adulter, Lat.] Guilty of adultery.
             Th' adulterous Antony, most large In his abominations, turns you off, And gives his potent regiment to a trull, That noses it against us. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.
An adulterous person is tied to restitution of the injury, so far as it is reparable; and to make provision for the children, that they may not injure the legitimate. Taylor.
Think on whose faith th' adult'rous youth rely'd; Who promis'd, who procur'd the Spartan bride? Dryd. Æn.

Adultery
Adu'ltery. n.s. [adulterium, Lat.] The act of violating the bed of a married person.
All thy domestic griefs at home be left, The wife's adult'ry, with the servant's theft; And (the most racking thought, which can intrude) Forget false friends, and their ingratitude. Dryd Juven.

Adultness
Adu'ltness. n.s. [from adult.] The state of being adult. See Adolescence. Dict.

Adumbrant
Adu'mbrant. adj. [from adumbrate.] That which gives a slight resemblance.

Adumbrate
To Adu'mbrate. v.a. [adumbro, Lat.]
To shadow out; to give a slight likeness; to exhibit a faint resemblance, like that which shadows afford of the bodies which they represent.
 Heaven is designed for our reward, as well as rescue; and therefore is adumbrated by all those positive excellencies, which can endear or recommend. Decay of Piety.

Adumbration
Adumbra'tion. n.s. [from adumbrate.]

 The act of adumbrating, or giving a slight and imperfect representation. See ADUMBRATE.
 To make some adumbration of that we mean, the interiour is rather an impulsion or contusion of the air, than an elision or section of the same. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 187.
 The slight and imperfect representation of a thing; a faint sketch.
 The observers view but the backside of the hangings; the right one is on the other side the grave: and our knowledge is but like those broken ends; at best a most confused adumbration. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica.
 Those of the first sort have some adumbration of the rational nature, as vegetables have of the sensible. Hale's Origin.

Adunation
Aduna'tion. n.s. [from ad and unus, Lat.] The state of being united; union: a word of little use.
 When, by glaciation, wood, straw, dust, and water, are supposed to be united into one lump, the cold does not cause any real union or adunation, but only hardening the aqueous parts of the liquor into ice; the other bodies, being accidentally present in that liquor, are frozen up in it, but not really united. Boyle.

Aduncity
Adu'ncity n.s. [aduncitas, Lat.] Crookedness; flexure inwards; hookedness.
 There can be no question, but the aduncity of the pounces, and beaks of the hawks, is the cause of the great and habitual immorality of those animals. Arbuthnot and Pope's Mart. Scrib.

Adunque
Adu'nque. adj. [aduncus, Lat.] Crooked; bending inwards; hooked.
 The birds that are speakers, are parrots, pies, jays, daws, and ravens; of which parrots have an adunque bill, but the rest not. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 238.

Adure
To Adu're. v.n. [aduro, Lat.] To burn up.
 Such a degree of heat, which doth neither melt nor scorch, doth mellow, and not adure. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 319.

Adust
Adu'st. adj. [adustus, Lat.]

 Burnt up; hot as with fire; scorched.
 By this means, the virtual heat of the water will enter; and such a heat as will not make the body adust, or fragile. Bacon.
                 Which with torrid heat, And vapours as the Libyan air adust,Began to parch that temperate clime. Milton's Par. Lost.
 It is generally now applied, in a medicinal or philosophical sense, to the complexion and humours of the body.
 Such humours are adust, as, by long heat, become of a hot and fiery nature, as choler, and the like. Quincy.
 To ease the soul of one oppressive weight, This quits an empire, that embroils a state.The same adust complexion has impell'dCharles to the convent, Philip to the field. Pope.

Adusted
Adu'sted. adj. [See Adust.]

 Burnt; scorched; dried with fire.
                      Sulphurous and nitrous foam They found, they mingled, and with subtle art, Concocted and adusted , they reduc'd To blackest grain, and into store convey'd. Paradise Lost.
 Hot, as the complexion.
 In regard they are but the fruits of adusted choler, and the evaporations of a vindicative spirit, Helia needs not much care for them; besides, she must give losers leave to speak. Howell.

Adustible
Adu'stible. adj. [from adust.] That which may be adusted, or burnt up. Dict.

Adustion
Adu'stion. n.s. [from adust.] The act of burning up, or drying, as by fire.
 This is ordinarily a consequent of a burning colliquative fever; the softer parts being melted away, the heat continuing its adustion, upon the drier and fleshy parts, changes into a marcid fever. Harvey on Consumptions.

Advance (noun)
Adva'nce. n.s. [from to advance.]

 The act of coming forward.
 All the foot were put into Abington, with a resolution to quit, or defend, the town, according to the manner of the enemy's advance towards it. Clarendon, b. viii.
 So, like the sun's advance, your titles show; Which, as he rises, does the warmer grow. Waller.
 A tendency to come forward to meet a lover; an act of invitation.
 In vain are all the practis'd wiles, In vain those eyes would love impart; Not all th' advances, all the smiles, Can move one unrelenting heart. Walsh.
 His genius was below The skill of ev'ry common beau; Who, tho' he cannot spell, is wise Enough to read a lady's eyes; And will each accidental glance Interpret for a kind advance. Swift's Miscell.
 He has described the unworthy passion of the goddess Calypso, and the indecent advances she made to detain him from his own country. Pope's Odyssey, b. vii. notes.
 Progression; rise from one point to another.
 Our Saviour raised the ruler's daughter, the widow's son, and Lazarus; the first of these, when she had just expired; the second, as he was carried to the grave on his bier; and the third, after he had been some time buried. And having, by these gradual advances, manifested his divine power, he at last exerted the highest and most glorious degree of it; and raised himself also by his own all-quickening virtue, and according to his own express prediction. Atterbury's Sermons.
 Men of study and thought, that reason right, and are lovers of truth, do make no great advances in their discoveries of it. Locke of Human Understanding, § 3.
 Improvement; progress towards perfection.
 The principle and object of the greatest importance in the world to the good of mankind, and for the advance and perfecting of human nature. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Advance (verb active)
To Adva'nce. v.a. [avancer, Fr.]

 To bring forward, in the local sense.
 Now morn, her rosy steps in th' eastern clime Advancing, sow'd the earth with orient pearl. Parad. Lost.
 To raise to preferment; to aggrandize.
 The declaration of the greatness of Mordecai, whereunto the king advanced him. Esther, x. 2.
 To improve.
 What laws can be advised more proper and effectual to advance the nature of man to its highest perfection, than these precepts of christianity? Tillotson.
 To heighten; to grace; to give lustre to.
 As the calling dignifies the man, so the man much more advances his calling. As a garment, though it warms the body, has a return with an advantage, being much more warmed by it. South's Sermons.
 To forward; to accelerate.
 These three last were slower than the ordinary Indian wheat of itself; and this culture did rather retard than advance. Bacon.
 To propose; to offer to the publick.
 I dare not advance my opinion against the judgment of so great an author; but I think it fair to leave the decision to the publick. Dryden's Fables, Pref.
 Some ne'er advance a judgment of their own, But catch the spreading notion of the town. Pop. Ess. on Crit.

Advance (verb neuter)
To Adva'nce. v.n.

 To come forward.
 At this the youth, whose vent'rous soul No fears of magick art controul,                   Advanc'd in open sight. Parnel.
 To make improvement.
 They who would advance in knowledge, and not deceive and swell themselves with a little articulated air, should not take words for real entities in nature, till they can frame clear and distinct ideas of those entities. Locke.

Advancement
Adva'ncement. n.s. [avancement, Fr.]

 The act of coming forward.
 This refinement having begun about the time of the revolution, I had some share in the honour of promoting it; and I observe, that it makes daily advancements, and, I hope, in time, will raise our language to the utmost perfection. Swift.
 The state of being advanced; preferment.
 During whose reign, the Percies of the North Finding his usurpation most unjust, Endeavour'd my advancement to the throne. Shakespeare's Henry VI. p. i.
 The act of advancing another.
 In his own grace he doth exalt himself More than in your advancement. Shakespeare's K. Lear.
 Improvement.
 Nor can we conceive it may be unwelcome unto those honoured worthies, who endeavour the advancement of learning. Brown's Pref. to Vulgar Errours.

Advancer
Adva'ncer. n.s. [from advance.] He that advances any thing; a promoter; forwarder.
Soon after the death of a great officer, who was judged no advancer of the king's matters, the king said to his solicitor Bacon, who was his kinsman, How, tell me truly, what say you of your cousin that is gone? Bacon's Apothegms.
Let us add only this concerning this latter sort, that they are greater advancers of defamatory designs, than the very first contrivers. Government of the Tongue, § 5.

Advantage (noun)
Adva'ntage. n.s. [avantage, Fr.]

 Superiority; often with of or over before a person.
 In the practical prudence of managing such gifts, the laity may have some advantage over the clergy; whose experience is, and ought to be, less of this world than the others. Sprat.
 All other sorts and sects of men would evidently have the advantage of us, and a much surer title to happiness than we. Atterbury's Preface to his Sermons.
 Superiority gained by stratagem, or unlawful means.
 The common law hath left them this benefit, whereof they make advantage, and wrest it to their bad purposes. Spenser's State of Ireland.
 But specially he took advantage of the night for such privy attempts, insomuch that the bruit of his manliness was spread every-where. 2 Macc. viii. 7.
 It is a noble and sure defiance of a great malice, backed with a great interest; which yet can have no advantage of a man, but from his own expectations of something, that is without him. South's Sermons.
 As soon as he was got to Sicily, they sent for him back; designing to take advantage, and prosecute him in the absence of his friends. Swift on the Dissent. in Athens and Rome.
 Opportunity; convenience.
                        I beseech you, If you think fit, or that it may be done, Give me advantage of some brief discourse With Desdemona alone. Shakespeare's Othello.
 Favourable circumstances.
 Like jewels to advantage set, Her beauty by the shade does get. Waller.
 A face, which is over-flushed, appears to advantage in the deepest scarlet, and the darkest complexion is not a little alleviated by a black hood. Addison's Spectator, № 165.
 True wit is nature to advantage dress'd, What oft was thought, but ne'er so well express'd. Pope's Essay on Criticism.
 Gain; profit.
 For thou saidst, what advantage will it be unto thee, and what profit shall I have, if I be cleansed from my sin? Job, xxxv. 3.
 Certain it is, that advantage now sits in the room of conscience, and steers all. South's Sermons.
 Overplus; something more than the mere lawful gain.
                  O my gentle Hubert, We owe thee much; within this wall of flesh There is a soul counts thee her creditor, And with advantage means to pay thy love. Shakespeare's King John.
 You said, you neither lend nor borrow Upon advantage. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 Preponderation on one side of the comparison.
 Much more should the consideration of this pattern arm us with patience against ordinary calamities; especially if we consider his example with this advantage, that though his sufferings were wholly undeserved, and not for himself but for us, yet he bore them patiently. Tillotson.

Advantage (verb)
To Adva'ntage. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To benefit.
 Convey what I set down, to my lady: it shall advantage more than ever the bearing of letter did. Shakespeare's Twelfth-Night.
 The great business of the senses being to make us take notice of what hurts or advantages the body, it is wisely ordered by nature, that pain should accompany the reception of several ideas. Locke.
 We should have pursued some other way, more effectual, for distressing the common enemy, and advantaging ourselves. Swift.
 The trial hath endamag'd thee no way, Rather more honour left, and more esteem; Me naught advantag'd, missing what I aim'd. Par. Regained.
 To promote; to bring forward; to gain ground.
 To ennoble it with the spirit that inspires the Royal Society, were to advantage it in one of the best capacities in which it is improveable. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica, Pref.

Advantage-ground
Adva'ntage-ground. n.s. Ground that gives superiority, and opportunities of annoyance or resistance.
This excellent man, who stood not upon the advantage-ground before, from the time of his promotion to the archbishoprick, or rather from that of his being commissioner of the treasury, exceedingly provoked, or underwent the envy, and reproach, and malice of men of all qualities and conditions; who agreed in nothing else. Clarendon.

Advantaged
Adva'ntaged. adj. [from to advantage.] Possessed of advantages.
In the most advantaged tempers, this disposition is but comparative; whereas the most of men labour under disadvantages, which nothing can rid them off. Glanv. Scepsis Scientifica.

Advantageous
Advanta'geous. adj. [avantageux, Fr.]

 Of advantage; profitable; useful; opportune; convenient.
 The time of sickness, or affliction, is, like the cool of the day to Adam, a season of peculiar propriety for the voice of God to be heard; and may be improved into a very advantageous opportunity of begetting or increasing spiritual life in the soul. Hammond's Fundamentals.
                                 Here perhaps Some advantageous act may be atchiev'd By sudden onset, either with hell-fire To waste his whole creation; or possess All as our own. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 363.
 It is used with relation to persons, and followed by to.
 Since every painter paints himself in his own works, 'tis advantageous to him to know himself, to the end that he may cultivate those talents which make his genius. Dryd. Dufresnoy.

Advantageously
Advanta'geously. adv. [from advantageous.] Conveniently; opportunely; profitably.
It was advantageously situated, there being an easy passage from it to Ægypt, Æthiopia, Persia, and India, by sea. Arbuth.

Advantageousness
Advanta'geousness. n.s. [from advantageous.] Quality of being advantageous; profitableness; usefulness; convenience.
The last property, which qualifies God for the fittest object of our love, is, the advantageousness of his to us, both in the present and the future life. Boyle's Seraphic Love.

Advene
To Adve'ne. v.n. [advenio, Lat.]
To accede to something; to become part of something else, without being essential; to be superadded.
A sixth cause considered in judicature, is stiled an accidental cause; and the accidental of any act, is said to be whatever advenes to the act itself already substantiated. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Advenient
Adve'nient. adj. [adveniens, Lat.]
Advening; coming from outward causes; superadded.
If to suppose the soul a distinct substance from the body, and extrinsically advenient, be a great error in philosophy, almost all the world hath hitherto been mistaken. Glanville's Vanity of Dogmatism.
Being thus divided from truth in themselves, they are yet farther removed by advenient deception; for they are daily mocked into error by subtler devisers. Brown's Vulg. Errours.

Advent
A'dvent. n.s. [from adventus; that is, adventus Redemptoris.]
The name of one of the holy seasons, signifying the coming; that is, the coming of our Saviour: which is made the subject of our devotion during the four weeks before Christmas.

Adventine
Adve'ntine. adj. [from advenio, adventum.] Adventitious; that which is extrinsically added; that which comes from outward causes: a word scarcely in use.
As for the peregrine heat, it is thus far true, that, if the proportion of the adventine heat be greatly predominant to the natural heat and spirits of the body, it tendeth to dissolution or notable alteration. Bacon's Natural History, № 836.

Adventitious
Adventi'tious. adj. [adventitius, Lat.]
That which advenes; accidental; supervenient; extrinsically added, not essentially inherent.
Diseases of continuance get an adventitious strength from custom, besides their material cause from the humours. Bacon.
Though we may call the obvious colours natural, and the others adventitious; yet such changes of colours, from whatsoever cause they proceed, may be properly enough taken in, to illustrate the present subject. Boyle on Colours.
If his blood boil, and th' adventitious fire Rais'd by high meats, and higher wines, require To temper and allay the burning heat; Waters are brought, which by decoction get New coolness. Dryd. Juvenal, Sat. v.
Of this we have an instance in the gem-kind; where, of all the many sorts reckoned up by lapidaries, there are not above three or four that are original; their diversities, as to lustre, colour, and hardness, arising from the different admixture of other adventitious mineral matter. Woodward's Natural Hist.

Adventive
Adve'ntive. n.s. [from advenio, Lat.] The thing or person that comes from without: a word not now in use.
That the natives be not so many, but that there may be elbow-room enough for them, and for the adventives also. Bacon's Advice to Sir George Villiers.

Adventual
Adve'ntual. adj. [from advent.]
Relating to the season of advent.
I do also daily use one other collect; as, namely, the collects adventual, quadragesimal, paschal, or pentecostal, for their proper seasons. Bishop Saunderson upon Submission to Usurpers.

Adventure (noun)
Adve'nture. n.s. [French.]

 An accident; a chance; a hazard; an event of which we have no direction.
 The general summoned three castles that were near: one desperate of succour, and not desirous to dispute the defence, presently yielded; but two stood upon their adventure. Sir John Hayward.
 In this sense is used the phrase, at all adventures; [à l'adventure, Fr.] By chance; without any rational scheme.
 Blows flew at all adventures, wounds and deaths given and taken unexpected; many scarce knowing their enemies from their friends. Sir John Hayward.
 Where the mind does not perceive this probable connection, there men's opinions are the effects of chance and hazard, of a mind floating at all adventures, without choice and without direction. Locke.
 The occasion of casual events; an enterprise in which something must be left to hazard.
For I must love, and am resolv'd, to try My fate, or, failing in th' adventure, die. Dryden's Fables.

This noun, with all its derivatives, is frequently written without ad; as, venture, venturous.

Adventure (verb)
To Adve'nture. v.n. [adventurer, Fr.]

 To try the chance; to dare.
                                     Be not angry, Most mighty princess, that I have adventur'd To try your taking of a false report. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 The tender and delicate woman among you, which would not adventure to set the sole of her foot upon the ground, for delicateness and tenderness. Deuter. xxviii. 26.
 In an active sense, to put into the power of chance.
 For my father fought for you, and adventured his life for, and delivered you out of the hand of Midian. Judges, ix. 17.
 It is often used with the reciprocal pronoun; as, he adventured himself.

Adventurer
Adve'nturer. n.s. [adventurier, Fr.]
He that seeks occasions of hazard; he that puts himself in the hands of chance.
He is a great adventurer, said he, That hath his sword through hard assay foregone, And now hath vow'd, till he avenged be Of that despight, never to wear none. Fairy Queen, b. ii.
The kings of England did not make the conquest of Ireland their own work; it was begun by particular adventurers, and other voluntaries, who came to seek their fortunes in Ireland. Sir John Davies on Ireland.
In this action, highly commendable, he intended to hazard his own action, that so the more easily he might win adventurers, who else were like to be less forward. Sir W. Raleigh's Ess.
Had it not been for the British, which the late wars drew over, and of adventurers or soldiers seated here, the country had, by the last war, and plague, been left, in a manner, destitute. Temple's Miscellanies.
Their wealthy trade from pirate's rapine free, Our merchants shall no more adventurers be. Dryden.

Adventuresome
Adve'nturesome. adj. [from adventure.]
The same with adventurous: a low word, scarcely used in writing.

Adventuresomeness
Adve'nturesomeness. n.s. [from adventuresome.]
The quality of being adventuresome. Dict.

Adventurous
Adve'nturous. adj. [adventureux, Fr.]

 He that is inclined to adventures; and, consequently, bold, daring, courageous.
 At land and sea, in many a doubtful fight, Was never known a more advent'rous knight; Who oftner drew his sword, and always for the right. Dryd. Hind and Panther.
 Applied to things; that which is full of hazard; which requires courage; dangerous.
 But I've already troubled you too long, Nor dare attempt a more advent'rous song. My humble verse demands a softer theme; A painted meadow, or a purling stream. Addison.

Adventurously
Adve'nturously. adv. [from adventurous.] After an adventurous manner; boldly; daringly.
They are both hanged; and so would this be, if he durst steal any thing adventurously. Shakespeare's Henry V.

Adverb
A'dverb. n.s. [adverbium, Lat.]
A word joined to a verb or adjective, and solely applied to the use of qualifying and restraining the latitude of their significance, by the intimation of some circumstance thereof; as, of quality, manner, degree. Clarke's Latin Grammar.
Thus we say, he runs swiftly; the bird flies aloft; he lives virtuously.

Adverbial
Adve'rbial. adj. [adverbialis, Lat.] That which has the quality or structure of an adverb.

Adverbially
Adve'rbially. adv. [adverbialiter, Lat.]
Like an adverb; in the manner of an adverb.
I should think alta was joined adverbially with tremit, did Virgil make use of so equivocal a syntax. Addis. Rem. on Italy.

Adversable
Adve'rsable. adj. [from adverse.] Contrary to; opposite to. Dict.

Adversaria
Adversa'ria. n.s. [Lat. A book, as it should seem, in which Debtor and Creditor were set in opposition.] A common-place; a book to note in.
 These parchments are supposed to have been St. Paul's adversaria. Bull's Sermons.

Adversary
A'dversary. n.s. [adversaire, Fr. aversarius, Lat.]
An opponent; antagonist; enemy: generally applied to those that have verbal or judicial quarrels; as, controvertists or litigants: sometimes, to an opponent in single combat. It may sometimes imply an open profession of enmity; as we say, a secret enemy is worse than an open adversary.
Yet am I noble, as the adversary I come to cope. Shakespeare's King Lear.
Those rites and ceremonies of the church, therefore, which were the self-same now that they were, when holy and virtuous men maintained them against profane and deriding adversaries, her own children have in derision. Hooker, b. i § 1.
Mean while th' adversary of God and man, Satan, with thoughts inflam'd, of highest design, Puts on swift wings. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 620.
An adversary, on the contrary, makes a stricter search into us, and discovers every flaw and imperfection in our tempers. A friend exaggerates a man's virtues; an enemy inflames his crimes. Addison. Spectator, № 399.

Adversative
Adve'rsative. adj. [adversativus, Lat.]
A term of grammar, applied to a word which makes some opposition or variety; as in this sentence: This diamond is orient, but it is rough.  But is an adversative conjunction.

Adverse
A'dverse. adj. [adversus, Lat.]
In prose, it has now the accent on the first syllable; in verse it is accented on the first by Shakespeare; on either, indifferently, by Milton; on the last, by Dryden; on the first, by Roscommon.

 Acting with contrary directions; as, two bodies in collision.
 Was I for this nigh wreckt upon the sea, And twice, by adverse winds, from England's bank Drove back again unto my native clime? Shakesp. Henry VI.
 As when two polar winds blowing adverse, Upon the Cronian sea together drive Mountains of ice. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x. l. 289.
 With adverse blast up-turns them from the South, Notus and Afer. Ibid. l. 701.
 A cloud of smoke envelopes either host, And all at once the combatants are lost; Darkling they join adverse, and shock unseen; Coursers with coursers justling, men with men. Dryd.
 Figuratively; contrary to the wish or desire; thence, calamitous; afflictive; pernicious. It is opposed to prosperous.
 What if he hath decreed, that I shall first Be try'd in humble state, and things adverse; By tribulations, injuries, insults, Contempts, and scorns, and snares, and violence. Par. Reg.
 Some the prevailing malice of the great, Unhappy men, or adverse fate, Sunk deep into the gulfs of an afflicted state. Roscommon.
 Personally opponent; the person that counteracts another, or contests any thing.
 Well she saw her father was grown her adverse party; and yet her fortune such, as she must favour her rivals. Sidney.

Adversity
Adve'rsity. n.s. [adversité, Fr.]
Affliction; calamity; that is, opposition to our wishes.

 The cause of our sorrow; affliction; misfortune. In this sense, it may have a plural.
 Let me embrace these sour adversities, For wise men say, it is the wisest course. Shakesp. Hen. VI.
 The state of unhappiness; misery.
 Sweet are the uses of adversity, Which like the toad, ugly and venomous, Wears yet a precious jewel in his head. Shak. As you like it.
 Concerning deliverance itself from all adversity, we use not to say men are in adversity, whensoever they feel any small hindrance of their welfare in this world, but when some notable affliction or cross, some great calamity or trouble, befalleth them. Hooker, b. v. § 48.
 A remembrance of the good use he had made of prosperity, contributed to support his mind under the heavy weight of adversity, which then lay upon him. Atterbury's Sermons.

Adversly
Adve'rsly. adv. [from adverse.]
In an adverse manner; oppositely; unfortunately.
What I think, I utter, and spend my malice in my breath. Meeting two such wealsmen as you are, (I cannot call you Lycurgusses) if the drink you give me touch my palate adversly, I make a crooked face at it. Shakesp. Coriolanus.

Advert
To Adve'rt. v.n. [adverto, Lat.]
To attend to; to regard; to observe; with the particle to before the object of regard.
The mind of man being not capable at once to advert to more than one thing, a particular view and examination of such an innumerable number of vast bodies, will afford matter of admiration. Ray on the Creation.
Now to the universal whole advert; The earth regard as of that whole a part; In which wide frame more noble worlds abound; Witness, ye glorious orbs, which hang around. Blackmore.
We sometimes say, To advert the mind to an object.

Advertence
Adve'rtence. n.s. [from advert.] Attention to; regard to; consideration.
Christianity may make Archimedes his challenge; give it but where it may set its foot; allow but a sober advertence to its proposals, and it will move the whole world. Decay of Piety.

Advertency
Adve'rtency. n.s. [from advert.]
The same with advertence. Attention; regard; heedfulness.
Too much advertency is not your talent; or else you had fled from that text, as from a rock. Swift.

Advertise
To Adverti'se. v.a. [advertir, Fr.]
It is now spoken with the accent upon the last syllable; but appears to have been anciently accented on the second.

 To inform another; to give intelligence; with an accusative of the person informed.
                  The bishop did require a respite, Wherein he might the king his lord advertise, Whether our daughter were legitimate. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
 As I by friends am well advertised, Sir Edmund Courtney, and the haughty prelate, Bishop of Exeter, his elder brother, With many more confederates are in arms. Shakespeare's Richard III.
 To inform; to give notice: with of before the subject of information.
 The death of Selymus nothing suspected, Ferhates, understanding that Solyman expected more assured advertisement, sent unto the other Bassas; unto whom he declared the death of the emperor: of which they, by another messenger, advertised Solyman, firming those letters with all their hands and seals. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 They were to advertise the chief hero of the distresses of his subjects, occasioned by his absence, to crave his succour, and solicite him to hasten his return. Dryd. Pref. Dufresn.
 To give notice of any thing, by means of an advertisement in the publick prints; as, He advertised his loss.

Advertisement
Adverti'sement, or Adve'rtisement. n.s. [advertissement, Fr.]

 Instruction; admonition.
 — 'Tis all men's office to speak patience To those, that wring under the load of sorrow; But no man's virtue nor sufficiency, To be so moral, when he shall endure The like himself: therefore give me no counsel; My griefs are louder than advertisement. Shakespeare's Much ado about Nothing.
 Intelligence; information.
 Then, as a cunning prince that useth spies, If they return no news, doth nothing know; But if they make advertisement of lies, The prince's counsel all awry do go. Sir John Davies.
 He had received advertisement, that the party, which was sent for his relief from London, had received some brush in Somersetshire, which would much retard their march. Clarendon.
 The drum and trumpet, by their several sounds, serve for many kinds of advertisements, in military affairs: the bells serve to proclaim a scare-fire; and, in some places, water-breaches; the departure of a man, woman, or child; time of divine service; the hour of the day; day of the month. Holder.
 Notice of any thing published in a paper of intelligence.

Advertiser
Adverti'ser. n.s. [advertiseur, Fr.]

 He that gives intelligence or information.

 The paper in which advertisements are published.

Advertising
Adve'rtising, or Adverti'sing. part.adj. [from advertise.] Active in giving intelligence; monitory: a word not now in use.
                         As I was then Advertising, and holy to your business, Not changing heart with habit, I am still Attornied at your service. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.

Advesperate
To Adve'sperate. v.n. [advespero, Lat.]
To draw towards evening. Dict.

Advice
Advi'ce. n.s. [avis, advis, Fr. from adviso, low Latin.]

 Counsel; instruction: except that instruction implies superiority, and advice may be given by equals or inferiors.
 Break we our match up; and, by my advice, Let us impart what we have seen to-night, Unto young Hamlet. Shakesp. Hamlet.
 O troubled, weak and coward, as thou art! Without thy poor advice, the lab'ring heart To worse extremes with swifter steps would run; Not sav'd by virtue, yet by vice undone. Prior.
 Reflection; prudent consideration; as, he always acts with good advice.
 What he hath won, that he hath fortified: So hot a speed, with such advice dispos'd, Such temperate order, in so fierce a course, Doth want example. Shakesp. King John.
 Consultation; deliberation; with the particle with.
 Great princes, for the most part, taking advice with workmen, with no less cost, set their things together. Bacon's Ess.
 Intelligence; as, the merchants received advice of their loss. This sense is somewhat low, and chiefly commercial.

Advice-boat
Advi'ce-boat. n.s. A vessel employed to bring intelligence.

Advisable
Advi'sable. adj. [from advise.] Prudent; fit to be advised.
Some judge it advisable for a man to account with his heart every day; and this, no doubt, is the best and surest course; for still the oftner, the better. South's Sermons.
It is not advisable to reward, where men have the tenderness not to punish. L'Estrange's Fables.

Advisableness
Advi'sableness. n.s. [from advisable.] The quality of being advisable, or fit; fitness; propriety.

Advise (verb active)
To Advi'se. v.a. [adviser, Fr.]

 To counsel; with the particle to before the thing advised.
 lf you do stir abroad, go arm'd. ——
 —— Arm'd, brother! —— —— Brother, I advise you to the best. Shak. K Lear.
 I would advise all gentlemen to learn merchants accounts, and not to think it a skill that belongs not to them. Locke.
 When I consider the scruples and cautions I here lay in your way, methinks it looks as if I advised you to something which I would have offered at, but in effect not done. Idem.
 To give information; to inform; to make acquainted with any thing; often with the particle of before the thing told.
 You were advis'd, his flesh was capable Of wounds and scars; and that his forward spirit Would lift him, where most trade of danger rang'd. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
                          Such discourse bring on, As may advise him of his happy state; Happiness in his pow'r, left free to will. Paradise Lost.
 A posting messenger, dispatch'd from hence, Of this fair troop advis'd their aged prince. Dryden's Æneid.

Advise (verb neuter)
To Advi'se. v.n.

 To consult; with the particle with before the person consulted; as, he advised with his companions.

 To consider; to deliberate.
                  Advise if this be worth Attempting, or to sit in darkness here, Hatching vain empires. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.

Advised
Advi'sed. participial adj. [from advise.]

 Acting with deliberation and design; prudent; wise.
 Let his travel appear rather in his discourse, than in his apparel or gesture; and, in his discourse, let him be rather advised in his answers, than forward to tell stories. Bacon's Ess.
                  Th' Almighty Father, where he sits Shrin'd in his sanctuary of heav'n secure, Consulting on the sum of things foreseen, This tumult, and permitted all, advis'd. Paradise Lost, b. vi.
 Performed with deliberation; done on purpose; acted with design.
 By that which we work naturally, as, when we breathe, sleep, and move, we set forth the glory of God, as natural agents do; albeit we have no express purpose to make that our end, nor any advised determination therein to follow a law. Hooker, b. i. p. 49.
 In my school-days, when I had lost one shaft,I shot his fellow of the self-same flight, The self-same way, with more advised watch, To find the other forth; by vent'ring both, I oft found both. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.

Advisedly
Advi'sedly. adv. [from advised.] Deliberately; purposely; by design; prudently.
Surprise may be made by moving things, when the party is in haste, and cannot stay to consider advisedly of that which is moved. Bacon, Essay xxiii.
Thou stilest second thoughts (which are by all allowed the best) a relapse; and talkest of a quagmire, where no man ever stuck fast; and accusest constancy of mischief in what is natural, and advisedly undertaken. Sir John Suckling.

Advisedness
Advi'sedness. n.s. [from advised.] Deliberation; cool and prudent procedure.
While things are in agitation, private men may modestly tender their thoughts to the consideration of those that are in authority; to whose care it belongeth, in prescribing concerning indifferent things, to proceed with all just advisedness and moderation. Saunderson's Judgment in one View.

Advisement
Advi'sement. n.s. [advisement, Fr.]

 Counsel; information.
                          Mote I wote, What strange adventure do ye now pursue? Perhaps my succour, or advisement meet, Mote stead you much your purpose to subdue. Fairy Queen.
 I will, according to your advisement, declare the evils, which seem most hurtful. Spenser's State of lreland.
 It is taken likewise, in old writers, for prudence and circumspection. It is now, in both senses, antiquated.

Adviser
Advi'ser. n.s. [from advise.] The person that advises, or gives counsel; a counsellor.
Here, free from court-compliances, he walks, And with himself, his best adviser, talks. Waller.
They never fail of their most artful and indefatigable address, to silence this impertinent adviser, whose severity awes their excesses. Rogers's Sermons.

Advocacy
A'dvocacy. n.s. [from advocate.] The act of pleading; vindication; defence; apology: a word in little use.
If any there are who are of opinion, that there are no antipodes, or that the stars do fall, they shall not want herein the applause or advocacy of Satan. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i.

Advocate
A'dvocate. n.s. [advocatus, Lat.]

 He that pleads the cause of another in a court of judicature.
 An advocate, in the general import of the word, is that person who has the pleading and management of a judicial cause. In a strict way of speaking, only that person is stiled advocate who is the patron of the cause, and is often, in Latin, termed togatus, and in English, a person of the long robe. Ayl. Par.
 Learn what thou ow'st thy countrv and thy friend; What's requisite to spare, and what to spend: Learn this; and, after, envy not the store Of the greas'd advocate that grinds the poor. Dryd. Perseus.
 He that pleads any cause, in whatever manner, as a controvertist or vindicator.
 If she dares trust me with her little babe, I'll shew 't the king, and undertake to be Her advocate to th' loudest. Shakesp. Hamlet.
 Of the several forms of government that have been, or are, in the world, that cause seems commonly the better, that has the better advocate, or is advantaged by fresher experience. Temple's Miscellanies.
 It is used with the particle for before the person or thing, in whose favour the plea is offered.
 Foes to all living worth except your own, And advocates for folly dead and gone. Pope's Epistles.
 In the scriptural and sacred sense, it stands for one of the offices of our Redeemer.
                          Me his advocate And propitiation; all his works on me, Good, or not good, ingraft. Milton's Paradise Lost.

Advocation
Advoca'tion. n.s. [from advocate.] The office of pleading; plea; apology.
                 Alas! thrice gentle Cassio, My advocation is not now in tune; My lord is not my lord; nor should I know him, Were he in favour, as in humour, alter'd. Shakesp. Othello.

Advolation
Advola'tion. n.s. [advolo, advolatum, Lat.] The act of flying to something. Dict.

Advolution
Advolu'tion. n.s. [advolutio, Lat.] The act of rolling to something.

Advoutry
Advo'utry. n.s. [avoutrie, Fr.] Adultery.
 He was the most perfidious man upon the earth, and he had made a marriage compounded between an advoutry and a rape. Bacon's Henry VII.

Advowe
Advowe'. n.s. He that has the right of advowson. See Advowson.

Advowson
Advo'wson, or Advo'wzen. n.s. [In common law.]
A right to present to a benefice, and signifies as much as Jus Patronatûs. In the canon law, it is so termed, because they that originally obtained the right of presenting to any church, were great benefactors thereto; and are therefore termed sometimes Patroni, sometimes Advocati. Cowell.

Adz
Adz. n.s. See Addice.

Ae
AE, or Æ. A diphthong of very frequent use in the Latin language, which seems not properly to have any place in the English; since the æ of the Saxons has been long out of use, being changed to e simple, to which, in words frequently occuring, the æ of the Romans is, in the same manner, altered, as in equator, equinoctial, and even in Eneas.

Aegilops
Æ'gilops. n.s. [αἴγιλωψ, Gr. signifying goat-eyed, the goat being subject to this ailment.]
A tumour or swelling in the great corner of the eye, by the root of the nose, either with or without an inflammation: also a plant so called, for its supposed virtues against such a distemper. Quincy.
 Ægilops is a tubercle in the inner canthus of the eye. Wiseman's Surgery.

Aeglogue
Æ'glogue. n.s. [written instead of eclogue, from a mistaken etymology.] A pastoral; a dialogue in verse between goatherds.
Which moved him rather in æglogues otherwise to write, doubting, perhaps, his ability, which he little needed, or minding to furnish our tongue with this kind wherein it faulteth. Spenser's Pastorals.

Aegyptiacum
Ægypti'acum. n.s. An ointment consisting only of honey, verdigrease and vinegar. Quincy.

Ael
Æl, or Eal, or Al.
In compound names, as πᾶν in the Greek compounds, signifies all, or altogether. So Ælwin is a compleat conqueror: Albert, all illustrious:  Aldred, altogether reverend: Alfred, altogether peaceful. To these Pammachius, Pancratius, Pamphilius, &c. do in some measure answer. Gibson's Camden.

Aelf
Ælf, (which, according to various dialects, is pronounced ulf, welph, hulph, hilp, helfe, and, at this day, helpe) implies assistance. So Ælfwin is victorious, and Ælfwold, an auxiliary governor; Ælfgifa, a lender of assistance: with which Boetius, Symmachus, Epicurus, &c. bear a plain analogy. Gibson's Camden.

Aenigma
Æni'gma. See Enigma.

Aerial
Ae'rial. adj. [aërius, Lat.]

 Belonging to the air, as consisting of it.
                     The thunder, when to roll With terrour through the dark aerial hall. Paradise Lost.
 From all that can with fins or feathers fly, Thro' the aerial or the wat'ry sky. Prior.
 I gathered the thickness of the air, or aerial interval, of the glasses at that ring. Newton's Opticks.
 Vegetables abound more with aerial particles, than animal substances. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Produced by the air.
 The gifts of heav'n my foll'wing song pursues, Aerial honey, and ambrosial dews. Dryd. Virg. Georg.
 Inhabiting the air.
                 Where those immortal shapes Of bright aerial spirits live inspher'd, In regions mild, of calm and serene air. Paradise Regained.
 Aerial animals may be subdivided into birds and flies. Locke.
 Placed in the air.
 Here subterranean works and cities see, There towns aerial on the waving tree. Pope's Essay on Man.
 High; elevated in situation, and therefore in the air.
 A spacious city stood, with firmest walls, Sure mounded, and with numerous turrets crown'd, Aerial spires, and citadels, the seat Of kings and heroes resolute in war. Philips.

Aerie
A'erie. n.s. [airie, Fr.]
The proper word in hawks and other birds of prey for that which we generally call a nest in other birds. Cowell.

Aerology
Aero'logy. n.s. [ἀὴρ and λόγος, Gr.] The doctrine of the air.

Aeromancy
A'eromancy. n.s. [ἀὴρ and μάντις, Gr.] The art of divining by the air. Dict.

Aerometry
Aero'metry. n.s. [ἀὴρ and μετρέω.] The art of measuring the air. Dict.

Aeroscopy
Aero'scopy. n.s. [ἀὴρ and σκέπτω, Gr.] The observation of the air. Dict.

Aethiops-mineral
Æ'thiops-mineral. n.s.
A medicine so called, from its dark colour, prepared of quicksilver and sulphur, ground together in a marble mortar to a black powder. Such as have used it most, think its virtues not very great. Quincy.

Aetites
Æti'tes. n.s. [ἄετος, an eagle.] Eagle-stone. It is about the bigness of a chesnut, and hollow, with somewhat in it that rattles upon shaking. Quincy.

Afar
Afa'r. adv. [from a for at, and far.] See Far.

 At a great distance.
 So shaken as we are, so wan with care, Find we a time for frighted peace to pant, And breathe short-winded accents of new broils, To be commenc'd in strouds afar remote? Shakespeare's Henry IV.
 We hear better when we hold our breath than contrary; insomuch as in listening to attain a sound afar off, men hold their breath. Bacon's Natural History, № 284.
 To a great distance.
          Hector hastened to relieve his boy; Dismiss'd his bumish'd helm that shone afar, The pride of warriours, and the pomp of war. Dryd.
 From afar; from a distant place.
 The rough Vulturnus, furious in its course, With rapid streams divides the fruitful grounds, And from afar in hollow murmur sounds. Addison on Italy.
 Afar off; remotely distant.
 Much suspecting his secret ends, he entertained a treaty of peace with France, but secretly and afar off, and to be governed as occasions should vary. Sir John Hayward.

Afeard
Afe'ard. participial adj. [from to fear, for to fright, with a redundant.]

 Frighted; terrified; afraid.
 He loudly bray'd, that like was never heard, And from his wide devouring oven sent A flake of fire, that flashing in his beard, Him all amaz'd, and almost made afeard. Fairy Queen.
 But tell me, Hal, art thou not horridly afeard? Thou being heir apparent, could the world pick thee out three such enemies again, as Douglas, Percy, and Glendower. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 Till he cherish'd too much beard, And make Love, or me afeard. Ben. Johnson's Underwoods.
 It has the particle of before the object of fear.
 Fear is described by Spenser to ride in armour, at the clashing whereof he looks afeard of himself. Peacham.
It is now obsolete; the last authour whom I have found using it, is Sedley.

Afer
A'fer. n.s. [Lat.] The southwest wind.
 With adverse blast upturns them from the south, Notus, and Afer, black with thund'rous clouds, From Sierra Liona. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x.

Affability
Affabi'lity. n.s. [affabilité, Fr. affabilitas, Lat.] See Affable.
The quality of being affable; easiness of manners; courteousness; civility; condescension. It is commonly used of superiors.
         Hearing of her beauty and her wit, Her affability and bashful modesty, Her wond'rous qualities, and mild behaviour. Shakespeare's Taming of the Shrew.
 He was of a most flowing courtesy and affability to all men, and so desirous to oblige them, that he did not enough consider the value of the obligation, or the merit of the person. Clarend.
 All instances of charity, sweetness of conversation, affability, admonition, all significations of tenderness, care and watchfulness, must be expressed towards children. Taylor.
 It is impossible for a publick minister to be so open and easy to all his old friends, as he was in his private condition; but this may be helped out by an affability of address. L'Estrange.

Affable
A'ffable. adj. [affable, Fr. affabilis, Lat.]

 Easy of manners; accostable; courteous; complaisant. It is used of superiours.
 He was affable, and both well and fair spoken, and would use strange sweetness and blandishment of words, where he desired to affect or persuade any thing that he took to heart. Bacon.
         Her father is Baptista Minola, An affable and courteous gentleman. Shakesp. Tam. Shrew.
 Gentle to me, and affable hath been Thy condescension, and shall be honour'd ever With grateful memory. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. viii.
 It is applied to the external appearance; benign; mild; favourable.
 Augustus appeared, looking round him with a serene and affable countenance upon all the writers of his age. Tatler.

Affableness
A'ffableness. n.s. [from affable.] Courtesy; affability.

Affably
A'ffably. adv. [from affable.] In an affable manner; courteously; civilly.

Affabrous
A'ffabrous. adj. [affabre, Fr.] Skilfully made; complete; finished in a workman-like manner. Dict.

Affabulation
Affabula'tion. n.s. [affabulatio, Lat.] The moral of a fable. Dict.

Affair
Affa'ir. n.s. [affaire, Fr.] Business; something to be managed or transacted. It is used for both private and publick matters.
 I was not born for courts or great affairs; I pay my debts, believe, and say my prayers. Pope.
 A good acquaintance with method will greatly assist every one in ranging, disposing, and managing all human affairs. Watts's Logick.
 What St. John's skill in state affairs, What Ormond's valour, Oxford's cares, To aid their sinking country lent, Was all destroy'd by one event. Swift.

Affear
To Affe'ar. v.n. [from affier, Fr.] To confirm; to give a sanction to; to establish: an old term of law.
                     Bleed, bleed, poor country! Great tyranny, lay thou thy basis sure; For goodness dares not check thee! His title is affear'd. Shakesp. Macbeth.

Affect (noun)
Affe'ct. n.s. [from the verb affect.]

 Affection; passion; sensation.
 It seemeth that as the feet have a sympathy with the head; so the wrists have a sympathy with the heart; we see the affects and passions of the heart and spirits are notably disclosed by the pulse. Bacon's Natural History, ∤ 97.
 Quality; circumstance.
 I find it difficult to make out one single ulcer, as authors describe it, without other symptoms or affects joined to it. Wisem.
This is only the antiquated word for affection.

Affect (verb)
To Affe'ct. v.a. [affecter, Fr. afficio, affectum, Lat.]

 To act upon; to produce effects in any other thing.
                                 The sun Had first his precept so to move, so shine, As might affect the earth with cold, and heat, Scarce tolerable. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x.
 The generality of men are wholly governed by names, in matters of good and evil; so far as these qualities relate to, and affect, the actions of men. South's Sermons.
 Yet even those two particles do reciprocally affect each other with the same force and vigour, as they would do at the same distance in any other situation imaginable. Bentley's Sermons.
 To move the passions.
 As a thinking man cannot but be very much affected with the idea of his appearing in the presence of that Being, whom none can see and live; he must be much more affected, when he considers, that this Being whom he appears before, will examine the actions of his life, and reward or punish him accordingly. Addison. Spectator, № 513.
 To aim at; to endeavour after: spoken of persons.
                 Atrides broke His silence next, but ponder'd ere he spoke: Wise are thy words, and glad I would obey, But this proud man affects imperial sway. Dryden's Iliad.
 To tend to; to endeavour after: spoken of things.
 The drops of every fluid affect a round figure, by the mutual attraction of their parts; as, the globe of the earth and sea affects a round figure, by the mutual attraction of its parts by gravity. Newton's Opticks.
 To be fond of; to be pleased with; to love; to regard with fondness.
 That little which some of the heathen did chance to hear, concerning such matter as the sacred Scripture plentifully containeth, they did in wonderful sort affect. Hooker, b. i.
             There is your crown; And he that wears the crown immortally, Long guard it yours! If I affect it more, Than as your honour, and as your renown, Let me no more from this obedience rise. Shak. Henry IV.
 Think not that wars we love, and strife affect; Or that we hate sweet peace. Fairfax, b. ii.
 None but a woman could a man direct To tell us women what we most affect. Dryd. Wife of Bath.
 To make a shew of something; to study the appearance of any thing; with some degree of hypocrisy.
 Another nymph, amongst the many fair, Before the rest affected still to stand, And watch'd my eye preventing my command. Prior.
 These often carry the humour so far, till their affected coldness and indifference quite kills all the fondness of a lover. Addison. Spectator, № 171.
 The conscious husband, whom like symptoms seize, Charges on her the guilt of their disease; Affecting fury, acts a madman's part, He'll rip the fatal secret from her heart. Granville.
 To imitate in an unnatural and constrained manner.
 Spenser, in affecting the ancients, writ no language; yet I would have him read for his matter, but as Virgil read Ennius. Ben. Johnson's Discoveries.
 To convict of some crime; to attaint with guilt: a phrase merely juridical.
 By the civil law, if a dowry with a wife be promised and not paid, the husband is not obligated to allow her alimony. But if her parents shall become insolvent by some misfortune, she shall have alimony, unless you can affect them with fraud, in promising what they knew they were not able to perform. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Affectation
Affecta'tion. n.s. [affectatio, Lat.] The act of making an artificial appearance.
 In things of their own nature indifferent, if either councils or particular men have at any time, with sound judgment, misliked conformity between the church of God and infidels, the cause thereof hath been somewhat else than only affectation of dissimilitude. Hooker, b. iv. § 7.
 It has been, from age to age, an affectation to love the pleasure of solitude, among those who cannot possibly be supposed qualified for passing life in that manner. Spectator, № 264.

Affected
Affe'cted. participial adj. [from affect.]

 Moved; touched with affection; internally disposed or inclined.
 No marvel then if he were ill affected; 'Tis they have put him on the old man's death, To have th' expence and waste of his revenues. Shakesp. King Lear.
 He was assured, that the model they seemed affected to in their directory, was not like to any of their foreign reformed churches now in the world. Clarendon.
 Studied with over-much care, or with hypocritical appearance.
 These antick, lisping, affected phantasies, these new tuners of accents. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
 In a personal sense, full of affectation; as, an affected lady.

Affectedly
Affe'ctedly. adv. [from affected.] In an affected manner; hypocritically; with more appearance than reality.
 Perhaps they are affectedly ignorant; they are so willing it should be true, that they have not attempted to examine it. Government of the Tongue, §5.
 Some indeed have been so affectedly vain, as to counterfeit immortality, and have stolen their death, in hopes to be esteemed immortal. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vii. c. 10.
 By talking so familiarly of one hundred and ten thousand pounds, by a tax upon a few commodities, it is plain, you are either naturally or affectedly ignorant of our condition. Swift.

Affectedness
Affe'ctedness. n.s. [from affected.] The quality of being affected, or of making false appearances.

Affection
Affe'ction. n.s. [affection, Fr. affectio, Lat.]

 The state of being affected by any cause, or agent. This general sense is little in use.
 Some men there are love not a gaping pig; Some that are mad if they behold a cat; And others, when the bag-pipe sings i' th' nose, Cannot contain their urine, for affection. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 Passion of any kind.
 Then gan the Palmer thus: most wretched man, That to affections does the bridle lend; In their beginning they are weak and wan, But soon through sufferance grow to fearful end. Fairy Q.
 Impute it to my late solitary life, which is prone to affections. Sidney, b. i.
Affections, as joy, grief, fear, and anger, with such like, being, as it were, the sundry fashions and forms of appetite, can neither rise at the conceit of a thing indifferent, nor yet choose but rise at the sight of some things. Hooker. b. i.
                     To speak truth of Cæsar, I have not known when his affections sway'd More than his reason. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
 Zeal ought to be composed of the highest degrees of pious affections; of which some are milder and gentler, some sharper and more vehement. Sprat's Sermons.
 I can present nothing beyond this to your affections, to excite your love and desire. Tillotson.
 Love; kindness; good-will to some person; often with to, or towards, before the person.
                 I have acquainted you With the dear love I bear to fair Anne Page, Who mutually hath answer'd my affection. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 My king is tangl'd in affection to A creature of the queen's lady Anne Bullen. Sh. Henry VIII.
 What warmth is there in your affection towards any of these princely suitors? Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 Make his interest depend upon mutual affection and good correspondence with others. Collier on General Kindness.
 Nor at first sight, like most, admires the fair; For you he lives, and you alone shall share His last affection, as his early care. Pope.
 Good-will to any object; zeal; passionate regard.
 I have reason to distrust mine own judgment, as that which may be overborn by my zeal and affection to this cause. Bacon's Holy War.
 Set your affection upon my words; desire them, and ye shall be instructed. Wisdom, vi. 11.
 His integrity to the king was without blemish, and his affection to the church so notorious, that he never deserted it. Cla.
 All the precepts of christianity command us to moderate our passions, to temper our affections towards all things below. Temple.
 Let not the mind of a student be under the influence of warm affection to things of sense, when he comes to the search of truth. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.
 State of the mind, in general.
                     There grows, In my most ill compos'd affection, such A stanchless avarice, that, were I king, I should cut off the nobles for their lands. Shak. Macbeth.
 The man that hath no musick in himself, Nor is not mov'd with concord of sweet sounds, Is fit for treasons, stratagems, and spoils; The motions of his spirit are dull as night, And his affections dark as Erebus: Let no such man be trusted. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 Quality; property.
 The certainty and accurateness which is attributed to what they deliver, must be restrained to what they teach, concerning those purely mathematical disciplines, arithmetick and geometry, where the affections of quantity are abstractedly considered. Boyle.
 The mouth being necessary to conduct the voice to the shape of its cavity, necessarily gives the voice some particular affection of sound in its passage before it come to the lips. Holder's Elements of Speech.
 God may have joined immaterial souls to other kinds of bodies, and in other laws of union; and, from those different laws of union, there will arise quite different affections, and natures, and species of the compound beings. Bentley's Sermons.
 State of the body, as acted upon by any cause.
 It seemed to me a venereal gonorrhæa, and others thought it arose from some scorbutical affection. Wiseman's Surgery.
 Lively representation in painting.
 Affection is the lively representment of any passion whatsoever, as if the figures stood not upon a cloth or board, but as if they were acting upon a stage. Wotton's Architecture.

Affectionate
Affe'ctionate. adj. [affectionné, Fr. from affection.]

 Full of affection; strongly moved; warm; zealous.
 In their love of God, and desire to please him, men can never be too affectionate; and it is as true, that, in their hatred of sin, men may be sometimes too passionate. Sprat's Sermons.
 Strongly inclined to; disposed to; with the particle to.
 As for the parliament, it presently took fire, being affectionate, of old, to the war of France. Bacon's Henry VII.
 Fond; tender.
 He found me sitting, beholding this picture, I know not with how affectionate countenance, but, I am sure, with a most affectionate mind. Sidney.
                         Away they fly Affectionate, and undesiring bear The most delicious morsel to their young. Thomson's Spring.
 Benevolent; tender.
 When we reflect on all this affectionate care of providence for our happiness, with what wonder must we observe the little effect it has on men. Rogers's Sermons.

Affectionately
Affe'ctionately. adv. [from affectionate.] In an affectionate manner; fondly; tenderly; benevolently.

Affectionateness
Affe'ctionateness. n.s. [from affectionate.] The quality or state of being affectionate; fondness; tenderness; good-will; benevolence.

Affectioned
Affe'ctioned. adj. [from affection.]

 Affected; conceited. This sense is now obsolete.
 An affectioned ass that cons state without book, and utters it by great swaths. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
 Inclined; mentally disposed.
 Be kindly affectioned one to another. Rom. xii. 10.

Affectiously
Affe'ctiously. adv. [from affect.] In an affecting manner. Dict.

Affective
Affe'ctive. adj. [from affect.] That which affects; that which strongly touches. It is generally used for painful.
 Pain is so uneasy a sentiment, that very little of it is enough to corrupt every enjoyment: and the effect God intends this variety of ungrateful and affective sentiments should have on us, is to reclaim our affections from this valley of tears. Rogers.

Affectuosity
Affectuo'sity. n.s. [from affectuous.] Passionateness. Dict.

Affectuous
Affe'ctuous. adj. [from affect.] Full of passion; as, an affectuous speech: a word little used.

Affere
To Affe're. v.a. [affier, Fr.] A law term, signifying to confirm. See Afeard.

Afferors
Affe'rors. n.s. [from affere.]
Such as are appointed in court-leets, &c. upon oath, to mulct such as have committed faults arbitrarily punishable, and have no express penalty set down by statute. Cowell.

Affiance (noun)
Affi'ance. n.s. [affiance, from affier, Fr.]

 A marriage-contract.
 At last such grace I found, and means I wrought, That I that lady to my spouse had won, Accord of friends, consent of parents sought, Affiance made, my happiness begun. Fairy Queen, b. ii.
 Trust in general; confidence; secure reliance.
 The duke is virtuous, mild, and too well given To dream on evil, or to work my downfal. — — Ah! what's more dangerous than this fond affiance? Seems he a dove? his feathers are but borrowed. Shakesp. Henry VI.
 Trust in the divine promises and protection. To this sense it is now almost confined.
 It receives him into a covenant of grace, where there is pardon reached out to all truly penitent sinners, and assistance promised, and engaged, and bestowed upon very easy conditions, viz. humility, prayer, and affiance in him. Hammond's Fund.
 There can be no surer way to success, than by disclaiming all confidence in ourselves, and referring the events of things to God with an implicit affiance. Atterbury's Sermons.

Affiance (verb)
To Afi'ance. v.a. [from the noun affiance.]

 To betroth; to bind any one by promise to marriage.
 To me, sad maid, or rather widow sad, He was affianced long time before, And sacred pledges he both gave and had; False, errant knight, infamous, and foreswore. Fairy Queen.
 Her should Angelo have married; was affianced to her by oath, and the nuptial appointed; between which time of the contract, and limit of the solemnity, his brother was wrecked, having, in that vessel, the dowry of his sister. Sh. Meas. for M.
 To give confidence.
 Stranger! whoe'er thou art, securely rest, Affianc'd in my faith, a friendly guest. Pope's Oddyssey.

Affiancer
Affi'ancer. n.s. [from affiance.] He that makes a contract of marriage between two parties. Dict.

Affidation
Affida'tion.Affida'ture.

 n.s. [from affido, Lat. See Affied.] Mutual contract ; mutual oath of fidelity. Dict.

Affidature
Affida'tion.Affida'ture.

 n.s. [from affido, Lat. See Affied.] Mutual contract ; mutual oath of fidelity. Dict.

Affidavit
Affida'vit. n.s. [affidavit signifies, in the language of the common law, he made oath.] A declaration upon oath.
 You said, if I return'd next 'size in Lent, I should be in remitter of your grace; In th' interim my letters should take place Of affidavits. Donne.
Count Rechteren should have made affidavit, that his servants had been affronted, and then Monsieur Mesnager would have done him justice. Spectator, № 481.

Affied


Affiliation


Affinage


Affined


Affinity


Affirm (verb active)
To Affi'rm. v.a. To ratify or approve a former law, or judgment: opposed to reverse or repeal.
The house of peers hath a power of judicature in some cases, properly to examine and then to affirm; or, if there be cause, to reverse the judgments which have been given in the court of king's bench. Bacon's Advice to Sir G. Villiers.
In this sense we say, to affirm the truth.

Affirm (verb neuter)
To Affi'rm. v.n. [affirmo, Lat.] To declare; to tell confidently: opposed to the word deny.
Yet their own authors faithfully affirm, That the land Salike lies in Germany, Between the floods of Sala and of Elve. Shakesp. Henry V.

Affirmable
Affi'rmable. adj. [from affirm.] That which may be affirmed.
Those attributes and conceptions that were applicable and affirmable of him when present, are now affirmable and applicable to him though past. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Affirmance
Affi'rmance. n.s. [from affirm.] Confirmation: opposed to repeal.
This statute did but restore an ancient statute, which was itself also made but in affirmance of the common law. Bacon.

Affirmant
Affi'rmant. n.s. [from affirm.] The person that affirms; a declarer. Dict.

Affirmation
Affirma'tion. n.s. [affirmatio, Lat.]

 The act of affirming or declaring: opposed to negation or denial.
 This gentleman vouching, upon warrant of bloody affirmation, his to be more virtuous, and less attemptable, than any of our ladies. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 The position affirmed.
 That he shall receive no benefit from Christ, is the affirmation, whereon his despair is founded; and one way of removing this dismal apprehension, is, to convince him, that Christ's death, if he perform the condition required, shall certainly belong to him.  Hammond's Fundamenials.
 Confirmation: opposed to repeal.
 The learned in the laws of our land observe, that our statutes sometimes are only the affirmation, or ratification, of that which, by common law, was held before. Hooker.

Affirmative
Affi'rmative. adj. [from affirm.]

 That which affirms, opposed to negative; in which we use the affirmative, that is, the affirmative position.
 For the affirmative, we are now to answer such proofs of theirs as have been before alleged. Hooker.
 Whether there are such beings or not, 'tis sufficient for my purpose, that many have believed the affirmative. Dryden's Preface to Tyrannick Love.
 That which can or may be affirmed: a sense used chiefly in science.
 As in algebra, where affirmative quantities vanish or cease, there negative ones begin: so in mechanicks, where attraction ceases, there a repulsive virtue ought to succeed. Newt. Opt.
 Applied to persons; he who has the habit of affirming with vehemence; positive; dogmatical.
 Be not confident and affirmative in an uncertain matter, but report things modestly and temperately, according to the degree of that persuasion, which is, or ought to be, begotten by the efficacy of the authority, or the reason, inducing thee. Taylor.

Affirmatively
Affi'rmatively. adv. [from affirmative.] In an affirmative manner; on the positive side; not negatively.
The reason of man hath no such restraint: concluding not only affirmatively, but negatively; not only affirming, there is no magnitude beyond the last heavens, but also denying, there is any vacuity within them. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Affirmer
Affi'rmer. n.s. [from affirm.] The person that affirms.
If by the word virtue, the affirmer intends our whole duty to God and man, and the denier, by the word virtue, means only courage, or, at most, our duty toward our neighbour, without including, in the idea of it, the duty which we owe to God. Watts's Logick.

Affix (noun)
Affi'x. n.s. [affixum, Lat.] A term of grammar; something united to the end of a word.
In the Hebrew language, the noun has its affixa, to denote the pronouns possessive or relative. Clarke's Latin Grammar.

Affix (verb)
To Affi'x. v.a. [affigo, affixum, Lat.] To unite to the end, or à posteriori; to subjoin.
He that has settled in his mind determined ideas, with names affixed to them, will be able to discern their differences one from another. Locke.
If men constantly affixed applause and disgrace where they ought, this principle would have a very good influence on the publick conduct of men; though on secret villanies it lays no restraint. Rogers's Sermons.

Affixion
Affi'xion. n.s. [from affix.]

 The act of affixing.

 The state of being affixed. Dict.

Afflation
Affla'tion. n.s. [afflo, afflatum, Lat.] The act of breathing upon any thing.  Dict.

Afflatus
Afflat'us. n.s. [Lat.] Communication of the power of prophecy. Dict.

Afflict
To Affli'ct. v.a. [afflicto, afflictum, Lat.]

 To put to pain; to grieve; to torment.
 In the seventh month, on the tenth day of the month, ye shall afflict your souls, and do no work at all, whether it be one of your own country, or a stranger that sojourneth among you. Leviticus, xvi. 29.
 Give not over thy mind to heaviness, and afflict not thyself in thine own counsel. Ecclus, xxx. 21.
 For a father afflicted with untimely mourning, when he hath made an image of his child soon taken away, now honoured him as a God, which was then a dead man, and delivered to those that were under him, ceremonies and sacrifices. Wisdom.
 It teacheth us, how God thought fit to plague and afflict them, it doth not appoint in what form and manner we ought to punish the sin of idolatry in others. Hooker, b. v. § 17.
 O coward conscience! how dost thou afflict me? The lights burn blue &emdash; Is it not dead midnight? Cold fearful drops stand on my trembling flesh. Shakesp. Richard III.
 A melancholy tear afflicts my eye,And my heart labours with a sudden sigh. Prior.
 The passive to be afflicted, has often at before the causal noun.
 The mother was so afflicted at the loss of a fine boy, who was her only son, that she died for grief of it. Addison. Spect.

Afflictedness
Affli'ctedness. n.s. [from afflicted.] The state of affliction, or of being afflicted; sorrowfulness; grief.

Afflicter
Affli'cter. n.s. [from afflict.] The person that afflicts.

Affliction
Affli'ction. n.s. [afflictio, Lat.]

 The cause of pain or sorrow; calamity.
 To the flesh, as the Apostle himself granteth, all affliction is naturally grievous: therefore nature, which causeth fear, teacheth to pray against all adversity. Hooker, b. v. § 48.
 We'll bring you to Windsor, to one Mr. Brook, that you have cozened of money; I think, to repay that money will be a biting affliction. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 The state of sorrowfulness; misery: opposed to prosperity.
                          Besides you know, Prosperity's the very bond of love,Whose fresh complexion, and whose heart together Affliction alters. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
 Where shall we find the man that bears affliction, Great and majestic in his griefs, like Cato? Addis. Cato.
 Some virtues are only seen in affliction, and some in prosperity. Addison. Spectator, № 257.

Afflictive
Affli'ctive. adj. [from afflict.] That which causes affliction; painful; tormenting.
They found martyrdom a duty dressed up indeed with all that was terrible and afflictive to human nature, yet not at all the less a duty. South.
                             Nor find Where to retire themselves, or where appease Th' afflictive keen desire of food, expos'd To winds, and storms, and jaws of savage death. Philips.
                     Restless Proserpine — — On the spacious land and liquid main, Spreads slow disease, and darts afflictive pain. Prior.

Affluence
A'ffluence. n.s. [affluence, Fr. affluentia, Lat.]

 The act of flowing to any place; concourse. It is almost always used figuratively.
 I shall not relate the affluence of young nobles from hence into Spain, after the voice of our prince being there had been noised. Wotton.
 Exuberance of riches; stream of wealth; plenty.
 Those degrees of fortune, which give fulness and affluence to one station, may be want and penury in another. Rogers.
 Let joy or ease, let affluence or content, And the gay conscience of a life well spent, Calm ev'ry thought, inspirit ev'ry grace. Pope.

Affluency
A'ffluency. n.s. The same with affluence.

Affluent
A'ffluent. adj. [affluent, Fr. affluens, Lat.]

 Flowing to any part.
 These parts are no more than foundation-piles of the ensuing body; which are afterwards to be increased and raised to a greater bulk by the affluent blood, that is transmitted out of the mother's body. Harvey on Consumptions.
 Abundant; exuberant; wealthy.
 I see thee, Lord and end of my desire, Loaded and blest with all the affluent store, Which human vows at smoaking shrines implore. Prior.

Affluentness
A'ffluentness. n.s. [from affluent.] The quality of being affluent. Dict.

Afflux
A'fflux. n.s. [affluxus, Lat.]

 The act of flowing to some place; affluence.

 That which flows to another place.
 The cause hereof cannot be a supply by procreations; ergo, it must be by new affluxes to London out of the country. Graunt.
 The infant grows bigger out of the womb, by agglutinating one afflux of blood to another. Harvey on Consumptions.

Affluxion
Afflu'xion. n.s. [affluxio, Lat.]

 The act of flowing to a particular place.

 That which flows from one place to another.
 An inflammation either simple, consisting of an hot and sanguineous affluxion, or else denominable from other humours, according unto the predominancy of melancholy, phlegm or choler. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Afford
To Affo'rd. v.a. [affourrer, affourrager, Fr.]

 To yield or produce; as, the soil affords grain; the trees afford fruits. This seems to be the primitive signification.

 To grant, or confer any thing; generally in a good sense, and sometimes in a bad, not properly.
 So soon as Maurmon there arrived, the door To him did open, and afforded way. Fairy Queen.
 This is the consolation of all good men, unto whom his ubiquity affordeth continual comfort and security; and this is the affliction of hell, to whom it affordeth despair and remediless calamity. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i. c. 2.
 To be able to sell. It is used always with reference to some certain price; as, I can afford this for less than the other.
 They fill their magazines in times of the greatest plenty, that so they may afford cheaper, and increase the public revenue at a small expence of its members. Addison on Italy.
 To be able to bear expences; as, traders can afford more finery in peace than war.
 The same errours run through all families, where there is wealth enough to afford that their sons may be good for nothing. Swift on Modern Education.

Afforest
To Affo'rest.  v.a.  [afforestare, Lat.]  To turn ground into forest.
It appeareth, by Charta de Foresta, that he afforested many woods and wastes, to the grievance of the subject, which by that law were disafforested. Sir John Davies on Ireland.

Afforestation
Afforesta'tion.  n.s.  [from afforest.]
The charter de Foresta was to reform the encroachments made in the time of Richard I. and Henry II. who had made new afforestations, and much extended the rigour of the forest laws. Hales's Common Law of England.

Affranchise
To Affra'nchise.  v.a.  [affrancher, Fr.]  To make free.

Affray (noun)
Affra'y, or Affra'yment. n.s. [from the verb.] A tumultuous assault of one or more persons upon others; a law term. A battle: in this sense it is written fray.

Affray (verb)


Affriction


Affright (noun)


Affright (verb)


Affrightful
Affri'ghtful.  adj.  [from affright.]  Full of affright or terrour; terrible.
We shall find there is an absence of all that is destructive or affrightful to human nature. Decay of Piety.

Affrightment
Affri'ghtment.  n.s.  [from affright.]

 The impression of fear; terrour.
 Hearing she was at rest, he attended till she should awake of herself; which she did with the affightment of a dream. Wotton.
 Passionate words or blows from the tutor, fill the child's mind with terrour and affrightment; which immediately takes it wholly up, and leaves no room for other impression. Locke.
 The state of fearfulness.
 Whether those that, under any anguish of mind, return to affrightments or doubtings, have not been hypocrites. Hammond.

Affront (noun)
Affro'nt. n.s. [from the verb affront.]

 Insult offered to the face; contemptuous or rude treatment.
 He would often maintain Plantianus, in doing affronts to his son. Bacon's Essays.
 You've done enough; for you design'd my chains: The grace is vanish'd, but the affront remains. Dryd. Aureng.
 He that is found reasonable in one thing, is concluded to be so in all; and to think or say otherwise, is thought so unjust an affront, and so senseless a censure, that no body ventures to do it. Locke.
 There is nothing which we receive with so much reluctance as advice: we look upon the man who gives it us, as offering an affront to our understanding, and treating us like children or ideots. Addison. Spectator, № 512.
 Outrage; act of contempt, in a more general sense.
                      Oft have they violated The temple, oft the law with foul affronts, Abominations rather. Milton's Paradise Regained.
 Open opposition; encounter: a sense not frequent, though regularly deducible from the derivation.
                                  Far beyond The sons of Anak, famous now and blaz'd, Fearless of danger, like a petty god I walk'd about admir'd of all, and dreaded On hostile ground, none daring my affront. Samson Agonist.
 Disgrace; shame. This sense is rather peculiar to the Scottish dialect.
 Antonius attacked the pirates of Crete, and, by his too great presumption, was defeated; upon the sense of which affront he died with grief. Arbuthnot on Coins.

Affront (verb)
To Affro'nt. v.a. [affronter, Fr. that is, ad frontem stare; ad frontem & contumeliam allidere, to insult a man to his face.]

 To meet face to face; to encounter. This seems the genuine and original sense of the word, which was formerly indifferent to good or ill.
              We have closely sent for Hamlet hither, That he, as 'twere by accident, may here Affront Ophelia. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
 The seditious, the next day, affronted the king's forces at the entrance of a highway; whom when they found both ready and resolute to fight, they desired enterparlance, and in the meantime they began to fortify. Sir John Hayward.
 To meet, in a hostile manner, front to front.
 His holy rites and solemn feasts profan'd, And with their darkness durst affront his light. Parad. Lost.
 To offer an open insult; to offend avowedly. With respect to this sense, it is observed by Cervantes, that, if a man strikes another on the back, and then runs away, the person so struck is injured, but not affronted; an affront always implying a justification of the act.
 But harm precedes not sin only our foe, Tempting affronts us with his foul esteem Of our integrity. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix.
          I would learn the cause, why Torrismond, Within my palace walls, within my hearing, Almost within my sight, affronts a prince, Who shortly shall command him. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
 This brings to mind Faustina's fondness for the gladiator, and is interpreted as satire. But how can one imagine, that the Fathers would have dared to affront the wife of Aurelius. Addison.

Affronter
Affro'nter. n.s. [from affront.] The person that affronts.

Affronting
Affro'nting. participial adj. [from affront.] That which has the quality of affronting.
Among words which signify the same principal ideas, some are clean and decent, others unclean; some are kind, others are affronting and reproachful, because of the secondary idea which custom has affixed to them. Watts's Logick.

Affuse
To Affu'se. v.a. [affundo, affusum, Lat.] To pour one thing upon another.
I fruitlessly poured on them acid liquors, to try if they contained any volatile salt or spirit, which would probably have discovered itself, by making an ebullition with the affused liquor. Boyle.

Affusion
Affu'sion. n.s. [affusio, Lat.] The act of pouring one thing upon another.
Upon the affusion of a tincture of galls, it immediately became as black as ink. Grew's Musæum.

Affy (verb active)
To Affy'. v.a. [affier, Fr. affidare mulierem, Bracton.] To betroth in order to marriage.
             Wedded be thou to the hags of hell,For daring to affy a mighty lordUnto the daughter of a worthless king. Shakesp. Henry VI.

Affy (verb neuter)
To Affy'. v.n. To put confidence in; to put trust in.
Marcus Andronicus, so I do affyIn thy uprightness and integrity,That I will here dismiss my loving friends. Shak. Tit. Andr.

Afield
Afi'eld. adv. [from a and field. See Field.] To the field.
We drove afield, and both together heardWhat time the grey fly winds her sultry horn,Batt'ring our flocks with the fresh dews of night. Milton.
Afield I went, amid the morning dew,To milk my kine, for so should housewives do. Gay.

Aflat
Afla't. adv. [from a and flat. See Flat.] Level with the ground.
When you would have many new roots of fruit-trees, take a low tree, and bow it, and lay all his branches aflat upon the ground, and cast earth upon them; and every twig will take root. Bacon's Natural History.

Afloat
Aflo'at. adv. [from a and float. See Float.] Floating; born up in the water: in a figurative sense, within view; in motion.
There is a tide in the affairs of men, Which taken at the flood, leads on to fortune; Omitted, all the voyage of their life Is bound in shallows and in miseries. On such a full sea are we now afloat; And we must take the current when it serves, Or lose our ventures. Shakespeare's Julius Cæsar.
Take any passion of the soul of man, while it is predominant and afloat, and, just in the critical height of it, nick it with some lucky or unlucky word, and you may as certainly over-rule it to your own purpose, as a spark of fire, falling upon gun-powder, will infallibly blow it up. South.
There are generally several hundred loads afloat, for they begin to cut above twenty-five leagues up the river above Hall; and there are other rivers that flow into the Inn, which bring in their contributions. Addison's Italy.

Afoot
Afo'ot. adv. [from a and foot.]

 On foot; not on horseback.
 He thought it best to return, for that day, to a village not far off; and dispatching his horse in some sort, the next day early, to come afoot thither. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
 In action; as, a design is afoot.
 I pr'ythee, when thou seest that act afoot, Ev'n with the very comment of thy soul Observe mine uncle. Idem, ibid.
 In motion.
 Of Albany's and Cornwall's pow'rs you heard not — 'Tis said they are afoot. Shakespeare's K. Lear.

Afore (adverb)
Afo're. adv.

 In time foregone or past.
 Whosoever should make light of any thing afore spoken or written, out of his own house a tree should be taken, and he thereon be hanged. Esdras, vi. 22.
 If he never drank wine afore, it will go near to remove his fit. Shakespeare's Tempest.
 First in the way.
 Æmilia, run you to the citadel, And tell my lord and lady what hath hap'd; Will you go on afore? Shakespeare's Othello.
 In front; in the fore-part.
 Approaching nigh, he reared high afore His body monstrous, horrible and vast. Fairy Queen.

Afore (preposition)
Afo're. prep. [from a and fore. See Before.]

 Before; nearer in place to any thing; as, he stood afore him.

 Sooner in time.
 If your diligence be not speedy, I shall be there afore you. Shakespeare's King Lear.

Aforegoing
Afo'regoing. participial adj. [from afore and going.] Going before.

Aforehand
Aforehand. adv. [from afore and hand.].

 By a previous provision.
 Many of the particular subjects of discourse are occasional, and such as cannot aforehand be reduced to any certain account. Government of the Tongue.
 Provided; prepared; previously fitted.
 For it will be said, that in the former times, whereof we have spoken, Spain was not so mighty, as now it is; and England, on the other side, was more aforehand in all matters of power. Bacon's Considerations on War with Spain.

Aforementioned
Afo'rementioned. adj. [from afore and mentioned.] Mentioned before.
Among the nine other parts, five are not in a condition to give alms or relief to those aforementioned; being very near reduced themselves to the same miserable condition. Addison.

Aforenamed
Afo'renamed. adj. [from afore and named]. Named before.
Imitate something of circular form, in which, as in all other aforenamed proportions, you shall help yourself by the diameter. Peacham on drawing.

Aforesaid
Afo'resaid. adj. [from afore and said.] Said before.
It need not go for repetition, if we resume again that which we said in the aforesaid experiment concerning annihilation. Bacon's Natural History, № 771.

Aforetime
Afo'retime. adv. [from afore and time.] In time past.
O thou that art waxen old in wickedness, now thy sins which thou hast committed aforetime, are come to light. Susanna.

Afraid
Afra'id. participial adj. [from the verb affray: it should therefore properly be written with ff.]

 Struck with fear; terrified; fearful.
 So persecute them with thy tempest, and make them afraid with thy storm. Psalm lxxxiii. 15.
 It has often the particle of before the object of fear.
 There, loathing life, and yet of death afraid,In anguish of her spirit, thus she pray'd. Dryden's Fables.
 If, while this wearied flesh draws fleeting breath,Not satisfy'd with life, afraid of death,It hap'ly be thy will, that I should knowGlimpse of delight, or pause from anxious woe;From now, from instant now, great Sire, dispelThe clouds that press my soul. Prior.

Afresh
Afre'sh. adv. [from a and fresh. See Fresh.] Anew; again, after intermission.
The Germans now using no such light horsemen, but serving upon great horses, and charged with heavy armour, received great hurt by these light skirmishes; the Turks, with their light horses, easily shunning their charge, and again, at their pleasure, charging them afresh, when they saw the heavy horses almost weary. Knolles's History of the Turks.
When once we have attained these ideas, they may be excited afresh by the use of words. Watts's Logick.

Afront
Afro'nt. adv. [from a and front.] In front; in direct opposition to the face.
These four came all afront, and mainly thrust at me. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. 1.

After (adverb)
A'fter. adv.

 In succeeding time. It is used of time mentioned as succeeding some other. So we cannot say, I shall be happy after, but hereafter; but we say, I was first made miserable by the loss, but was after happier.
 Far be it from me, to justify the cruelties which were at first used towards them, which had their reward soon after. Bacon.
 The chief were those who, from the pit of hell Roaming to seek their prey on earth, durst fix Their seats long after next the seat of God. Paradise Lost.
 Following another.
 Let go thy hold, when a great wheel runs down a hill, lest it break thy neck with following it; but the great one that goes upward, let him draw thee after. Shakespeare's King Lear.

After (composition)
After is compounded with many words, but almost always in its genuine and primitive signification; some, which occurred, will follow, by which others may be explained.

After (preposition)


After Acceptation
A'fter acceptation. [from after and acceptation.] A sense afterwards, not at first admitted.
'Tis true, some doctors in a scantier space, I mean, in each apart, contract the place: Some, who to greater length extend the line, The church's after acceptation join. Dryd. Hind and Panther.

After All


After-dinner
A'fter-dinner. n.s. [from after and dinner.] The hour passing just after dinner, which is generally allowed to indulgence and amusement.
                 Thou hast nor youth nor age,But, as it were, an afterdinner's sleep, Dreaming on both. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.

After-endeavour
A'fter-endeavour. n.s. [from after and endeavour.] Endeavours made after the first effort or endeavour.
There is no reason why the sound of a pipe should leave traces in their brains, which, not first, but by their after-endeavours, should produce the like sounds. Locke.

After-enquiry
A'fter-enquiry. n.s. [from after and enquiry.] Enquiry made after the fact committed, or after life.
You must either be directed by some that take upon them to know, or to take upon yourself that, which, I am sure, you do not know, or lump the after-enquiry on your peril; and how you shall speed in your journal's end, I think, you'll never return to tell me. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.

After-liver
A'fter-liver. n.s. [from after and live.] He that lives in succeeding times.
                         By thee my promise sent Unto myself, let after-livers know. Sidney, b. ii.

After-times
A'fter-times. n.s. [from after and time.] Succeeding times.  See Afterages.
You promis'd once, a progeny divine Of Romans, rising from the Trojan line, In aftertimes should hold the world in awe, And to the land and ocean give the law. Dryd. Virg. Æn.

After-wrath
A'fter-wrath. n.s. [from after and wrath.] Anger when the provocation seems past.
                                 I hear him mock The luck of Cæsar, which the gods gave men T' excuse their after-wrath. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.

Afterages
A'fterages. n.s. [from after and ages] Successive times; posterity. This word has no singular.
Not the whole land, which the Chusites should, or might in future time, conquer; seeing, in afterages, they became lords of many nations. Raleigh's History of the World.
Nor to philosophers is praise deny'd, Whose wise instructions afterages guide. Sir J. Denham.
What an opinion will afterages entertain of their religion, who bid fair for a gibbet, by endeavouring to bring in a superstition, which their forefathers perished in flames to keep out. Addison's Freeholder, № 1.

Afterbirth


Afterclap


Aftercost
A'ftercost. n.s. [from after and cost.] The latter charges; the expence incurred after the original plan is executed.
You must take care to carry off the land-floods and streams, before you attempt draining; lest your aftercost and labour prove unsuccessful. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Aftercrop
A'ftercrop. n.s. [from after and crop.] The second crop or harvest of the same year.
Aftercrops I think neither good for the land, not yet the hay good for cattle. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Aftereye
To A'ftereye. v.a. [from after and eye.] To keep one in view; to follow in view.
Thou shouldst have made him As little as a crow, or less, ere left To aftereye him. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.

Aftergame
A'ftergame. n.s. [from after and game.] The scheme which may be laid, or the expedients which are practised after the original design has miscarried; methods taken after the first turn of affairs.
This earl, like certain vegetables, did bud and open slowly; nature sometimes delighting to play an aftergame, as well as fortune, which had both their turns and tides in course. Wotton.
The fables of the ax-handle and the wedge, serve to precaution us not to put ourselves needlessly upon an aftergame, but to weigh beforehand what we say and do. L'Estrange's Fab.
Our first design, my friend, has prov'd abortive; Still there remains an aftergame to play. Addison's Cato.

Afterhours
A'fterhours. n.s. [from after and hours.] The hours that succeed.
So smile the heav'ns upon this holy act, That afterhours with sorrow chide us not. Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet.

Afterlove
A'fterlove. n.s. [from after and love.] The second or later love.
Intended, or committed, was this fault? If but the first, how heinous ere it be, To win thy after-love, I pardon thee. Shakesp. Richard II.

Aftermath
A'ftermath. n.s. [from after and math, from mow.] The latter math; the second crop of grass mown in autumn. See Aftercrop.

Afternoon
A'fternoon. n.s. [from after and noon.] The time from the meridian to the evening.
A beauty-waining and distressed widow, Ev'n in the afternoon of her best days,  Made prize and purchase of his wanton eye. Shakespeare's Richard III.
However, keep the lively taste you hold Of God; love him now, but fear him more; And, in your afternoons, think what you told And promis'd him at morning-prayer before. Donne.
Such, all the morning, to the pleadings run; But when the bus'ness of the day is done, On dice, and drink, and drabs, they spend the afternoon. Dryden's Persius, Sat. 1.

Afterpains
A'fterpains. n.s. [from after and pain.]
The pains after birth, by which women are delivered of the secundine.

Afterpart
A'fterpart. n.s. [from after and part.] The latter part.
The flexibleness of the former part of a man's age, not yet grown up to be headstrong, makes it more governable and safe; and, in the afterpart, reason and foresight begin a little to take place, and mind a man of his safety and improvement. Locke.

Afterproof
A'fterproof. n.s. [from after and proof.] Evidence posteriour to the thing in question.
All know, that he likewise at first was much under the expectation of his afterproof; such a solar influence there is in the solar aspect. Wotton.

Aftertaste
A'ftertaste. n.s. [from after and taste.] A taste remaining upon the tongue after the draught, which was not perceived in the act of drinking.

Afterthought
A'fterthought. n.s. [from after and thought.] Reflections after the act; expedients formed too late.  It is not properly to be used for secondthought.
Expence, and afterthought, and idle care, And doubts of motely hue, and dark despair; Suspicions and fantastical surmise, And jealousy suffus'd with jaundice in her eyes, Discolouring all the view'd, in tawny dress'd, Downlook'd, and with a cuckow on her fist. Dryd. Fables.

Aftertossing
A'ftertossing. n.s. [from after and toss.] The motion of the sea after a storm.
Confusions and tumults are only the impotent remains of an unnatural rebellion, and are no more than the aftertossings of a sea, when the storm is laid. Addison's Freeholder № 25.

Afterward
A'fterward. adv. [from after and ƿaꞃꝺ, Sax.] In succeeding time; sometimes written afterwards, but less properly.
Uses not thought upon before, may afterward spring up, and be reasonable causes of retaining that, which former considerations did formerly procure to be instituted. Hooker.
An anxious distrust of the divine goodness, makes a man more and more unworthy of it; and miserable beforehand, for fear of being so afterward. L'Estrange.

Afterwit
A'fterwit. n.s. [from after and wit.] The contrivance of expedients after the occasion of using them is past. See Afterthought.
There is no recalling of what's gone and past; so that afterwit comes too late, when the mischief is done. L'Estrange.

Aga
A'ga. n.s. The title of a Turkish military officer.

Again
Aga'in. adv. [aᵹn, Sax.]

 A second time; once more; marking the repetition of the same thing.
 The poor remnant of human seed, which remained in their mountains, peopled their country again slowly, by little and little. Bacon's New Atalantis.
 Go now, deluded man, and seek again New toils, new dangers, on the dusty plain. Dryd. Æn.
 Some are already retired into foreign countries; and the rest, who possess lands, are determined never to hazard them again, for the sake of establishing their superstition. Swift.
 On the other hand; marking some opposition or contrariety.
 His wit encreased upon the occasion; and so much the more, if the occasion were sharpened with danger. Again, whether it were the shortness of his foresight, or the strength of his will, certain it is, that the perpetual trouble of his fortunes could not have been without defects in his nature. Bacon.
 Those things that we know not what do  withal, if we had them, and those things, again, which another cannot part with, but to his own loss and share, are the very conditions of this fable. L'Estrange's Fables.
 On another part; marking a transition to some new consideration.
 Behold, yon mountain's hoary height, Made higher with new mounts of snow; Again, behold the winter's weight Oppress the labr'ing woods below. Dryden.
 In return, noting re-action, or reciprocal action; as, his fortune worked upon his nature, and his nature again upon his fortune.

 Back, in restitution.
                  When your head did but ake, I knit my handkerchief upon your brows; The best I had, a princess wrought it me, And I did never ask it you again. Shakesp. King John.
 In return for any thing; in recompense.
 That he hath given will he pay again. Prov. xix. 27.
 In order of rank or succession; marking distribution.
 Question was asked of Demosthenes, What was the chief part of an orator?  He answered, Action.  What next?  Action.  What next, again? Action. Bacon's Essays.
 The  cause of the holding green, is the close and compact substance of their leave, and the pedicles of them: and the cause of that again is either the tough and vicious juice of the plant, or the strength and heat thereof. Bacon's Natural History.
 Besides; in any other time or place.
 They have the Walloons, who are tall soldiers; yet that is but a spot of ground.  But, on the other side, there is not in the world again such a spring and seminary of brave military people, as in England, Scotland, and Ireland. Bacon.
 Twice as much; marking the same quantity once repeated.
 There are whom heav'n has blest with store of wit, Yet want as much again to manage it; For wit and judgment ever are at strife, Tho' meant each other's aid, like man and wife. Pope.
 I should not be sorry to see a chorus on a theatre, more than as large and as deep again as ours, built and adorned at a king's charges. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 Again and again; with frequent repetition; often.
 This is not to be obtained by one or two hasty readings; it must be repeated again and again, with a close attention to the tenour of the discourse. Locke's Essay on St. P. Epistles.
 In opposition, by way of resistance.
 Who art thou that answerest again? Rom. ix. 20.
 Back; as returning from some message.
 Bring us word again which way we shall go. Deut. i. 22.

Against
Aga'inst. prep. [ænᵹon, onᵹonꝺ, Sax.]

 In opposition to any person.
 And he will be a wild man; his hand will be against every man, and every man's hand against him. Gen. xvi. 12.
 Contrary; opposite, in general.
 That authority of men should prevail with men either against or above reason, is no part of our belief. Hooker.
 He is melancholy without cause, and merry against the hair. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
 We might work any effect without and against matter; and this not holpen by the co-operation of angels or spirits, but only by the unity and harmony of nature. Bacon's Natural Hist.
 The preventing goodness of God does even wrest him from himself, and save him, as it were, against his will. South.
 The god, uneasy till he slept again, Resolv'd, at once, to rid himself of pain; And, tho' against his custom, call'd aloud, Exciting Morpheus, from the sleepy crowd. Dryden.
 Men often say a thing is against their conscience, when really it is not. Swift's Miscellanies.
 In contradiction to any opinion.
 After all that can be said against a thing, this will still be true, that many things possibly are, which we know not of; and that many more things may be than are: and if so, after all our arguments against a thing, it will be uncertain whether it be or not. Tillotson.
 The church-clergy have written the best collection of tracts against popery, that ever appeared in England. Swift.
 With contrary motion or tendency; used of material action.
                              Boils and plagues Plaister you o'er, that you may be abhorr'd Farther than seen, and one infect another Against the wind a mile. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 The kite being a bird of prey, and therefore hot, delighteth in the fresh air; and many times flieth against the wind, as trouts and salmons swim against the stream. Bacon.
 Contrary to rule or law.
                  If aught against my life Thy country sought of thee, it sought unjustly, Against the law of nature, law of nations. M. Sam. Agon.
 Against the public sanctions of the peace, Against all omens of their ill success; With fates averse, the rout in arms resort,To force their monarch, and insult the court. Dryden's Æn.
 Opposite to, in place.
 Against the Tiber's mouth, but far away. Dryden.
 To the hurt of another.
And when thou think'st of her eternity, Think not that death against her nature is; Think it a birth: and when thou go'st to die, Sing like a swan, as if thou went'st to bliss. Sir J. Davies.
 In provision for; in expectation of.
 This mode of speaking probably had its original from the idea of making provision against, or in opposition to a time of misfortune, but by degrees acquired a neutral sense.
 Thence she them brought into a stately hall, Wherein were many tables fair dispred, And ready dight with drapets festival, Against the viands should be ministred. Fairy Queen.
 The like charge was given them against the time they should come to settle themselves in the land promised unto their fathers. Hooker, b. v. § 11.
 Some say, that ever 'gainst that season comes, Wherein our Saviour's birth is celebrated, The bird of dawning singeth all night long: And then they say no spirit walks abroad; The nights are wholesome, then no planets strike, No fairy tales, no witch hath power to charm; So hallowed and so gracious is the time. Shakesp. Hamlet.
 To that purpose, he made haste to Bristol, that all things might be ready against the prince came thither. Clarendon.
Against the promis'd time provides with care, And hastens in the woof, the robes he was to wear. Dryd.
 And which I grant to be reasonably and truly said, and only desire they may be remembered against another day. Stillingfl.

Agalaxy
A'galaxy. n.s. [from α and γάλα, Gr.] Want of milk. Dict.

Agape
Aga'pe. adv. [from a and gape.] Staring with eagerness; as, a bird gapes for meat.
                 In himself was all his state; More solemn than the tedious pomp that waits On princes, when their rich retinue long Of horses led, and grooms besmear'd with gold, Dazzles the crowd, and sets them all agape. Paradise Lost.
Dazzle the crowd, and set them all agape. Philips.
The whole crowd stood agape, and ready to take the doctor at his word. Spectator, № 572.

Agarick
A'garick. n.s. [agaricum, Lat.] A drug of use in physick, and the dying trade. It is divided into male and female; the male is used only in dying, the female in medicine: the male grows on oaks, the female on larches.
There are two excrescences which grow upon trees; both of them in the nature of mushrooms: the one the Romans call boletus, which groweth upon the roots of oaks, and was one of the dainties of their table; the other is medicinal, that is called agarick, which groweth upon the tops of oaks; though it be affirmed by some, that it groweth also at the roots. Bacon.

Agast
Aga'st. adj. [This word, which is usually, by later authors, written aghast, is, not improbably, the true word derived from agaze, which has been written aghast, from a mistaken etymology. See Aghast.]
Struck with terrour; amazed; frighted to astonishment.
                         Thus roving on In confus'd march forlorn, th' advent'rous bands, With shudd'ring horrour pale, and eyes agast, View'd first their lamentable lot, and found No rest. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 616.

Agate
A'gate. n.s. [agate, Fr. achates, Lat.] A precious stone of the lowest class, often clouded with beautiful variegations.
In shape no bigger than an agate stone, On the forefinger of an alderman. Shak. Romeo and Juliet.
Agates are only varieties of the flint kind; they have a grey horny ground, clouded, lineated, or spotted with different colours, chiefly dusky, black, brown, red, and sometimes blue. Woodward's Method of Fossils.

Agaty
A'gaty. adj. [from agate.] Partaking of the nature of agate.
An agaty flint was above two inches in diameter; the whole covered over with a friable cretaceous crust. Woodward.

Agaze
To Aga'ze. v.a. [from a and gaze, to set a gazing; as, amaze, amuse, and others.] To strike with amazement; to stupify with sudden terrour. The verb is now out of use.
So as they travell'd, so they gan espy An armed knight toward them gallop fast, That seemed from some feared foe to fly, Or other grisly thing that him agast. Fairy Queen.

Agazed
Aga'zed. participial adj. [from agaze; which see.] Struck with amazement; terrified to stupidity.
Hundreds he sent to hell, and none durst stand him; Here, there, and every where, enrag'd he flew: The French exclaim'd; "The devil was in arms!" All the whole army stood agazed on him. Shak. Henry VI.

Age


Aged
A'ged. adj. [from age. It makes two syllables in poetry.]

 Old; stricken in years; applied generally to animate beings.
 If the comparison do stand between man and man, which shall hearken unto other, sith the aged, for the most part, are best experienced, least subject to rash and unadvised passions. Hooker, b. v. § 7.
 Novelty is only in request; and it is as dangerous to be aged in any kind of course, as it is virtuous to be constant in any undertaking. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
 Kindness itself too weak a charm will prove, To raise the feeble fires of aged love. Prior.
 Old; applied to inanimate things. This use is rare, and commonly with some tendency to the prosopopœia.
 The people did not more worship the images of gold and ivory, than they did the groves; and the same Quintilian saith of the aged oaks. Stillingfleet's Defence of Disc. on Rom. Idol.

Agedly
A'gedly. adv. [from aged.] After the manner of an aged person.

Agen
Age'n. adv. [aᵹn, Sax.] Again; in return. See Again.
This word is only written in this manner, though it be in reality the true orthography, for the sake of rhime.
Thus Venus: Thus her son reply'd agen; None of your sisters have we heard or seen. Dryden's Æn.

Agency


Agent (adjective)
A'gent. adj. [agens, Lat.] That which acts; opposed to patient, or that which is acted upon.
This success is oft truly ascribed unto the force of imagination upon the body agent; and then, by a secondary means, it may upon a diverse body; as, for example, if a man carry a ring, or some part of a beast, believing strongly that it will help him to obtain his love, it may make him more industrious, and again more confident and persisting than otherwise he would be. Bacon's Natural History, № 902.

Agent (noun)
A'gent. n.s.

 An actor; he that acts; he that professes the faculty of action.
 Where there is no doubt, deliberation is not excluded as impertinent unto the thing, but as needless in regard of the agent, which seeth already what to resolve upon. Hooker.
 To whom nor agent, from the instrument, Nor pow'r of working, from the work is known. Davies.
 Heav'n made us agents free to good or ill, And forc'd it not, tho' he foresaw the will. Freedom was first bestow'd on human race, And prescience only held the second place. Dryden.
 A miracle is a work exceeding the power of any created agent, consequently being an effect of the divine omnipotence. South's Sermons
 A substitute; a deputy; a factor; a person employed to transact the business of another.
 — All hearts in love, use your own tongues; Let every eye negotiate for itself, And trust no agent. Shakespeare.
 They had not the wit to send to them, in any orderly fashion, agents or chosen men, to tempt them, and to treat with them. Bacon's Henry VII.
 Remember, Sir, your fury of a wife, Who, not content to be reveng'd on you, The agents of your passion will pursue. Dryden's Aureng.
 That which has the power of operating, or producing effects upon another thing.
 They produced wonderful effects, by the proper application of agents to patients. Temple.

Aggeneration
Aggenera'tion. n.s. [from ad and generatio, Lat.] The state of growing or uniting to another body.
To make a perfect nutrition, there is required a transmutation of nutriment; now where this conversion or aggeneration is made, there is also required, in the aliment, a similarity of matter. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Aggerate
To A'ggerate. v.a. [from agger, Lat.] To heap up. Dict.

Aggerose
Aggero'se. adj. [from agger, Lat.] Full of heaps. Dict.

Agglomerate (verb active)
To Agglo'merate. v.a. [agglomero, Lat.]

 To gather up in a ball, as thread.

 To gather together.

Agglomerate (verb neuter)
To Agglo'merate. v.n.
Besides, the hard agglomerating salts, The spoil of ages, would impervious choke Their secret channels. Thomson's Autumn.

Agglutinants


Agglutinate


Agglutination


Agglutinative


Agminal
A'gminal. adj. [from agmen, Lat.] Belonging to a troop. Dict.

Air (noun)
Air n.s. [air, Fr. aër, Lat.]

 The element encompassing the terraqueous globe.
If I were to tell what I mean by the word air, I may say, it is that fine matter which we breathe in and breathe out continually; or it is that thin fluid body, in which the birds fly, a little above the earth; or it is that invisible matter, which fills all places near the earth, or which immediately encompasses the globe of earth and water. Watt's Logick.
 The state of the air; or the air considered with regard to health.
There be many good and healthful airs, that do appear by habitation and other proofs, that differ not in smell from other airs. Bacon's Natural History, № 904.
 Air in motion; a small gentle wind.
            Fresh gales, and gentle airs,Whisper'd it to the woods, and from their wingsFlung rose, flung odours from the spicy shrubDisporting! Milton's Paradise Lost, b. viii. l. 515.
But safe repose, without an air of breath,Dwells here, and a dumb quiet next to death. Dryden.
Let vernal airs through trembling osiers play,And Albion's cliffs resound the rural lay. Pope's Pastorals.
 Blast.
All the stor'd vengeancies of heaven fallOn her ingrateful top! strike her young bones,You taking airs, with lameness. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Any thing light or uncertain; that is as light as air.
O momentary grace of mortal men,Which we more hunt for than the grace of God!Who builds his hope in air of your fair looks,Lives like a drunken sailor on a mast,Ready, with ev'ry nod, to tumble downInto the fatal bowels of the deep. Shakesp. Rich. III.
 The open weather; air unconfined.
The garden was inclos'd within the square,Where young Emilia took the morning air. Dryd. Fables.
 Vent; utterance; emission into the air.
I would have ask'd you, if I durst for shame,If still you lov'd? you gave it air before me.But ah! why were we not both of a sex?For then we might have lov'd without a crime. Dryd. D. Seb.
 Publication; exposure to the publick view and knowledge.
I am sorry to find it has taken air, that I have some hand in these papers. Pope's Letters.
 Intelligence; information.
It grew also from the airs, which the princes and states abroad received from their ambassadors and agents here; which were attending the court in great number. Bacon's Henry VII.
 Poetry; a song.
                      And the repeated airOf sad Electra's poet, had the pow'rTo save th' Athenian walls from ruin bare. Parad. Regain.
 Musick, whether light or serious.
This musick crept by me upon the waters,Allaying both their fury and my passion,With its sweet air. Shakespeare's Tempest.
Call in some musick; I have heard, soft airsCan charm our senses, and expel our cares. Denh. Sophy.
The same airs, which some entertain with most delightful transports, to others are importune. Glanville's Scepsis Scient.
Since we have such a treasury of words, so proper for the airs of musick, I wonder that persons should give so little attention. Addison, Spectator, № 406.
Born on the swelling notes, our souls aspire,While solemn airs improve the sacred fire;And angels lean from heav'n to hear! Pope's St. Cæcilia.
— When the soul is sunk with cares,Exalts her in enliv'ning airs. Pope's Cæcilia.
 The mien, or manner, of the person.
Her graceful innocence, her ev'ry air,Of gesture, or least action, over-aw'dHis malice. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix. l. 459.
              For the air of youthHopeful and chearful, in thy blood shall reignA melancholy damp of cold and dry,To weigh thy spirits down; and last consumeThe balm of life. Milt. Par. Lost, b. xi. l. 452.
But, having the life before us, besides the experience of all they knew, it is no wonder to hit some airs and features, which they have missed. Dryden on Dramatick Poetry.
There is something wonderfully divine in the airs of this picture. Addison on Italy.
Yet should the Graces all thy figures place,And breathe an air divine on ev'ry face. Pope.
 An affected or laboured manner or gesture; as, a lofty air, a gay air.
Whom Ancus follows, with a fawning air;But vain within, and proudly popular. Dryd. Æn. vi.
There are of these sort of beauties, which last but for a moment; as, the different airs of an assembly, upon the sight of an unexpected and uncommon object, some particularity of a violent passion, some graceful action, a smile, a glance of an eye, a disdainful look, a look of gravity, and a thousand other such like things. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
Their whole lives were employed in intrigues of state, and they naturally give themselves airs of kings and princes, of which the ministers of other nations are only the representatives. Addison's Remarks on Italy.
                  To curl their waving hairs,Assist their blushes, and inspire their airs. Pope.
He assumes and affects an entire set of very different airs; he conceives himself a being of a superiour nature. Swift.
 Appearance.
As it was communicated with the air of a secret, it soon found its way into the world. Pope's Ded. to Rape of the Lock.
 [In horsemanship.] Airs denote the artificial or practised motions of a managed horse. Chambers.

Airy
A'iry. adj. [from air; aëreus, Lat.]

 Composed of air.
The first is the transmission, or emission, of the thinner and more airy parts of bodies; as, in odours and infections: and this is, of all the rest, the most corporeal. Bacon.
 Relating to the air; belonging to the air.
There are fishes that have wings, that are not strangers to the airy region. Boyle.
 High in air.
Whole rivers here forsake the fields below,And, wond'ring at their height, through airy channels flow. Addison.
 Light as air; thin; unsubstantial; without solidity.
I hold ambition of so airy and light a quality, that it is but a shadow's shadow. Shakesp. Hamlet.
Sill may the dog the wand'ring troops constrainOf airy ghosts, and vex the guilty train;And, with her gristly lord, his lovely queen remain. Dr. Æn.
 Without reality; without any steady foundation in truth or nature; vain; trifling.
                  Nor think with windOf airy threats to awe whom yet with deedsThou can'st not. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vi.
Nor (to avoid such meanness) soaring high,With empty sound, and airy notions, fly. Roscommon.
I have found a complaint concerning the scarcity of money, which occasioned many airy propositions for the remedy of it. Temple's Miscellanies.
 Fluttering; loose; as if to catch the air; full of levity.
But the epick poem is too stately to receive those little ornaments.  The painters draw their nymphs in thin and airy habits; but the weight of gold and of embroderies is reserved for queens and goddesses. Dryd. Æneid, Dedicat.
By this name of ladies, he means all young persons, slender, finely shaped, airy, and delicate: such as are nymphs and Naïads. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 Gay; sprightly; full of mirth; vivacious; lively; spirited; light of heart.
He that is merry and airy at shore, when he sees a sad and a loud tempest on the sea, or dances briskly when God thunders from heaven, regards not when God speaks to all the world. Taylor's rule of living holy.

Ake
To Ake. v.n. [from ἄχος, Gr. and therefore more grammatically written ache. See Ache.]

 To feel a lasting pain, generally of the internal pains; distinguished from smart, which is commonly used of uneasiness in the external parts; but this is no accurate account.
To sue, and be deny'd, such common grace,My wounds ake at you! Shakesp. Timon.
        Let our finger ake, and it enduesOur other healthful members with a senseOf pain. Shakesp. Othello.
Were the pleasure of drinking accompanied, the very moment, with that sick stomach and aking head, which, in some men, are sure to follow, I think, no body would ever let wine touch his lips. Locke.
His limbs must ake, with daily toils opprest,Ere long-wish'd night brings necessary rest. Prior.
 It is frequently applied, in an improper sense, to the heart; as, the heart akes; to imply grief or fear. Shakespeare has used it, still more licentiously, of the soul.
Here shame dissuades him, there his fear prevails,And each, by turns, his aking heart assails. Addis. Ov. Met.
                            My soul akesTo know when two authorities are up,Neither supreme, how soon confusionMay enter. Shakesp. Coriolanus.

Ale
Ale. n.s. [al, Sax.]

 A liquour made by infusing malt [See Malt.] in hot water, and then fermenting the liquor.
I'll scratch your heads; you must be seeing christenings.Do you look for ale and cakes here, you rude rascals? Shakesp. Henry VIII.
The fertility of the soil in grain, and its being not proper for vines, put the Egyptians upon drinking ale, of which they were the inventors. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 A merry meeting used in country places.
And all the neighbourhoods, from old recordsOf antick proverbs drawn from Whitson lords,And their authorities at wakes and ales,With country precedents, and old wives tales,We bring you now. Ben. Johnson.

Alien (noun)
A'lien. n.s. [alienus, Lat.]

 A foreigner; not a denison; a man of another country or family; not allied; a stranger.
In whomsoever these things are, the church doth acknowledge them for her children; them only she holdeth for aliens and strangers, in whom these things are not found. Hooker.
If it be prov'd against an alien,He seeks the life of any citizen,The party, 'gainst the which he doth contrive,Shall seize on half his goods. Shakesp. Merch. of Venice.
The mere Irish were not only accounted aliens, but enemies, and altogether out of the protection of the law; so as it was no capital offence to kill them. Sir John Davies on Ireland.
Thy place in council thou hast rudely lost,Which by thy younger brother is supply'd,And art almost an alien to the heartsOf all the court and princes of my blood. Shak. Henry IV.
Their famous lawgiver condemned the persons, who sat idle in divisions dangerous to the government, as aliens to the community, and therefore to be cut off from it. Addison. Freeholder.
 In law.
An alien is one born in a strange country, and never enfranchised.  A man born out of the land, so it be within the limits beyond the seas, or of English parents out of the king's obedience, so the parents, at the time of the birth, be of the king's obedience, is not alien.  If one born out of the king's allegiance, come and dwell in England, his children (if he beget any here) are not aliens, but denizens. Cowell.

Amanuensis
Amanue'nsis. n.s. [Lat.] A person who writes what another dictates.

Amazon
A'mazon. n.s. [α and μάζος.] The Amazons were a race of women famous for valour, who inhabited Caucasus; they are so called from their cutting off their breasts, to use their weapons better. A warlike woman; a virago.
 Stay, stay thy hands, thou art an amazon, And fightest with the sword. Shakesp. Henry VI.

Ambages
Amba'ges. n.s. [Lat.] A circuit of words; a circumlocutory form of speech; a multiplicity of words; an indirect manner of expression.
 They gave those complex ideas names, that they might the more easily record and discourse of things they were daily conversant in, without long ambages and circumlocutions; and that the things, they were continually to give and receive information about, might be the easier and quicker understood. Locke.

Ambagious
Amba'gious. adj. [from ambages.] Circumlocutory; perplexed; tedious. Dict.

Ambassade
Ambassa'de. n.s. [ambassade, Fr.] Embassy; character or business of an ambassador; a word not now in use.
 When you disgraced me in my ambassade, Then I degraded you from being king. Shak. Henry VI.

Ambassadour
Amba'ssadour. n.s. [ambassadeur, Fr. embaxador, Span. It is written differently, as it is supposed to come from the French or Spanish language; and the original derivation being uncertain, it is not easy to settle its orthography. Some derive it from the Hebrew בשר, to tell, and םבשר, a messenger; others from ambactus, which, in the old Gaulish, signified a servant; whence ambascia, in low Latin, is found to signify service, and ambasciator, a servant; others deduce it from ambacht, in old Teutonick, signifying a government, and Junius mentions a possibility of its descent from αναβαινω; and others from am for ad, and bassus, low, as supposing the act of sending an ambassadour, to be in some sort an act of submission. All these derivations lead to write ambassadour, not embassadour.]
A person sent in a publick manner from one sovereign power to another, and supposed to represent the power from which he is sent. The person of an ambassadour is inviolable.
Ambassador is, in popular language, the general name of a messenger from a sovereign power, and sometimes, ludicrously, from common persons. In the juridical and formal language, it signifies particularly a minister of the highest rank residing in another country, and is distinguished from an envoy, who is of less dignity.
 Give first admittance to th' ambassadours. Shak. Hamlet.
 Rais'd by these hopes, I sent no news before, Nor ask'd you leave, nor did your faith implore; But come, without a pledge, my own ambassadour. Dryden.
 Oft have their black ambassadours appear'd Loaden with gifts, and fill'd the courts of Zama. Add. Cato.

Ambition
Ambi'tion. n.s. [ambitio, Lat.] The desire of something higher than is possessed at present.

 The desire of preferment or honour.
Who would think, without having such a mind as Antiphilus, that so great goodness could not have bound gratefulness? and so high advancement not have satisfied his ambition? Sidn.
 The desire of any thing great or excellent.
The quick'ning power would be, and so would rest;The sense would not be only, but be well:But wit's ambition longeth to the best,For it desires in endless bliss to dwell. Sir J. Davies.
        Urge them, while their soulsAre capable of this ambition;Lest zeal, now melted by the windy breathOf soft petitions, pity and remorse,Cool and congeal again to what it was. Shakesp. K. John.
 It is used with to before a verb, and of before a noun.
I had a very early ambition to recommend my self to your Lordship's patronage. Addison.
There was an ambition of wit, and an affectation of gayety. Pope's Preface to his Letters.

Ambulation
Ambula'tion. n.s. [ambulatio, Lat.] The act of walking.
From the occult and invisible motion of the muscles in station, proceed more offensive lassitudes, than from ambulation. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii. c. 1.

An
An. article. [an, Saxon. een, Dutch, eine, German.] The article indefinite, used before a vowel, or h mute. See A.

 One, but with less emphasis; as, there stands a house.
 Since he cannot be always employed in study, reading, and conversation, there will be many an hour, besides what his exercises will take up. Locke.
 Any, or some; as, an elephant might swim in this water.
 He was no way at an uncertainty, nor ever in the least at a loss concerning any branch of it. Locke on St. Paul's Epistles.
 A wit's a feather, and a chief a rod, An honest man's the noblest work of God. Pope.
 Sometimes it signifies, like a, some particular state; but this is now disused.
 It is certain, that odours do, in a small degree, nourish; especially the odour of wine; and we see men an hungred do love to smell hot bread. Bacon's Natural History.
 An is sometimes, in old authors, a contraction of and if.
         He can't flatter, he! An honest mind and plain, he must speak truth; An they will take it so; if not, he's plain. Shakesp. K. Lear.
 Sometimes a contraction of and before if.
                       Well I know The clerk will ne'er wear hair on's face that had it. ——— He will an' if he live to be a man. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 Sometimes it is a contraction of as if.
 My next pretty correspondent, like Shakespeare's lion in Pyramus and Thisbe, roars an' it were any nightingale. Addison. Guardian, № 121.

Ananas
Ana'nas. n.s. The pine apple.
It has a flower consisting of one leaf, divided into three parts, and funnel-shaped; the embryos produced in the tubercles, afterwards become fruit; the seeds in the tubercles are small, and almost kidney-shaped.
The species are, 1. Oval-shaped pine apple, with a whitish flesh. 2. Pyramidal pine apple, with a yellow flesh. 3. Pine apple, with smooth leaves.  4. Pine apple, with shining green leaves, and scarce any spines on their edges. 5. The olive-coloured pine.
The first sort is most common in Europe, but the fruit of the second is larger, better flavoured, and its juice not so astringent.  The fifth sort is the most rare in Europe, but esteemed above all the rest.  These plants are propagated by suckers; and from the crowns which grow on top of the fruit. Miller.
 Witness thou best anana, thou the pride Of vegetable life, beyond whate'er The poets imag'd in the golden age. Thoms. Summer.

Androtomy
Andro'tomy. n.s. [from ἀνὴρ and τέμνω.] The practice of cutting human bodies. Dict.

Anecdote
A'necdote. n.s. [ἀνέκδοτον.] Something yet unpublished; secret history.
 Some modern anecdotes aver, He nodded in his elbow-chair. Prior.

Animal (noun)
A'nimal. n.s. [animal, Lat.]

 A living creature corporeal, distinct, on the one side, from pure spirit, on the other side, from mere matter.
Animals are such beings, which, besides the power of growing, and producing their like, as plants and vegetables have, are endowed also with sensation and spontaneous motion. Mr. Ray gives two schemes of tables of them.


Animals are either



Sanguineous, that is, such as have blood, which breathe either by



Lungs, having either



Two ventricles in their heart, and those either



Veviparious,



Aquatick, as the whale kind,


Terrestrial, as quadrupeds;


Oviparous, as birds.


But one ventricle in the heart, as frogs, tortoises, and serpents.


Gills, as all sanguineous fishes, except the whale kind.


Exsanguineous, or without blood, which may be divided into



Greater, and those either,



Naked,



Terrestrial, as naked snails.


Aquatick, as the poulp, cuttle-fish, &c.


Covered with a tegument, either


 

Crustaceous, as lobsters and crab-fish.


Testaceous, either


 
 

Univalve, as limpets;


Bivalve, as oysters, muscles, cockles;


Turbinate, as periwinkles, snails, &c.


Lesser, as insects of all sorts.


Viviparous hairy animals, or quadrupeds, are either



Hoofed, which are either



Whole-footed or hoofed, as the horse and ass;


Cloven-footed, having the hoof divided into


Two principal parts, called bisulca, either



Such as chew not the cud, as swine;


Ruminant, or such as chew the cud; divided into



Such as have perpetual and hollow horns.



Beef-kind,


Sheep-kind


Goat-kind.


Such as have solid, branched and deciduous horns, as the deer-kind.


Four parts, or quadrisulca, as the rhinoceros and hippopotamus.


Clawed or digitate, having the foot divided into


 

Two parts or toes, having two nails, as the camel kind;


Many toes or claws; either


 
 

Undivided, as the elephant;


Divided, which have either


 
 
 

Broad nails, and an human shape, as apes;


Narrower, and more pointed nails,


which, in respect of their teeth, are divided into such as have



Many fore-teeth, or cutters in each jaw;



The greater, which have



A shorter snout and rounder head, as the cat-kind;


A longer snout and head, as the dog-kind.


The lesser, the vermin or weazel kind.


Only two large and remarkable fore-teeth, all which are phytivorous, and are called the hare kind. Ray.
Vegetables are proper enough to repair animals, as being near of the same specifick gravity with the animal juice, and as consisting of the same parts with animal substances, spirit, water, salt, oil, earth; all which are contained in the sap they derive from the earth. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Some of the animated substances have various organical or instrumental parts, fitted for a variety of motions from place to place, and a spring of life within themselves, as beasts, birds, fishes, and insects; these are called animals. Other animated substances are called vegetables, which have within themselves the principles of another sort of life and growth, and of various productions of leaves and fruit, such as we see in plants, herbs, and trees. Watts's Logick.
 By way of contempt, we say of a stupid man, that he is a stupid animal.

Anniversary (adjective)
Annive'rsary. adj. [anniversarius, Lat.] Returning with the revolution of the year; annual; yearly.
 The heaven whirled about with admirable celerity, most constantly finishing its anniversary vicissitudes. Ray.
 They deny giving any worship to a creature, as inconsistent with christianity; but confess the honour and esteem for the martyrs, which they expressed by keeping their anniversary days, and recommending their example. Stillingfl. Defence.

Anniversary (noun)
Annive'rsary. n.s. [anniversarius, Lat.]

 A day celebrated as it returns in the course of the year.
 For encouragement to follow the example of martyrs, the primitive christians met at the places of their martyrdom, to praise God for them, and to observe the anniversary of their sufferings. Stillingfleet's Defence of Disc. on Romish Idolatry.
 The act of celebration, or performance, in honour of the anniversary day.
 Donne had never seen Mrs. Drury, whom he has made immortal in his admirable anniversaries. Dryden.
 Anniversary is an office in the Romish church, celebrated not only once a year, but which ought to be said daily through the year, for the soul of the deceased. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Anno Domini
A'nno Domini. [Lat.] In the year of our Lord; as, anno domini, or A.D. 1751; that is, in the seventeen hundred and fifty first year from the birth of our Saviour.

Another
Ano'ther. adj. [from an and other.]

 Not the same.
 He that will not lay a foundation for perpetual disorder, must of necessity find another rise of government than that. Locke.
 One more; a new addition to the former number.
                         ——— A fourth? ———                              Start eye!
What! will the line stretch out to th' crack of doom? Another yet? — a seventh! I'll see no more. Shak. Macbeth.
 Any other; any one else.
 If one man sin against another, the judge shall judge him. 1 Samuel, ii. 25.


 Why not of her? preferr'd above the rest, By him with knightly deeds, and open love profess'd; So had another been, where he his vows address'd.

  Dryden's Fables.



 Not one's self.
 A man shall have diffused his life, his self, and his whole concernments so far, that he can weep his sorrows with another's eyes; when he has another heart besides his own, both to share, and to support his grief. South.
 Widely different; much altered.
 When the soul is beaten from its station, and the mounds of virtue are broken down, it becomes quite another thing from what it was before. South.

Anthology
Antho'logy. n.s. [ἀνθολογἰα, from ανθος, a flower, and λέγα, to gather.]

 A collection of flowers.

 A collection of devotions in the Greek church.

 A collection of poems.

Anthropology
Anthropo'logy. n.s. [from ἄνθρωπος, man, and λέγω, to discourse.] The doctrine of anatomy; the doctrine of the form and structure of the body of man.

Anthropopathy
Anthropo'pathy. n.s. [ἄνθρωπος, man, and πάθος, passion.] The sensibility of man; the passions of man.

Anthropophagi
Anthropo'phagi. n.s. It has no singular. [ἄνθρωπος, man, and φάγω, to eat.] Man-eaters; cannibals; those that live upon human flesh.
          The cannibals that each other eat,The anthropophagi, and men whose headsDo grow beneath their shoulders. Shakesp. Othello.

Anthropophaginian
Anthropophagi'nian. n.s. A ludicrous word, formed by Shakespeare from anthropophagi, for the sake of a formidable sound.
Go, knock, and call; he'll speak like an anthropophaginian unto thee: knock, I say. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.

Aorta
Ao'rta. n.s. [ἀορτὴ.] The great artery which rises immediately out of the left ventricle of the heart. Quincy.

Apace
Apa'ce. adv. [from a and pace; that is, with a great pace.]

 Quick; speedily: used of things in motion.
 Or when the flying libbard she did chace, She could them nimbly move, and after fly apace. F. Queen.
                     Ay, quoth my uncle Glo'ster, Small herbs have grace, great weeds do grow apace. And since methinks, I would not grow so fast, Because sweet flow'rs are slow, and weeds make haste. Shakesp. Richard III.
 He promis'd in his east a glorious race; Now sunk from his meridian, sets apace. Dryden's Aurengz.
 Is not he imprudent, who, seeing  the tide making haste towards him apace, will sleep till the sea overwhelm him. Tillotson.
 With haste; applied to some action.
 The baron now his diamonds pours apace; Th' embroider'd king who shows but half his face, And his refulgent queen. Pope's Rape of the Lock.
 Hastily; with speed: spoken of any kind of progression from one state to another.
                     This second course of men, With some regard to what is just and right, Shall lead their lives, and multiply apace. Milton's Par. Lost.
 The life and power of religion decays apace here and at home, while we are spreading the honour of our arms far and wide through foreign nations. Atterbury's Sermons.
 If sensible pleasure, or real grandeur, be our end, we shall proceed apace to real misery. Watts's Improv. of the Mind.

Apagogical
Apago'gical. adj. [from ἀπαγωγὴ; compounded of ἀπὸ, from, and αγω, to bring or draw.] An apagogical demonstration is such as does not prove the thing directly; but shews the impossibility, or absurdity, which arises from denying it; and is also called reductio ad impossibile, or ad absurdum. Chambers.

Apart
Apa'rt. adv. [apart, Fr.]

 Separately from the rest in place.
 Since I enter into that question, it behoveth me to give reason for my opinion, with circumspection; because I walk aside, and in a way apart from the multitude. Raleigh's History.
 The party discerned, that the earl of Essex would never serve their turn, they resolved to have another army apart, that should be at their devotion. Clarendon, b. viii.
 In a state of distinction; as, to set apart for any use.
 He is so very figurative, that he requires a grammar apart, to construe him. Dryden.
 The tyrant shall demand yon sacred load, And gold and vessels set apart for God. Prior.
 Distinctly.
 Moses first nameth heaven and earth, putting waters but in the third place, as comprehending waters in the word earth; but afterwards he nameth them apart. Raleigh's History.
 At a distance; retired from the other company.
 So please you, madam, To put apart these your attendants, I Shall bring Emilia forth. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.

Apartment
Apa'rtment. n.s. [apartement, Fr.] A part of the house allotted to the use of any particular person; a room; a set of rooms.
 A private gallery 'twixt th' apartments led, Not to the foe yet known. Sir J. Denham.
             Pale as death, despoil'd of his array, Into the queen's apartment takes his way. Dryden's Fables.
 The most considerable ruin is that on the eastern promontory, where are still some apartments left, very high and arched at top. Addison's Remarks on Italy.

Apathy
A'pathy. n.s. [α, not, and πάθος, feeling.] The quality of not feeling; exemption from passion; freedom from mental perturbation.
 Of good and evil much they argued then, Passion, and apathy, and glory, and shame. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 To remain insensible of such provocations, is not constancy, but apathy. South.
 In lazy apathy let stoicks boast Their virtue fix'd; 'tis fixed as in frost, Contracted all, retiring to the breast; But strength of mind is exercise, not rest. Pope.

Ape (noun)
Ape. n.s. [ape, Icelandish.]

 A kind of monkey remarkable for imitating what he sees.
I will be more newfangled than an ape, more giddy in my desires than a monkey. Shakesp. As you like it.
Writers report, that the heart of an ape worn near the heart, comforteth the heart, and increaseth audacity.  It is true, that the ape is a merry and bold beast. Bacon's Natural History.
With glittering gold and sparkling gems they shine,But apes and monkeys are the gods within. Granville.
 An imitator; used generally in the bad sense.
Julio Romano, who, had he himself eternity, and couuld put breath into his work, would beguile nature of her custom: so perfectly he is her ape. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.

Ape (verb)
To Ape. v.a. [from ape.] To imitate, as an ape imitates human actions.
 Aping the foreigners in every dress, Which, bought at greater cost, becomes him less. Dryden.
 Curse on the stripling! how he apes his sire! Ambitiously sententious! Addison's Cato.

Apeak
Ape'ak, or Ape'ek. adv. [probably from à pique.] In a posture to pierce the ground.

Apepsy
A'pepsy. n.s. [ἀπεψια.] A loss of natural concoction. Quincy.

Aper
A'per. n.s. [from ape.] A ridiculous imitator or mimick.

Aperient
Ape'rient. adj. [aperio, Lat. to open.] That which has the quality of opening; chiefly used in medicine for gently purgative.
 There be bracelets fit to comfort the spirits; and they be of three intentions; refrigerant, corroborant, and aperient.  Bacon.
 Of the stems of plants, some contain a fine aperient salt, and are diuretick and saponaceous. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Aperitive
Ape'ritive. adj. [from aperio, Lat. to open.] That which has the quality of opening the excrementious passages of the body.
 They may make broth, with the addition of aperitive herbs. Harvey on Consumptions.

Apert
Ape'rt. adj. [apertus, Lat.] Open.

Apertion
Ape'rtion. n.s. [from apertus, Lat.]

 An opening; a passage through any thing; a gap.
 The next now in order are the apertions; under which term I do comprehend doors, windows, staircases, chimneys, or other conduits: in short, all inlets or outlets. Wotton's Archit.
 The act of opening; or state of being opened.
 The plenitude of vessels, otherways called the plethora, when it happens, causeth an extravasation of blood, either by ruption or apertion of them. Wiseman's Surgery.

Apertly
Ape'rtly. adv. [apertè, Lat.] Openly; without covert.

Apertness
Ape'rtness. n.s. [from apert.] Openness.
 In general, the freedom, or apertness and vigour of pronouncing, and the closeness and muffling, and, as I may say, laziness of speaking, render the sound considerably different. Holder's Elements of Speech.

Aperture
A'perture. n.s. [from apertus, open.]

 The act of opening.
 Hence ariseth the facility of joining a consonant to a vowel, because from an appulse to an aperture is easier, than from one appulse to another. Holder's Elements of Speech.
 An open place.
 If memory be made by the easy motion of the spirits through the opened passages, images, without doubt, pass through the same apertures. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica, Preface.
 The hole next the object glass of a telescope or microscope.
 The concave metal bore an aperture of an inch; but the aperture was limited by an opaque circle, perforated in the middle. Newton's Opticks.
 Enlargement; explanation: a sense seldom found.
 It is too much untwisted by the doctors, and, like philosophy, made intricate by explications, and difficult by the aperture and dissolution of distinctions. Taylor's Worthy Communic.

Apetalous
Ape'talous. adj. [of α, priv. and πιταλον, a leaf.] Without petala or flower leaves.

Apetalousness
Ape'talousness. n.s. [from apetalous.] Being without leaves.

Apex
Apex. n.s. apices, plur. [Lat.] The tip or point of any thing.
 The apex, or lesser end of it, is broken off. Woodward.

Aphaeresis
Aphæ'resis. n.s. [ἀφαίρεσις.] A figure in grammar that takes away a letter or syllable from the beginning of a word.

Aphelion
Aphe'lion. n.s. aphelia, plur. [from ἀπο, and ἥλιος, the sun.] That part of the orbit of a planet, in which it is at the point remotest from the sun.
 The reason why the comets move not in the zodiack, is, that, in their aphelia, they may be at the greatest distances from one another; and consequently disturb one another's motions the least that may be. Cheyne's Philosoph. Principles.

Apheta
Aphe'ta. n.s. [with astrologers.] The name of the plant, which is imagined to be the giver or disposer of life in a nativity. Dict.

Aphetical
Aphe'tical. adj. [from apheta.] Relating to the apheta.

Aphilanthropy
Aphila'nthropy. n.s. [ἀ, without, and φιλανθρωπία, love of mankind.] Want of love to mankind.

Aphony
A'phony. n.s. [ἀ, without, and φώνι, speech.] A loss of speech. Quincy.

Aphorism
A'phorism. n.s. [ἀφορισμὸς.] A maxim; a precept contracted in a short sentence; an unconnected position.
 He will easily discern how little of truth there is in the multitude; and though sometimes they are flattered with that aphorism, will hardly believe the voice of the people to be the voice of God. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i. c. 3.
 I shall at present consider the aphorism, that a man of religion and virtue is a more useful, and consequently a more valuable member of a community. Rogers's Sermons.

Aphoristical
Aphori'stical. adj. [from aphorism.] In the form of an aphorism; in separate and unconnected sentences.

Aphoristically
Aphori'stically. adv. [from aphoristical.] In the form of an aphorism.
 These being carried down, do seldom miss a cure of the former, as Hippocrates doth likeways aphoristically tell us. Harvey on Consumptions.

Apostrophe
Apo'strophe. n.s. [ἀποστροφή, from ἀπὸ, from, and στρέφω, to turn.]

 In rhetorick, a diversion of speech to another person, than the speech appointed did intend or require; or it is a turning of the speech from one person to another, many times abruptly. A figure when we break off the course of our speech, and speak to some new person, present or absent, as to the people or witnesses, when it was before directed to the judges, or opponent. This diversion or speech is made many ways. 1. To God. 2. To angels. 3. To men in their several ranks, whether absent or present, dead or alive. 4. To the adversary. 5. To the heavenly bodies and meteors. 6. To the earth and things in it. 7. To the sea and things in it. 8. To beasts, birds, and fishes. 9. To inanimate things. Smith's Rhetorick.

 In grammar, the contraction of a word by the use of a comma; as, tho', for though; rep', for reputation.
 Many laudable attempts have been made, by abbreviating words with apostrophes; and by lopping polysyllables, leaving one or two words at most. Swift.

Apple
A'pple. n.s. [æppl, Saxon.]

 The fruit of the apple tree.
Tall thriving trees confess'd the fruit mold;The red'ning apple ripens here to gold. Pope's Odyssey.
 The pupil of the eye.
He instructed him; he kept him as the apple of his eye. Deut. xxxii. 10.

Apple of Love
Apple of Love.
Apples of love are of three sorts; the most common having long trailing branches, with rough leaves and yellow joints, succeeded by apples, as they are called, at the joints, not round, but bunched; of a pale orange shining pulp, and seeds within. Mortimer's Art of Husbandry.

Appropinquate
To Appropi'nquate. v.n. [appropinquo, Lat.] To draw nigh unto; to approach.

Apricot
A'pricot, or A'pricock. n.s. [from apricus, Lat. sunny.] A kind of wall fruit.
The ordinary sorts of this fruit cultivated in English gardens are, 1. The masculine apricock. 2. The orange apricock. 3. The Algier apricock. 4. The Roman apricock. 5. The Turkey apricock. 6. The transparent apricock. 7. The Breda apricock. 8. The Bruxelles apricock. They are generally propagated by budding them on plum stocks, and will readily take upon almost any sort of plum, provided the stock be free and thriving. Millar.

April
April. n.s. [Aprillis, Lat. Avril, Fr.] The fourth month of the year, January counted first.
April is represented by a young man in green, with a garland of myrtle and hawthorn buds; in one hand primroses and violets, in the other the sign Taurus. Peacham on Drawings.
Men are April when they woo, December when they wed: Maids are May when they are maids, but the sky changes when they are wives. Shakesp. As you like it.

Apsis
A'psis. n.s. apsides, plural. [άψίς.]
Is applied, in astronomy, to two points in the orbits of planets, in which they are at the greatest, and the least distance from the sun or earth. The higher apsis is more particularly denominated aphelion, or apogee; the lower, perihelion, or perigee. Chambers.
If bodies revolve in orbits that are pretty near circles, and the apsides of these orbits be fixed, then the centripetal forces of those bodies will be reciprocally as the squares of the distances. Cheyne's Philosophical Principles.

Arboreous
Arbo'reous. adj. [arboreus, Lat.]

 Belonging to trees.

 A term in botany, to distinguish such funguses or mosses as grow upon trees, from those that grow on the ground. Quincy.
They speak properly, who make it an arboreous excrescence, or rather a superplant bred of a viscous and superfluous lopp, which the tree itself cannot assimilate. Brown's Vulgar Err.

Arch (noun)
Arch. n.s. [arcus, Lat.]

 Part of a circle, not more than the half.
The mind perceives, that an arch of a circle is less than the whole circle, as clearly as it does the idea of a circle. Locke.
 A building in form of a segment of a circle, used for bridges and other works.
Ne'er through an arch so hurried the blown tide,As the recomforted through the gates. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
Let Rome in Tiber melt, and the wide archOf the rais'd empire fall! here is my space. Shakespeare's Antony and Cleopatra.
The royal squadron marches,Erect triumphal archesFor Albion and Albanius. Dryden's Albion.
 The sky, or vault of heaven.
                    Hath nature given them eyesTo see this vaulted arch, and the rich copeOf sea and land. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 [from ἄρχος.] A chief: obsolete.
                The noble duke, my master,My worth arch and patron comes to night. Sh. King. Lear.

Archbishop
Archbi'shop. n.s. [from arch and bishop.] A bishop of the first class, who superintends the conduct of other bishops his suffragans.
          Cranmer is return'd with welcome,Install'd lord archbishop of Canterbury. Shakespeare.
The archbishop was the known architect of this new fabrick. Clarendon.

Arid
A'rid. adj. [aridus, Lat. dry.] Dry; parched up.
My complexion is become adust, and my body arid, by visiting lands. Arbuthnot and Pope's M. Scribl.
His harden'd fingers deck the gaudy spring,Without him summer were an arid waste. Thoms. Autumn.

Aristocracy
Aristo'cracy. n.s. [ἄριστος, greatest, and κρατέω, to govern.] That form of government which places the supreme power in the nobles, without a king, and exclusively of the people.
 The aristocracy of Venice hath admitted so many abuses through the degeneracy of the nobles, that the period of its duration seems to approach. Swift.

Arms
Arms. n.s. without the singular number. [arma, Lat.]

 Weapons of offence, or armour of defence.
                 Those arms which Mars before Had giv'n the vanquish'd, now the victor bore. Pope's Iliad.
 A state of hostility.
 Sir Edward Courtney, and the haughty prelate, With many more confed'rates, are in arms. Shakes. R. III.
 War in general.
 Arms and the man I sing. Dryd. VIrgil.
 Him Paris follow'd to the dire alarms, Both breathing slaughter, both resolv'd in arms. Pope's Iliad.
 Action; the act of taking arms.
 Up rose the victor angels, and to arms The matin trumpet sung. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vi.
 The ensigns amorial of a family.

Arrack
Arra'ck, or Ara'ck. n.s. A spirituous liquor imported from the East Indies, used by way of dram and in punch.  The word arack is an Indian name for strong waters of all kinds; for they call our spirits and brandy English arack.  But what we understand by the name arack, is really no other than a spirit procured by distillation from a vegetable juice called toddy, which flows by incision out of the cocoa-nut tree.  There are divers kinds of it; single, double, and treble distilled.  The double distilled is commonly sent abroad, and is preferred to all other aracks of India. Chambers.
I send this to be better known for choice of china, tea, arrack, and other Indian goods. Spectator, № 288.

Arrant
A'rrant. adj. [a word of uncertain etymology, but probably from errant, which being at first applied to its proper signification to vagabonds, as an errant or arrant rogue, that is, a rambling rogue, lost, in time, its original signification, and being by its use understood to imply something bad, was applied at large to any thing that was mentioned with hatred or contempt.] Bad in high degree.
Country folks, who hallooed and hooted after me, as at the arrantest coward that ever shewed his shoulders to the enemy. Sidney, b. ii.
A vain fool grows forty times an arranter sot than before. L'Estrange's Fables.
And  let him every deity adore, If his new bride prove not an arrant whore. Dryd. Juven.

Article (noun)


Article (verb active)


Article (verb neuter)


Aside
Asi'de. adv. [from a and side.]

 To one side; out of the perpendicular direction.
 The storm rushd'd in, and Arcite stood aghast:The flames were blown aside, yet shone they bright,Fann'd by the wind, and gave a rustled light. Dryd. Fables.
 To another part; out of the true direction.
 He had no brother; which though it be a comfortable thing for kings to have, yet it draweth the subjects eyes a little aside. Bacon's Henry VIII.
 From the company; as, to speak aside.
 He took him aside from the multitude. Mark, vii. 33.

Asleep
Asle'ep. adv. [from a and sleep.]

 Sleeping; at rest.
 How many thousands of my poorest subjectsAre at this hour asleep! O gentle sleep,Nature's soft nurse, how have I frighted thee! Sh. H. IV.
 The diligence of trade, and noiseful gain,And luxury more late asleep were laid:All was the night's, and, in her silent reign,No sound the rest of nature did invade. Dryden's Ann. M.
 There is no difference between a person asleep, and in an apoplexy, but that the one can be awaked, and the other cannot. Arbuthnot on Diet.
 To sleep.
 If a man watch too long, it is odds but he will fall asleep. Bacon's Essays.
 Thus done the tales, to bed they creep,By whispering winds soon lull'd asleep. Milton's l'Allegro.

Assassin


Assonance
A'ssonance. n.s. [assonance, Fr.] Reference of one sound to another resembling it. Dict.

Assonant
A'ssonant. adj. [assonant, French.] Sounding in a manner resembling another sound. Dict.

Assort
To Asso'rt. v.a. [assortir, Fr.] To range in classes, as one thing suits with another.

Assot
To Asso't. v.a. [from sot; assoter, Fr.] To infatuate; to besot: a word out of use.
But whence they sprung, or how they were begot, Uneath is to assure, uneath to weene That monstrous errour which doth some assot. Fairy Queen.

Assumpsit
Assu'mpsit. n.s. [assumo, Lat.] A voluntary promise made by word, whereby a man taketh upon him to perform or pay any thing to another: It contains any verbal promise made upon consideration. Cowel.

Athirst
Athi'rst. adv. [from a and thirst.] Thirsty; in want of drink.
With scanty measure then supply their food;And, when athirst, restrain 'em from the flood. Dryden.

Attain (noun)
Atta'in. n.s. [from the verb.] The thing attained; attainment; a word not in use.
Crowns and diadems, the most splendid terrene attains, are akin to that which to-day is in the field, and to-morrow is cut down. Glanville's Scepsis.

Attain (verb active)
To Atta'in. v.a. [atteindre, Fr. attineo, Lat.]

 To gain; to procure; to obtain.
Such knowledge is too wonderful for me; it is high; I cannot attain unto it. Ps. cxxxix. 6.
Is he wise who hopes to attain the end without the means, nay by means that are quite contrary to it? Tillotson.
 To overtake; to come up with: a sense now little in use.
The earl hoping to have overtaken the Scottish king, and to have given him battle; but not attaining him in time, set down before the castle of Aton. Bacon's Henry VII.
 To come to; to enter upon.
Canaan he now attains; I see his tentsPitch'd above Sichem. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xii.
 To reach; to equal.
So the first precedent, if it be good, is seldom attained by imitation. Bacon's Essays.
To have knowledge in most objects of contemplation, is what the mind of one man can hardly attain unto. Locke.

Attain (verb neuter)
To Atta'in. v.n.

 To come to a certain state.
Milk will soon separate itself into a cream, and a more serous liquor, which, after twelve days, attains to the highest degree of acidity. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 To arrive at.

Attainable
Atta'inable. adj. [from attain.] That which may be attained; procurable.
He wilfully neglects the obtaining unspeakable good, which he is persuaded is certain and attainable. Tillotson.
None was proposed that appeared certainly attainable, or of value enough. Rogers.

Attainableness
Atta'inableness. n.s. [from attainable.] The quality of being attainable.
Persons become often enamoured of outward beauty, without any particular knowledge of its possessor, or its attainableness by them. Cheyne's Philosophical Principles.

Attainder
Atta'inder. n.s. [from to attaint.]

 The act of attainting in law; conviction of a crime. See To Attaint.
The ends in calling a parliament were chiefly to have the attainders of all of his party reversed; and, on the other side, to attaint by parliament his enemies. Bacon's Henry VII.
 Taint.
So smooth he daub'd his vice with shew of virtue,He liv'd from all attainder of suspect. Shakesp. Richard III.

Attainment
Atta'inment. n.s. [from attain.]

 That which is attained; acquisition.
We dispute with men that count it a great attainment to be able to talk much, and little to the purpose. Glanville's Scepsis.
Our attainments are mean, compared with the perfection of the universe. Grew's Cosmologia Sacra, b. ii.
 The act or power of attaining.
The Scripture must be sufficient to imprint in us the character of all things necessary for the attainment of eternal life. Hooker, b. v.
Education in extent, more large, of time shorter, and of attainment more certain. Milton on Education.
Government is an art above the attainment of an ordinary genius. South.
If the same actions be the instruments, both of acquiring fame and procuring happiness, they would nevertheless fail in the attainment of this last end, if they proceeded from a desire of the first. Addison. Spectator, № 257.
The great care of God for our salvation must appear in the concern he expressed for our attainment of it. Rogers.

Attaint (noun)
Atta'int. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Any thing injurious, as illness, weariness.  This sense is now obsolete.
Nor doth he dedicate one jot of colourUnto the weary and all-watched night;But freshly looks, and overbears attaintWith chearful semblance. Shakesp. Henry V.
 Stain; spot; taint.
No man hath a virtue that he has not a glimpse of; nor any man an attaint, but he carries some stain of it. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
 In horsemanship.  A blow or wound on the hinder feet of a horse. Farrier's Dict.

Attaint (verb)
To Atta'int. v.a. [attenter, Fr.]

 To attaint is particularly used for such as are found guilty of some crime or offence, and especially of felony or treason.  A man is attainted two ways, by appearance, or by process.  Attainder by appearance is by confession, battle, or verdict.  Confession is double; one at the bar before the judges, when the prisoner, upon his indictment read, being asked guilty or not guilty, answers guilty, never putting himself upon the verdict of the jury.  The other is before the coroner in sanctuary, where he, upon his confession, was in former times constrained to abjure the realm; which kind is called attainder by abjuration.  Attainder by battle is, when the party appealed, and choosing to try the truth by combat rather than by jury, is vanquished.  Attainder by verdict is, when the prisoner at the bar, answering to the indictment not guilty, hath an inquest of life and death passing upon him, and is by the verdict pronounced guilty.  Attainder by process is, where a party flies, and is not found till five times called publickly in the county, and at last outlawed upon his default. Cowel.
Were it not an endless trouble, that no traitor or felon should be attainted, but a parliament must be called. Spenser on Ireland.
I must offend before I be attainted. Shakesp. Hen. VI.
 To taint; to corrupt.
My tender youth was never yet attaintWith any passion of inflaming love. Shakesp. Henry VI.

Attaminate
To Atta'minate. v.a. [attamino, Lat.] To corrupt; to spoil.

Attinge
To Atti'nge. v.a. [attingo, Lat.] To touch lightly or gently. Dict.

Aught
Aught. pronoun. [auhꞇ, aƿhꞇ, Saxon. It is sometimes, improperly, written ought.] Any thing.
                     If I can do it, By aught that I can speak in his dispraise, She shall not long continue love to him. Sh. T. G. of Verona.
 They may, for aught I know, obtain such substances as may induce the chymists to entertain other thoughts. Boyle.
 But go, my son, and see if aught be wanting Among thy father's friends. Addison's Cato.

Augur (noun)
A'ugur. n.s. [augur, Lat.] One who pretends to predict by omens, particularly by the flight of birds.
                     What say the augurs? ——— — They would not have you stir forth to-day: Plucking the entrails of an offering forth, They could not find a heart within the beast. Shak. J. Cæs.
 Calchas, the sacred seer, who had in view Things present and the past, and things to come foreknew: Supreme of augurs. Dryden's Fables.
                 As I and mine consult thy augur, Grant the glad omen; let thy fav'rite rise Propitious, ever soaring from the right. Prior.

Auriferous
Auri'ferous. adj. [aurifer, Lat.] That which produces gold.
Rocks rich in gems, and mountains big with mines,Whence many a bursting stream auriferous plays. Thomson.

Autocrasy
Auto'crasy. n.s. [ἀυτοκρατεῖα, from ἀυτος, self, and κράτος, power.] Independent power; supremacy. Dict.

Avail (noun)
Ava'il. n.s. [from to avail.] Profit; advantage; benefit.
For all that else did come, were sure to fail;Yet would he further none but for avail. Spenser's Hubbard's Tale.
                    I charge thee,As heav'n shall work in me for thine avail,To tell me truly. Shakesp. All's well that ends well.
Truth, light upon this way, is of no more avail to us than errour. Locke.

Avail (verb active)
To Ava'il. v.a. [from valoir, Fr. to avail being nearly the same thing with faire valoir.]

 To profit; to turn to profit; with of before the thing used.
Then shall they seek t' avail themselves of names,Places, and titles; and with these to joinSecular pow'r. Milton's Par. Lost, b. xii.
Both of them avail themselves of those licences, which Apollo has equally bestowed on them. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 To promote; to prosper; to assist.
Meantime he voyag'd to explore the willOf Jove on high Dodona's holy hill,What means might best his safe return avail. Pope's Odyss.

Avail (verb neuter)
To Ava'il. v.n. To be of use; to be of advantage.
Nor can my strength avail, unless by theeEndu'd with force, I gain the victory. Dryden's Fables.
When real merit is wanting, it avails nothing to have been encouraged by the great. Pope's Preface to his Works.

Away
Awa'y. adv. [aƿᵹ, Saxon.]

 Absent.
                          They could make Love to your dress, although your face were away. Ben Johnson's Catiline.
 It is impossible to know properties that are so annexed to it, that any of them being away, that essence is not there. Locke.
 From any place or person.
 I have a pain upon my forehead here ——— — Why that's with watching; 'twill away again. Shakesp. Othello.
 When the fowls came down upon the carcases, Abraham drove them away again. Gen. xv. 11.
 Would you youth and beauty stay, Love hath wings, and will away. Waller.
 Summer suns roll unperceiv'd away. Pope.
 Let us go.
 Away, old man; give me thy hand; away; King Lear hath lost, he and his daughter ta'en; Give me thy hand. Come on. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Begone.
 Away, and glister like the god of war, When he intendeth to become the field. Shakesp. King John.
 I'll to the woods among the happier brutes: Come, let's away; hark, the still horn resounds. Smith's Phædra and Hippolitus.
                  Away, you flatt'rer! Nor charge his gen'rous meaning. Rowe's Jane Shore.
 Out of one's own hands; into the power of something else.
 It concerns every man, who will not trifle away his soul, and fool himself into irrecoverable misery, to enquire into these matters. Tillotson.
 It is often used with a verb; as, to drink away an estate; to idle away a manor; that is, to drink or idle till an estate or manor is gone.
 He play'd his life away. Pope.
 On the way; on the road: perhaps this is the original import of the following phrase.
 Sir Valentine, whither away so fast? Sh. T. G. of Verona.
 Perhaps the phrase, he cannot away with, may mean he cannot travel with; he cannot bear the company.
 She never could away with me.  —— Never, never: she would always say, she could not abide master Shallow. Shakesp. Henry IV.
 Away with. Throw away; take away.
          If you dare think of deserving our charms, Away with your sheephooks, and take to your arms. Dryd.

Awe (noun)
Awe. n.s. [eᵹe, oᵹa, Saxon.] Reverential fear; reverence.
 They all be brought up idly, without awe of parents, without precepts of masters, and without fear of offence. Spenser's State of Ireland.
 It fixed upon him who is only to be feared, God: and yet with a filial fear, which at the same time both fears and loves. It was awe without amazement, and dread without distraction. South.
 What is the proper awe and fear, which is due from man to God? Rogers.

Awe (verb)
To Awe. v.a. [from the noun.] To strike with reverence, or fear.
If you will work on any man, you must either know his nature and fashions, and so lead him; or his ends, and so persuade him; or his weaknesses and disadvantages, and so awe him; or those that have interest in him, and so govern him. Bacon.
Why then was this forbid? Why, but to awe? Why, but to keep you low, and ignorant, His worshippers? Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix.
Heav'n that hath plac'd this island to give law, To balance Europe, and her states to awe. Waller.
The rods and axes of princes, and their deputies, may awe many into obedience; but the fame of their goodness, justice, and other virtues, will work on more. Atterbury's Sermons.

Aweband
A'weband. n.s. [from awe and band.] A check. Dict.

Awful
A'wful. adj. [from awe and full.]

 That which strikes with awe, or fills with reverence.
 So awful, that with honour thou may'st love Thy mate; who sees, when thou art seen least wise. Milt. Par. Lost, b. viii. l. 577.
                  I approach thee thus, and gaze Insatiate; I thus single; nor have fear'd, Thy awful brow, more awful thus retir'd, Fairest resemblance of thy Maker fair! Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix.
 Worshipful: in authority; invested with dignity. This sense is obsolete.
 Know then, that some of us are gentlemen, Such as the fury of ungovern'd youth Thrust from the company of awful men. Shakesp. Two Gentlemen of Verona.
 Struck with awe; timorous; scrupulous. This sense occurs but rarely.
 It is not nature and strict reason, but a weak and awful reverence for antiquity, and the vogue of fallible men. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.

Awfully
A'wfully. adv. [from awful.] In a reverential manner.
 It will concern a man, to treat this great principle awfully and warily, by still observing what it commands, but especially what it forbids. South.

Awfulness
A'wfulness. n.s. [from awful.]

 The quality of striking with awe; solemnity.
 These objects naturally raise seriousness; and night heightens the awfulness of the place, and pours out her supernumerary horrours upon every thing. Addison. Spect. № 110.
 The state of being struck with awe.
 An help to prayer, producing in us reverence and awfulness to the divine nature of God. Taylor's Rule of living holy.

Awhape
To Awha'pe. v.a. [This word l have met with only in Spenser, nor can I discover whence it is derived; but imagine, that the Teutonick language had anciently wapen, to strike, or some such word, from which weapons, or offensive arms, took their denomination.] To strike; to confound.
Ah! my dear gossip, answer'd then the ape, Deeply do your sad words my wits awhape, Both for because your grief doth great appear, And eke because myself am touched near. Hubberd's Tale.

Awhile
Awhi'le. adv. [This word, generally reputed an adverb, is only a while, that is, a time, an interval.] Some time; some space of time.
                     Stay, stay, I say; And if you love me, as you say you do, Let me persuade you to forbear awhile. Shakesp. Henry VI.
Into this wild abyss the wary fiend Stood on the brink of hell, and look'd awhile, Pond'ring his voyage. Milt. Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 918.

Awk
Awk. adj. [a barbarous contraction of the word awkward.] Odd; out of order.
 We have heard as arrant jangling in the pulpits, as the steeples; and the professors ringing as awk as the bells to give notice of the conflagration. L'Estrange.

Awkward
A'wkward. adj. [[æƿaꞃꝺ, Saxon; that is, backward, untoward.]

 lnelegant; unpolite; untaught; ungenteel.
                                    Proud Italy, Whose manners still our tardy, apish nation Limps after in base awkward imitation. Shak. Rich. II.
 Their own language is worthy their care; and they are judged of by their handsome or awkward way of expressing themselves in it. Locke.
 An awkward shame, or fear of ill usage, has a share in this conduct. Swift.
 Unready; unhandy; not dexterous; clumsy.
 Slow to resolve, but in performance quick; So true, that he was awkward at a trick. Dryd. Hind and P.
 Perverse; untoward.
                  A kind and constant friend To all that regularly offend; But was implacable, and awkward, To all that interlop'd and hawker'd. Hudibras.

Awkwardly
A'wkwardly. adv. [from awkward.] Clumsily; unreadily; inelegantly; ungainly.
Dametas nodding from the waste upwards, and swearing he never knew a man go more awkwardly to work. Sidney.
If any pretty creature is void of genius, and would perform her part but awkwardly, I must nevertheless insist upon her working. Addison. Spectator, № 606.
And when any thing is done awkwardly, the common saying will pass upon them, that it is suitable to their breeding. Locke.
She still renews the ancient scene; Forgets the forty years between; Awkwardly gay, and oddly merry; Her scarf pale pink, her head-knot cherry. Prior.
If a man be taught to hold his pen awkwardly, yet writes sufficiently well, it is not worth while to teach him the accurate methods of handling that instrument. Watts's Imp. of the Mind.

Awkwardness
A'wkwardness. n.s. [from awkward.] Inelegance; want of gentility; oddness; unsuitableness.
One may observe awkwardness in the Italians, which easily discovers their airs not to be natural. Addis. Rem. on Italy.
All his airs of behaviour have a certain awkwardness in them; but these awkward airs are worn away by degrees in company. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.

Awl
Awl. n.s. [æl, al, Sax.] A pointed instrument to bore holes with.
He which was minded to make himself a perpetual servant, should, for a visible token thereof, have also his ear bored through with an awl. Hooker, b. iv. § 1.
You may likewise prick many holes with an awl, about a joint that will lie in the earth. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Awless
A'wless. adj. [from awe, and the negative less.]

 Without reverence.
 Against whose fury, and th' unmatched force, The awless lion could not wage the fight. Shak. King John.
 He claims the bull with awless insolence, And having seiz'd his horns, accosts the prince. Dryden.
 Without the power of causing reverence.
 Ah me! I see the ruin of my house; The tyger now hath seiz'd the gentle hind: Insulting tyranny begins to jut Upon the innocent and awless throne. Shakesp. Rich. III.

Awme
Awme, or Aume. n.s. A Dutch measure of capacity for liquids, containing eight steckans, or twenty verges or verteels; answering to what in England is called a tierce, or one sixth of a ton of France, or one seventh of an English ton. Arbuth. Tab.

Awn
Awn. n.s. [arista, Lat.] The beard growing out of the corn or grass. Chambers.

Awning
A'wning. n.s. A cover spread over a boat or vessel, to keep off the weather.
 Of these boards I made an awning over me. Robinson Cruso.

Awoke
Awo'ke. The preterite from awake.
And she said, the Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awoke out of his sleep. Judges, xvi. 20.

Awork
A'work. adv. [from a and work.] On work; into a state of labour.
                         So after Pyrrhus' pause, Aroused vengeance sets him new awork. Shakesp. Hamlet.
By prescribing the condition, it sets us awork to the performances of it, and that by living well. Hammond's Pract. Cat.

Aworking
A'working. adj. [from awork.] In the state of working.
Long they thus travelled, yet never met Adventure which might them aworking set. Hubberd's Tale.

Awry
Awry'. adv. [from a and wry.]

 Not in a strait direction; obliquely.
But her sad eyes still fast'ned on the ground,Are governed with goodly modesty;That suffers not one look to glance awry,Which may let in a little thought unsound. Spens. Epithal.
Like perspectives which rightly gaz'd upon,Shew nothing but confusion; ey'd awry,Distinguish form. Shakesp. Richard II.
                            When lo!A violent cross wind, from either coast,Blows them transverse; ten thousand leagues awryInto the devious air. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.
 Asquint; with oblique vision.
                      You know the kingWith jealous eyes has look'd awryOn his son's actions. Denham's Sophy.
 Not level; unevenly.
I hap to step awry, where I see no path, and can discern but few steps afore me. Brerewood on Languages.
 Not equally between two points.
Not tyrants fierce that unrepenting die,Not Cynthia when her manteau's pinn'd awry,Ere felt such rage. Pope's Rape of the Lock.
 Not in a right state; perversely.
All awry, and which wried it to the most wry course of all, wit abused, rather to feign reason why it should be amiss, than how it should be amended. Sidney, b. ii.
Much of the soul they talk, but all awry,And in themselves seek virtue, and to themselvesAll glory arrogate, to God give none. Paradise Regained.

Axe
Axe. n.s. [ax, acꞅ, Sax. ascia, Lat.] An instrument consisting of a metal head, with a sharp edge, fixed in a helve or handle, to cut with.
                No metal can,No, not the hangman's axe, bear half the keennessOf thy sharp envy. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
There stood a forest on the mountain's brow,Which overlook'd the shaded plains below;No sounding axe presum'd these trees to bite,Coeval with the world; a venerable sight. Dryden's Fables.

Axilla
Axi'lla. n.s. [axilla, Lat.] The cavity under the upper part of the arm, called the arm-pit. Quincy.

Axillar
Axi'llar.A'xillary.

adj. [from axilla, Lat.] Belonging to the armpit.


In the same manner is the axillary artery distributed unto the hand; below the cubit, it divideth unto two parts. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Axillary
Axi'llar.A'xillary.

adj. [from axilla, Lat.] Belonging to the armpit.


In the same manner is the axillary artery distributed unto the hand; below the cubit, it divideth unto two parts. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Axiom
A'xiom. n.s. [axioma, Lat. ἀξίωμα, from ἀξιόω.]

 A proposition evident at first sight, that cannot be made plainer by demonstration.
Axioms, or principles more general, are such as this, that the greater good is to be chosen before the lesser. Hooker, b. i.
 An established principle to be granted without new proof.
The axioms of that law, whereby natural agents are guided, have their use in the moral. Hooker, b. i.
Their affirmations are unto us no axioms; we esteem thereof as things unsaid, and account them but in list of nothing. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i.

Axis
A'xis. n.s. [axis, Lat.] The line real or imaginary that passes through any thing, on which it may revolve.
But since they say our earth, from morn to morn,On its own axis is oblig'd to turn;That swift rotation must disperse in airAll things which on the rapid orb appear. Blackmore.
It might annually have compassed the sun, and yet never have once turned upon its axis. Bentley's Sermons.
On their own axis the planets run,And make at once their circle round the sun;So two consistent motions act the soul,And one regards itself, and one the whole. Pope's Essay on Man, epist. iii. l. 313.

Axle
A'xel.A'xle-tree.

n.s. [axis, Lat.] The pin which passes through the midst of the wheel, on which the circumvolutions of the wheel are performed.


                    Venerable NestorShould with a bond of air, strong as the axle-treeOn which heav'n rides, knit all the Grecians earsTo his experienc'd tongue. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
The fly sate upon the axel-tree of the chariot-wheel, and said, what a dust do I raise? Bacon's Essays.
And the gilded car of dayHis glowing axle doth allayIn the steep Atlantick stream. Milton's Comus.
He saw a greater sun appear,Than his bright throne or burning axle-tree could bear. Milton's Christ's Nativity.

Axle-tree
A'xel.A'xle-tree.

n.s. [axis, Lat.] The pin which passes through the midst of the wheel, on which the circumvolutions of the wheel are performed.


                    Venerable NestorShould with a bond of air, strong as the axle-treeOn which heav'n rides, knit all the Grecians earsTo his experienc'd tongue. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
The fly sate upon the axel-tree of the chariot-wheel, and said, what a dust do I raise? Bacon's Essays.
And the gilded car of dayHis glowing axle doth allayIn the steep Atlantick stream. Milton's Comus.
He saw a greater sun appear,Than his bright throne or burning axle-tree could bear. Milton's Christ's Nativity.

Ay
Ay. adv. [perhaps from aio, Lat.]

 Yes; an adverb of answering affirmatively.
Return you thither? — — —— Ay, madam, with the swiftest wing of speed. Shakesp. All's well that ends well.
What say'st thou? Wilt thou be of our consort?Say ay; and be the captain of us all. Shakesp. Two Gentlemen of Verona.
 It is a word by which the sense is enforced; even; yes, certainly; and more than that.
Remember it, and let it make thee crest-fall'n;Ay, and allay this thy abortive pride. Shakesp. Henry VI.

Aye
Aye. adv. [aƿa, Saxon.] Always; to eternity; for ever.
And now in darksome dungeon, wretched thrall,Remedyless for aye he doth him hold. Fairy Queen, b. i.
                    Either prepare to die,Or on Diana's altar to protest,For aye, austerity and single life. Shakespeare's Midsummer Night's Dream.
The soul, though made in time, survives for aye;And, though it hath beginning, sees no end. Sir John Davies.
And hears the muses, in a ring,Aye round about Jove's altar sing. Milton's Il Penseroso.
Th' astonish'd mariners aye ply the pump;No stay, nor rest, till the wide breach is clos'd. Philips.

Aygreen
A'ygreen. n.s. The same with houseleek; which see. Dict.

Ayry
A'yry. n.s. [See Airy.]
I should discourse on the brancher, the haggard, and then treat of their several ayries. Walton's Angler.

Azimuth
A'zimuth. n.s. [Arab.]

 The azimuth of the sun, or of a star, is an arch between the meridian of the place and any given vertical line.

 Magnetical azimuth, is an arch of the horizon contained between the sun's azimuth circle and the magnetic meridian; or it is the apparent distance of the sun from the north or south point of the compass.

 Azimuth Compass, is an instrument used at sea for finding the sun's magnetical azimuth.

 Azimuth Dial, is a dial whose style or gnomon is at right angles to the plane of the horizon.

 Azimuths, called also vertical circles, are great circles intersecting each other in the zenith and nadir, and cutting the horizon at right angles, in all the points thereof. Chambers

Azure
Azu're. adj. [azur, Fr. azurro, Span. lazur, Arab. from lazuli, a blue stone.] Blue; faint blue.
The blue of the first order, though very faint and little, may be the colour of some substances; and the azure colour of the skies seems to be of this order. Newton's Opticks
                            Thus repliesMinerva, graceful with her azure eyes. Pope's Odyssey, b. i.
                            The sea,Far through his azure turbulent domain,Your empire owns. Thomson's Spring.
